{"Barium enema": {"description": "Barium enema is a special x-ray of the large intestine, which includes the colon and rectum."}, "Biopsy - polyps": {"description": "A polyp biopsy is a test that takes a sample of, or removes polyps (abnormal growths) for examination."}, "Boric acid poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Blisters", "Collapse", "Coma", "Convulsions", "Drowsiness", "Fever", "Lack of desire to do anything", "Low blood pressure", "Significantly decreased urine output (or none)", "Sloughing of skin", "Twitching of facial muscles, arms, hands, legs, and feet"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Birth control pills - combination": {"description": "\r\n\r\n \r\nBirth control pills help keep you from getting pregnant. Combination birth control pills contain both estrogen and progestin. Some combination birth control pills let you have fewer periods each year. These are called continuous or extended-cycle pills.\r\n"}, "Basic metabolic panel": {"description": "The basic metabolic panel is a group of blood tests that provides information about your body's metabolism."}, "Blood in the semen": {"description": "Blood in the semen is called hematospermia. It may be in amounts too small to be seen except with a microscope, or it may be visible in the ejaculation fluid.", "Causes": "Most of the time, blood in the semen is caused by swelling or infection of the prostate or seminal vesicles. The problem may occur after a prostate biopsy.Blood in the semen may also be caused by:Blockage due to enlarged prostate (prostate problems), Infection of the prostate, Irritation in urethra (urethritis), Injury to urethra . Often, the cause of the problem cannot be found.Depending on the cause, other symptoms that may occur include:Blood in urine, Fever or chills, Lower back pain, Pain with bowel movement, Pain with ejaculation, Pain with urination, Swelling in scrotum, Swelling or tenderness in groin area, Tenderness in the scrotum . "}, "Benign": {"description": "The opposite of benign is malignant."}, "Bartter syndrome": {"description": "Bartter syndrome is a group of rare conditions that affect the kidneys.", "Possible Complications": "Kidney failure or gallstones\u00a0is a possible complication.", "Symptoms": ["Constipation", "Growth failure", "Increased frequency of urination", "Low blood pressure", "Kidney stone", "Muscle cramping and weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "Bartter syndrome is usually suspected when a blood test finds a low level of potassium in the blood. Unlike other forms of kidney disease, this condition does not cause high blood pressure. There is a tendency toward low blood pressure. Other signs of this syndrome include:High levels of potassium, calcium, and chloride in the urine, High levels of the hormones renin and aldosterone in the blood, Low blood chloride, Metabolic alkalosis. These same signs and symptoms can also occur in people who take too many diuretics (water pills) or laxatives. Urine tests can be done to rule out other causes.Biopsy of the kidney may be done to confirm Bartter syndrome. A biopsy is a medical procedure that removes a small piece of kidney tissue for examination.", "Treatment": "Bartter syndrome is treated by eating foods rich in potassium or taking potassium supplements.Many patients also need salt and magnesium supplements. Medicine may be needed that blocks the kidney's ability to get rid of potassium. High doses of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) may also be used.", "Causes": "There are five gene defects known to be associated with Bartter syndrome. The condition is present\u00a0at birth (congenital).The condition is\u00a0caused by a defect in the kidneys' ability to reabsorb sodium. Persons\u00a0affected by\u00a0Bartter syndrome lose too much sodium through the urine. This causes a rise in the level of the hormone aldosterone, and makes the kidneys remove too much potassium from the body. This is known as potassium wasting. The condition also results in an abnormal acid balance in the blood called hypokalemic alkalosis, which causes too much calcium in the urine."}, "Blood clots": {"description": "A thrombus or embolus can partly or completely block the flow of blood in a blood vessel.", "Causes": "Situations in which a blood clot is more likely to form include:Being on long-term bed rest, Crossing your legs for long periods when sitting, or sitting for long periods, such as in a plane or car, During and after pregnancy, Not having enough water in your body (dehydration), Taking birth control pills or estrogen hormones (especially in women who smoke), Long-term use of an intravenous catheter . Blood clots are also more likely in people with cancer, recent surgery or injury, obesity, and liver or kidney disease.A buildup of cholesterol that narrows an artery may change or slow the flow of blood, making it easier for a blood clot or thrombus to form.Conditions that are passed down through families (inherited) may make you more likely to form abnormal blood clots. Inherited conditions that affect clotting are:Factor V Leiden thrombophilia, Prothrombin G20210A mutation, Other rare conditions such as protein C, protein S, and antithrombin III deficiencies. A blood clot may block an artery or vein in the heart, affecting the:Heart (angina or a heart attack), Intestines (mesenteric ischemia) or mesenteric venous thrombosis, Kidneys (renal vein thrombosis), Leg or arm arteries, Legs (deep vein thrombosis), Lungs (pulmonary embolism), Neck or brain (stroke) . "}, "Bladder outlet obstruction": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Continuous feeling of a full bladder", "Frequent urination", "Inability to urinate (acute urinary retention)", "Pain during urination (dysuria)", "Problems starting urination (urinary hesitancy)", "Slow urine flow", "Urinary tract infection", "Urine stream that starts and stops (urinary intermittency)", "Waking up at night to urinate (nocturia)", "Nausea, fatigue, and fluid retention if kidney failure occurs "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will ask about your symptoms and medical history and will\u00a0do a physical exam. One or more of the following problems may be found:Abdominal growth, Cystocele (women), Enlarged bladder, Enlarged prostate (men) . Tests may include:Blood chemistries to look for signs of kidney damage, Cystoscopy and retrograde urethrogram (x-ray) to look for narrowing of the urethra, Tests to determine how fast urine flows out of the body (uroflowmetry), Tests to see how much the urine flow is blocked and how well the bladder contracts (urodynamic testing), Ultrasound to locate the blockage of urine and find out how well the bladder empties, Urinalysis to look for blood or signs of infection in the urine, Urine culture to check for an infection . ", "description": "Bladder outlet obstruction (BOO) is a blockage at the base of the bladder. It reduces or prevents the flow of urine into the tube that carries urine out of the body (urethra). ", "Causes": "Common causes of bladder outlet obstruction (BOO) include:Benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH), or enlarged prostate\r\n  , Bladder stones, Bladder tumors (cancer), Pelvic tumors (cervix, prostate, uterus, rectum), Urethral stricture (scar tissue) . Less common causes include:Cystocele (when the bladder falls into the vagina), Foreign objects, Posterior urethral valves (birth defect in males), Urethral spasms, Urethral diverticula . This condition is most common in aging men. It is often caused by BPH. Bladder stones and bladder cancer are also more commonly seen in men than women. As a man ages, his chance of developing these diseases increases greatly.", "Treatment": "Treatment of bladder outlet obstruction depends on the cause of the problem. For most cases, a tube called a catheter is inserted through the urethra into the bladder. The catheter will relieve the blockage.Sometimes a suprapubic catheter (a tube placed through the belly area into the bladder) is needed to drain the bladder.Surgery is most often needed for long-term treatment of bladder outlet obstruction. However, many of the diseases that cause this problem can be treated with medicines. Talk to your health care provider about possible treatments."}, "Bone marrow aspiration": {"description": "Bone marrow aspiration is not the same as bone marrow biopsy. A biopsy removes actual marrow for examination."}, "Bronchiolitis - discharge": {"description": "Your child has bronchiolitis, which causes swelling and mucus to build up in the smallest air passages of the lungs. In the hospital, the doctors and nurses helped your child breathe better. They also made sure your child received enough fluids."}, "Beeswax": {"Symptoms": [], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Birthmarks - pigmented": {"description": "A birthmark is a skin marking that is present at birth. Birthmarks include cafe-au-lait spots, moles, and mongolian spots. Birthmarks can also be red.", "Possible Complications": "Skin cancer\r\n, Emotional distress if the birthmark affects appearance. ", "Symptoms": ["Cafe-au-lait spots are light tan, the color of coffee with milk.", "Moles are small clusters of colored skin cells.", "Mongolian spots (also called Mongolian blue spots) are usually bluish or bruised-looking. They usually appear over the lower back or buttocks. They are also found in\u00a0other areas such as\u00a0the trunk or arms.", "Abnormally dark or light skin", "Growth of hair from pigmented skin", "Skin lesion", "Skin lumps", "Textured skin that can be\u00a0smooth, flat, raised, or wrinkled"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will examine your skin to make the diagnosis. You may have a biopsy to look for skin changes that are signs of cancer. The doctor may take pictures of the birthmark\u00a0to compare changes over time. ", "Treatment": "The type of treatment you have depends on the\u00a0type of birthmark and related conditions. Usually no treatment is needed for the birthmark itself.Large birthmarks that affect your appearance and self-esteem may be covered with special cosmetics.You may have surgery to remove moles if they\u00a0they affect your appearance or have an increased cancer risk. Talk to your doctor how and when to remove any moles.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent birthmarks. A person with birthmarks should use a strong sunscreen when outdoors (to prevent complications).", "Causes": "Cafe-au-lait spots may occur in people with the genetic disorder, neurofibromatosis.Nearly everyone has moles, which usually appear after birth.Mongolian spots are more common in people with darker skin.\u00a0"}, "Breastfeeding - skin and nipple changes": {"description": "Learn about skin and nipple changes in the breast so you know when to see your health care provider. "}, "Bipolar disorder ": {"Symptoms": ["\r\n \r\n Easily distracted\r\n \r\n ", "\r\n \r\n Little need for sleep\r\n \r\n ", "\r\n Poor judgment\r\n ", "\r\n \r\n Poor temper control\r\n \r\n ", "Reckless behavior and lack of self-control such as drinking, drug use, sex with many partners, spending sprees", "Very irritable mood, such as racing thoughts, talking a lot, false beliefs about self or abilities", "\r\n Very involved in activities\r\n ", "Daily low mood or sadness", "Difficulty concentrating, remembering, or making decisions", "Eating problems such as loss of appetite and weight loss, or overeating and weight gain", "Fatigue or lack of energy", "Feeling worthless, hopeless, or guilty", "Loss of pleasure in activities once enjoyed", "Loss of self-esteem", "Thoughts of death or suicide", "Trouble getting to sleep or sleeping too much", "Pulling away from friends or activities that were once enjoyed ", "Depression and mania symptoms may occur together. This is called a mixed state.", "Symptoms may also occur right after each other. This is called rapid cycling. "], "Exams and Tests": "To diagnose bipolar disorder, the health care provider may do some or all of the following:Ask whether other family members have bipolar disorder., Ask about your recent mood swings and for how long you have had them., Perform a thorough exam and order lab tests to look for other illnesses that may be causing the symptoms that resemble bipolar disorder., Talk to family members about your symptoms and overall health., Ask about any health problems you have and any medications you take., Watch your behavior and mood. . ", "description": "Bipolar disorder is a condition in which a person has periods of depression and periods of being extremely happy or being cross or irritable. In addition to these mood swings, the person also has extreme changes in activity and energy levels. ", "Causes": "Bipolar disorder affects men and women equally. It usually starts between ages 15 and 25. The exact cause is not known. But it occurs more often in relatives of people with bipolar disorder.In most people with bipolar disorder, there is no clear cause for the periods (episodes) of extreme happiness and high activity or energy (mania) or depression and low activity or energy (depression). The following may trigger a manic episode:Childbirth, Medicines such as antidepressants or steroids, Periods of not being able to sleep (insomnia), Recreational drug use . ", "Treatment": "The main goal of treatment is to:Make the episodes less frequent and severe, Help you function well and enjoy your life at home and at work, Prevent self-injury and suicide . MEDICINESMedicines are a key part of treating bipolar disorder. Most often, the first medicines used are called mood stabilizers. They help you avoid mood swings and extreme changes in activity and energy levels.With medicines, you may begin to feel better. For some, symptoms of mania may feel good. Or side effects from the medicines may occur. As a result, you may be tempted to stop taking your medicine or change the way you are taking them. But stopping your medicines or taking them in the wrong way can cause symptoms to come back or become much worse.Family members or friends can help you take medicines the correct way. They can also help to make sure that episodes of mania and depression are treated as early as possible.Other medicines, such as antipsychotics or antidepressants, may be tried.Regular visits with a psychiatrist to talk about your medicines and side effects are needed. Blood tests are often needed also.OTHER TREATMENTSElectroconvulsive therapy (ECT) may be used to treat the manic or depressive phase if it does not respond to medication. Patients who are in the middle of a severe manic or depressive episode may need to stay in a hospital until they are stable and their behavior is under control.SUPPORT PROGRAMS AND TALK THERAPY\r\nMany people with bipolar disorder do not recognize when they are becoming more depressed or more manic. Joining a support group may help you and your loved ones. Involving family members and caregivers in your treatment programs may help reduce the chance of symptoms returning in the patient.\r\nImportant skills that may be learned at such programs include:Coping with symptoms that are present even while taking medications, Getting enough sleep and staying away from recreational drugs, Taking medicines correctly and how to manage side effects, Watching for the return of symptoms, and knowing what to do when they return, Finding out what triggers the episodes and how to avoid these triggers . Talk therapy with a mental health provider may be helpful for people with bipolar disorder."}, "Bringing your child to visit a very ill sibling": {"description": "Bringing a healthy child to visit a very ill sibling in the hospital can help the whole family. But, before you take your child to visit their ill sibling, prepare your child for the visit so they know what to expect."}, "Baby feeding patterns": {"description": "Baby feeding patterns refer to the time schedule for giving a baby food through a bottle or breast."}, "Bleeding during cancer treatment": {"description": "If you do not have enough platelets, you may bleed too much. Everyday activities can cause this bleeding. You need to know how to prevent bleeding and what to do if you are bleeding."}, "Babies and shots": {"description": "Immunizations are important to keep your child healthy. This article discusses how to ease the pain of shots for babies."}, "Breech birth": {"description": "If your baby's position does not feel normal, you may need an ultrasound. If the ultrasound shows your baby is breech, your provider will talk with you about your options for a safe delivery. "}, "Brachial plexopathy": {"description": "Brachial plexopathy is pain, decreased movement, or decreased sensation in the arm and shoulder due to a nerve problem affecting the bundle of nerves as they leave the neck and enter the arm.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Deformity of the hand or arm, mild to severe, which can lead to contractures, Partial or complete arm paralysis, Partial or complete loss of sensation in the arm, hand, or fingers, Recurrent or unnoticed injury to the hand or arm due to diminished sensation . ", "Symptoms": ["Numbness of the shoulder, arm, or hand", "Shoulder pain", "Tingling, burning, pain, or abnormal sensations (location depends on the area injured)", "Weakness of the shoulder, arm, hand, or wrist "], "Exams and Tests": "An exam of the arm, hand and wrist can reveal a problem with the nerves of the brachial plexus. Signs may include:Deformity of the arm or hand, Difficulty moving the shoulder, arm, hand, or fingers, Diminished arm reflexes, Wasting of the muscles, Weakness of hand flexing . A detailed history may help determine the cause of the brachial plexopathy. Age and gender are important, because some brachial plexus problems are more common in certain groups. For example, young men more often have inflammatory or post-viral brachial plexus disease called Parsonage Turner syndrome.Tests that may be done to diagnose this condition may include:Blood tests, Chest x-ray, Electromyogram (EMG), MRI of the head, neck, and shoulder, Nerve conduction tests, Nerve biopsy (rarely needed), Ultrasound . ", "Treatment": "Treatment is aimed at correcting the underlying cause and allowing you to use your hand and arm as much as possible. In some cases, no treatment is required and recovery happens on its own.Over-the-counter or prescription pain medicines may be needed to control pain. Anticonvulsants (phenytoin, carbamazepine, gabapentin, and pregabalin), tricyclic antidepressants (amitriptyline and nortriptyline), or other medicines (duloxetine) may be prescribed. Use the recommended dose to avoid side effects.Physical therapy may be recommended for some people to help maintain muscle strength., Orthopedic assistance may increase your ability to use your hand and arm. Such therapy may involve braces, splints, or other appliances., Vocational counseling, occupational therapy, occupational changes, job retraining, or other measures may be recommended. . Some people with brachial plexopathy may benefit from local nerve blocks. Surgery may be needed if nerve compression is the cause of the symptoms.If other nerves are also affected, an underlying medical problem that can affect nerves should be considered. Medical conditions such as diabetes and kidney disease can damage nerves. In these cases, treatment is also directed at the underlying medical condition.", "Prevention": "Prevention is varied, depending on the cause.", "Causes": "Brachial plexus dysfunction (brachial plexopathy) is a form of peripheral neuropathy. It occurs when there is damage to the brachial plexus, an area on each side of the neck where nerve roots from the spinal cord split into each arm's nerves.Damage to the brachial plexus is usually related to direct injury to the nerve, stretching injuries (including birth trauma), pressure from tumors in the area (especially from lung tumors), or damage that results from radiation therapy.Brachial plexus dysfunction may also be associated with:Birth defects that put pressure on the neck area, Exposure to toxins, chemicals, or drugs, General anesthesia, used during surgery, Inflammatory conditions, such as those due to a virus or immune system problem . In some cases, no cause can be identified."}, "Blood gases": {"description": "Blood gases\u00a0are a measurement of how much oxygen and carbon dioxide\u00a0are in your blood.\u00a0They also determine the acidity (pH) of your blood."}, "Benign positional vertigo": {"description": "Benign positional vertigo is the most common type of vertigo. Vertigo is the feeling that you are spinning or that everything is spinning around you. It may occur when you move your head in a certain position.", "Possible Complications": "People with severe vertigo may get dehydrated due to frequent vomiting.", "Symptoms": ["Feeling like you are spinning or moving", "Feeling like the world is spinning around you", "Loss of balance", "Nausea and vomiting", "Hearing loss", "Vision problems, such as a feeling that things are jumping or moving", "Is usually triggered by moving your head", "Often starts suddenly", "Lasts a few seconds to minutes", "Rolling over in bed", "Tilting your head up to look at something"], "Exams and Tests": "To diagnose BPPV, your health care provider may perform a test called the Dix-Hallpike maneuver.Your provider holds your head in a certain position. Then you are asked to lie quickly backward over a table., As you do this, your provider will look for abnormal eye movements and ask if you feel like you are spinning. . If the Dix-Hallpike test doesn't show a clear result, you may be asked to do other tests. Your provider will do a physical exam and ask about your medical history. You may have brain and nervous system (neurological) tests to rule out other causes. These may include:EEG, Electronystagmography (ENG), Head CT, Head MRI, Hearing test, Magnetic resonance angiography of the head, Warming and cooling the inner ear with water or air to test eye movements. This is called caloric stimulation. . ", "Treatment": "Your provider will do a procedure called Epley's maneuver. It can move the small piece of calcium that is floating inside your inner ear. This treatment works best to cure BPPV. Other exercises don't work as well.Some medicines can help relieve spinning sensations. Antihistamines, Anticholinergics, Sedative-hypnotics. However, these medicines often do not work well for treating vertigo.To keep your symptoms from getting worse, avoid the positions that trigger it.", "Prevention": "Avoid head positions that trigger positional vertigo.", "Causes": "Benign positional vertigo is also called benign paroxysmal positional vertigo (BPPV). It is caused by a problem in the inner ear. The inner ear has fluid-filled tubes called semicircular canals. When you move, the fluid moves inside these tubes. The canals are very sensitive to any movement of the fluid. The sensation of the fluid moving in the tube tells your brain the position of your body. This helps you keep your balance.BPPV occurs when a small piece of bone-like calcium breaks free and floats inside the tube. This sends confusing messages to your brain about your body's position.BPPV has no major risk factors. However, your risk for developing BPPV may increase if you have:Family members with BPPV, Had a prior head injury (even a slight bump to the head), Had an inner ear infection called labyrinthitis. "}, "Breath alcohol test": {"description": "A breath alcohol test determines how much alcohol is in your blood by measuring the amount of alcohol in the air you breathe out (exhale)."}, "Baby supplies you need": {"description": "Below is a list of items you will need."}, "Blood transfusions": {"description": "There are several sources of blood which are described below."}, "Boils": {"description": "Related conditions include:", "Possible Complications": "These complications may occur:Abscess of the skin, spinal cord, brain, kidneys, or other organ, Brain infection, Heart infection, Bone infection, Infection of the blood or tisses (sepsis), Spinal cord infection, Spread of infection to other parts of the body or skin surfaces, Permanent scarring\u00a0. ", "Symptoms": ["A bump about the size of a pea,\u00a0but may be as large as a golf ball", "White or yellow center (pustules)", "Spread to\u00a0other skin areas or joining with other boils", "Quick growth", "Weeping, oozing, or crusting ", "Fatigue", "Fever", "General ill-feeling", "Itching before the boil develops", "Skin redness around the boil"], "Exams and Tests": "Health care providers can usually diagnose a boil based on how it looks.\u00a0A sample of cells from\u00a0the boil may be sent to the lab for a\u00a0culture\u00a0to look for staphylococcus or other bacteria.", "Treatment": "Boils may heal on their own after a period of itching and mild pain. More often, they become more painful as pus builds up.Boils usually need to\u00a0open and drain in order to heal. This most often\u00a0happens within 2 weeks. You should:Put warm, moist, compresses on the boil several times a day to speed draining and healing.\u00a0, Never squeeze a boil or try to cut it open at home. This can spread the infection., Continue to put warm, wet, compresses on the area after the boil opens.. You may need to have surgery to drain deep or large boils. Get treatment from your\u00a0health care provider if:A boil lasts longer than 2 weeks., A boil comes back., You have a boil on your\u00a0spine or the middle of\u00a0your face., You have a fever or other\u00a0symptoms with the boil, The boil causes pain. . It\u00a0is important keep a boil clean. To do this:Clean boils and change their dressing often., Wash your hands very well after touching a boil., Do not re-use or share washcloths or towels. Wash clothing, washcloths, towels, and sheets or other items that\u00a0have touched\u00a0infected areas in very hot water., Throw out used\u00a0dressings in a sealed bag so that fluid from the boil does not touch anything else.\u00a0. Your\u00a0health care provider\u00a0may give you antibiotics\u00a0to take by mouth, or a shot, if the boil is very bad or comes back.Antibacterial soaps and creams cannot help much once a boil has formed.\u00a0", "Prevention": "The following may help prevent the spread of infection:Antibacterial soaps, Antiseptic (germ-killing) washes, Keeping clean\u00a0(such as thorough hand washing). ", "Causes": "Boils are very common. They are most often caused by the bacteria\u00a0Staphylococcus aureus. They can also be caused by other types of bacteria or fungi found on the skin's surface. Damage to the hair follicle allows the infection to grow deeper into the\u00a0follicle and the tissues under it. Boils may occur in the hair follicles anywhere on the body. They are most common on the face, neck, armpit, buttocks, and thighs. You may have 1 or many boils."}, "Brain herniation": {"description": "A brain herniation is when brain tissue, cerebrospinal fluid, and blood vessels are moved or pressed away from their usual position inside the skull.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Brain death, Permanent and significant neurologic problems . ", "Symptoms": ["Cardiac arrest (no pulse)", "Coma", "Headache", "Lethargy", "Loss of all brainstem reflexes (blinking, gagging, and pupils reacting to light)", "Loss of consciousness", "Respiratory arrest (no breathing)", "Wide (dilated) pupils and no movement in one or both eyes "], "Exams and Tests": "People with a brain herniation have:High blood pressure, Irregular breathing, Irregular pulse, Slow pulse . A brain and nervous system (neurological) exam shows changes in alertness (consciousness). Depending on the severity of the herniation and the part of the brain that is being pressed on, there will be problems with one or more brain-related reflexes and nerve functions.", "Treatment": "Brain herniation is a medical emergency. The goal of treatment is to save the person's life.To help reverse or prevent a brain herniation, the medical team will treat increased swelling and pressure in the brain. Treatment may involve:Placing a drain into the brain to help remove cerebrospinal fluid (CSF), Corticosteroids, such as dexamethasone, especially if there is a brain tumor, to reduce swelling, Medicines that remove fluid from the body, such as mannitol or other diuretics, which reduce pressure inside the skull, Placing a tube in the airway (endotracheal intubation) and increasing the breathing rate to reduce the levels of carbon dioxide (CO2) in the blood, Removing blood or blood clots if they are raising pressure inside the skull and causing herniation, Removing part of the skull to give the brain more room . ", "Prevention": "Prompt treatment of increased intracranial pressure and related disorders may reduce the risk of brain herniation.", "Causes": "Brain herniation occurs when something inside the skull produces pressure that moves brain tissues. This is most often the result of brain swelling from a head injury, stroke, or brain tumor.Brain herniation can be a side effect of tumors in the brain, including:Metastatic brain tumor, Primary brain tumor. Herniation of the brain can also be caused by other factors that lead to increased pressure inside the skull, including:Abscess, Hemorrhage, Hydrocephalus, Strokes that cause brain swelling, Swelling after radiation therapy . Brain herniation can occur:Between areas inside the skull, such as those separated by a rigid membrane like the tentorium or falx, Through a natural opening at the base of the skull called the foramen magnum, Through openings created during brain surgery . "}, "Burns": {"Symptoms": ["Blisters (intact or ruptured and leaking fluid)", "Pain (How much pain you have is unrelated to the level of burn. The most serious burns can be painless.)", "Peeling skin", "Shock (watch for pale and clammy skin, weakness, blue lips and fingernails, and a drop in alertness)", "Swelling", "Red, white, or charred skin ", "Burns on the head, face, neck, eyebrows, or nose hairs", "Burned lips and mouth", "Coughing", "Difficulty breathing", "Dark, black-stained mucus", "Voice changes", "Wheezing "], "Prevention": "To help prevent burns:Install smoke alarms in your home. Check and change batteries regularly., Teach children about fire safety and the hazards of matches and fireworks., Keep children from climbing on top of a stove or grabbing hot items like irons and oven doors., Turn pot handles toward the back of the stove so that children cannot grab them and they cannot accidentally be knocked over., Place fire extinguishers in key locations at home, work, and school., Remove electrical cords from floors and keep them out of reach., Know about and practice fire escape routes at home, work, and school., Set the water heater temperature at 120 degrees or less. . ", "description": "You can have more than one\u00a0type of burn at a time. ", "Causes": "Causes of burns from most to least common are: Fire/flame, Scalding from steam or hot liquids, Touching hot objects, Electrical burns, Chemical burns . Burns can be the result of: House and industrial fires, Car accidents, Playing with matches, Faulty space heaters, furnaces, or industrial equipment, Unsafe use of firecrackers, Kitchen accidents, such as a child grabbing a hot iron or touching the stove . This list is not all-inclusive.You can also burn your airways if you breathe in smoke, steam, superheated air, or chemical fumes in poorly ventilated areas. "}, "Benefits of breastfeeding ": {"description": "Learn about breastfeeding your baby and decide if breastfeeding is for you. Know that breastfeeding takes time and practice. Get help from your family, nurses, lactation consultants, or support groups to succeed at breastfeeding.\r\n"}, "Bilateral hydronephrosis": {"description": "Bilateral hydronephrosis is the enlargement of the parts of the kidney that collect urine. Bilateral means both sides.", "Possible Complications": "Kidney damage may result from conditions that cause hydronephrosis.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests can show bilateral hydronephrosis:CT scan of the abdomen or kidneys, IVP (used less often), Pregnancy (fetal) ultrasound, Renal scan, Ultrasound of the abdomen or kidneys . ", "Treatment": "Placing a tube into the bladder (Foley catheter) may open the blockage. Other treatments include:Draining the bladder\r\n , Relieving pressure by placing tubes in the kidney through the skin\r\n , Placing a tube (stent) through the ureter to allow urine to flow from the kidney to bladder\r\n . The underlying cause of the blockage needs to be found and treated once the buildup of urine is relieved.", "Prevention": "An ultrasound during pregnancy can show a blockage in the baby\u2019s urinary tract. This allows the problem to be treated with early surgery.Other causes of blockage such as kidney stones can be detected early if people notice warning signs of kidney problems.", "Causes": "Bilateral hydronephrosis occurs when urine is unable to drain from the kidney into the bladder. Hydronephrosis is not itself a disease. It occurs as a result of a problem that prevents urine from draining out of the kidneys, ureters, and bladder.Disorders associated with bilateral hydronephrosis include:Acute bilateral obstructive uropathy - sudden blockage of the kidneys, Bladder outlet obstruction - blockage of the bladder that does not allow drainage, Chronic bilateral obstructive uropathy - a gradual blockage of the kidneys, Neurogenic bladder - poorly functional bladder, Posterior urethral valves - flaps on the urethra that causes poor emptying of the bladder (in boys), Prune belly syndrome - poorly emptying bladder that causes distention of the belly, Retroperitoneal fibrosis - increased scar tissue that blocks the ureters, Uteropelvic junction obstruction - blockage of the kidney at the point where the ureter enters the kidney, Vesicoureteric reflux - backup of the urine from the bladder up to the kidney. "}, "Brain injury - discharge ": {"description": "After the person became stable, doctors and nurses did tests and treatment to help them recover from the brain injury. They may have stayed in special units that help people with brain injuries."}, "Breast PET scan": {"description": "A breast positron emission tomography (PET) scan is an imaging test that uses a radioactive substance (called a tracer) to look for breast cancer. This tracer can help identify areas of cancer that an MRI or CT scan may miss."}, "Blood differential": {"description": "See also:"}, "Breastfeeding - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on breastfeeding and breastfeeding problems:"}, "Bernstein test": {"description": "The Bernstein test is a method to reproduce symptoms of heartburn. It is usually done with other tests to measure esophageal function."}, "Breast lift": {"description": "A breast lift, or mastopexy, is cosmetic breast surgery to lift the breasts. The surgery may also involve changing the position of the areola and nipple."}, "Bone x-ray": {"description": "A bone x-ray\u00a0is an imaging test to look at the bones."}, "Benign prostate hyperplasia (BPH) - resources": {"description": "The following organizations provide information on benign prostatic hyperplasia (prostate enlargement):"}, "BAER - brainstem auditory evoked response": {"description": "Brainstem auditory evoked response (BAER) is a test to measure the brain wave activity that occurs in response to clicks or certain tones."}, "Bubble bath soap poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Bowel transit time": {"description": "This article talks about the medical test used to determine bowel transit time."}, "Bowlegs": {"description": "Bowlegs is a condition in which the knees stay wide apart when a person stands with the feet and ankles together. It is consindered normal in children under 18 months. ", "Possible Complications": "Bowlegs that does not go away and is not treated may lead to arthritis in the knees or hips over time. ", "Symptoms": ["Knees do not touch when standing with feet together (ankles touching)", "Bowing of legs is same on both side of the body (symmetrical)", "Bowed legs continue beyond age 3"], "Exams and Tests": "A doctor can often diagnose bowlegs by simply looking at the child. The distance between the knees is measured while the child is lying on the back.Blood tests may be needed to rule out rickets.X-rays may be needed if:The child is 3 years old or older, The bowing is getting worse, Bowing is not the same on both sides, Other test results suggest disease. ", "Treatment": "No treatment is recommended for bowlegs unless the condition is extreme. The child should be seen by the health care provider at least every 6 months.If the condition is severe or the child also has another disease, special shoes, braces, or casts can be tried. It is unclear how well these work.At times, surgery is performed to correct the deformity in an adolescent with severe bowlegs.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent bowlegs, other than to avoid rickets. Make sure your child has normal exposure to sunlight and appropriate levels of vitamin D in the diet.", "Causes": "Infants are born bowlegged because of their folded position in the mother's womb. Bowed legs begin to straighten once the child starts to walk and the legs begin to bear weight (about 12 to 18 months old).By around age 3, the child can usually stand with the ankles apart and the knees just touching. If the bowed legs are still present, the child is called bowlegged.Bowlegs may be caused by illnesses such as:Abnormal bone development, Blount's disease, Fractures that do not heal correctly, Lead or fluoride poisoning, Rickets, which is caused by a lack of\u00a0vitamin D . "}, "Biopsy - biliary tract": {"description": "A biliary tract biopsy is the removal of small amount of cells and fluids from the duodenum, bile ducts, pancreas, or pancreatic duct. he sample is examined under a microscope."}, "Bee poison": {"Symptoms": ["Swelling of throat, lips, and mouth * ", "Abdominal cramping", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting ", "Severe decrease in blood pressure", "Collapse * ", "Difficulty breathing * ", "Hives *", "Itching", "Swelling and pain at site of sting "], "description": "See also: Bee sting", "Prevention": "Wear protective clothing whenever possible when travelling through terrain which is known to harbor bees, wasps or yellow jackets. Do not stick your hands in their nests."}, "Brucellosis": {"description": "Brucellosis is an infectious disease that occurs from contact with animals carrying Brucella bacteria.", "Possible Complications": "Bone and joint sores (lesions), Encephalitis, Infective endocarditis, Meningitis. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Back pain", "Chills", "Excessive sweating", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Headache", "Joint pain", "Loss of appetite", "Weakness", "Weight loss", "Muscle pain", "Swollen glands"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood culture, Bone marrow culture, Clean catch urine culture, CSF culture, Serology for brucellosis antigen, Biopsy and culture of specimen from affected organ. This disease may also change the results of the following tests:Febrile/cold agglutinins, Quantitative immunoglobulins (nephelometry), Serum immunoelectrophoresis. ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics are used to treat the infection and prevent it from coming back. Longer courses of therapy may be needed if there are complications.", "Prevention": "Drinking and eating only pasteurized milk and cheeses is the most important way to reduce the risk of brucellosis. People who handle meat should wear protective glasses and clothing and protect skin breaks from infection.Detecting infected animals controls the infection at its source. Vaccination is available for cattle, but not humans.", "Causes": "Brucella can infect cattle, goats, camels, dogs, and pigs. The bacteria can spread to humans if you come in contact with infected meat or the placenta of infected animals, or if you eat or drink unpasteurized milk or cheese.Brucellosis is rare in the United States. About 100 - 200 cases occur each year.People working in jobs where they often come in contact with animals or meat -- such as slaughterhouse workers, farmers, and veterinarians -- are at higher risk."}, "Benefits of quitting tobacco": {"description": "If you join smoking cessation programs, you have a much better chance of success. Such programs are offered by hospitals, health departments, community centers, and work sites. "}, "Binge eating disorder": {"description": "Binge eating is an eating disorder in which a person regularly eats unusually large amounts of food. During binge eating, the person also feels a loss of control and is not able to stop eating.", "Possible Complications": "With binge eating, a person often eats unhealthy foods that are high in sugar and fat and low in nutrients and protein. This can lead to health problems such as high cholesterol, type 2 diabetes, or gallbladder disease. Other possible health problems may include:Heart disease, High blood pressure, Joint pain, Menstrual problems . ", "Symptoms": ["Eats large amounts of food in a short period, for example, every 2 hours. ", "Is not able to control overeating, for example is unable to stop eating or control the amount of food.", "Eats food very fast each time.", "Keeps eating even when full (gorging) or until uncomfortably full.", "Eats even though not hungry.", "Eats alone (in secret).", "Feels guilty, disgusted, ashamed, or depressed after eating so much"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask about your eating patterns and symptoms.Blood tests may be done.", "Treatment": "The overall goals of treatment are to help you:Lessen and then be able to stop the bingeing incidents., Get to and stay at a healthy weight., Get treated for any emotional problems, including overcoming feelings and managing situations that trigger binge eating.. Eating disorders, such as binge eating, are often treated with psychological and nutrition counseling. Psychological counseling is also called talk therapy. It involves talking with a mental health provider, or therapist, who understands the problems of persons who binge eat. The therapist helps you recognize the feelings and thoughts that cause you to binge eat. Then the therapist teaches you how to change these into helpful thoughts and healthy actions.Nutrition counseling is also important for recovery. It helps you develop structured meal plans and healthy eating and weight management goals.The health care provider may prescribe antidepressants if you are anxious or depressed. Medicines to help with weight loss may also be prescribed.", "Causes": "The exact cause of binge eating is unknown. Things that may lead to this disorder include:Genes, such as having close relatives who also have an eating disorder, Changes in brain chemicals, Depression or other emotions, such as feeling upset or stressed, Unhealthy dieting, such as not eating enough nutritious food or skipping meals . In the U.S., binge eating is the most common eating disorder. More women than men have it. Women are affected as young adults while men are affected in middle age. "}, "Bunion removal - discharge ": {"description": "You had surgery to repair a bunion. The surgeon made an incision (cut) in your skin to expose the bones and joint of your big toe. Your surgeon then repaired your deformed toe. You may have screws, wires, or a plate holding your toe joint together."}, "Bowel incontinence": {"description": "Urinary incontinence is when you are not able to control passing urine. It is not covered in this article.", "Causes": "Reasons people have bowel incontinence include:Ongoing (chronic) constipation. This causes the anus muscles and intestines to stretch and weaken, leading to diarrhea and stool leakage., Fecal impaction. It is usually caused by chronic constipation. This leads to a lump of stool that partly blocks the large intestine., Long-term laxative use, Colectomy or bowel surgery, Not sensing that it's time to have a bowel movement, Emotional problems, Gynecological, prostate, or rectal surgery, Injury to the anal muscles due to childbirth (in women), Nerve or muscle damage (from injury, tumor, or radiation), Severe diarrhea that causes leakage, Severe hemorrhoids or rectal prolapse, Stress of being in\u00a0an unfamiliar environment . "}, "Breast reduction": {"description": "Breast reduction is surgery to reduce the size of the breasts."}, "Bone tumor": {"description": "A bone tumor is an abnormal growth of cells within a bone. A bone tumor may be cancerous (malignant) or noncancerous (benign).", "Possible Complications": "Pain, Reduced function, depending on the tumor, Side effects of chemotherapy, Spread of the cancer to other nearby tissues (metastasis) . ", "Symptoms": ["Bone fracture, especially fracture from slight injury (trauma)", "Bone pain, may be worse at night", "Occasionally a mass and swelling can be felt at the tumor site "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam. Tests that may be done include:Alkaline phosphatase blood level, Bone biopsy, Bone scan, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest, MRI of the bone and surrounding tissue, X-ray of bone and surrounding tissue . This disease may also affect the results of the following tests:Alkaline phosphatase isoenzyme, Blood calcium level, Parathyroid hormone, Blood phosphorus level . ", "Treatment": "Some benign bone tumors go away on their own and do not need treatment. Your doctor will closely monitor you. You will likely need regular imaging tests, such as x-rays, to see if the tumor shrinks or grows. Surgery may be needed to remove the tumor in some cases.Treatment for cancerous bone tumors that have spread from other parts of the body depends on where the cancer started. Radiation therapy may be given to prevent fractures or to relieve pain.Tumors that start in the bone are rare. After biopsy, a combination of chemotherapy and surgery is usually necessary. Radiation therapy may be needed before or after surgery.", "Causes": "The cause of bone tumors is unknown. They often occur in areas of the bone that grow rapidly. Possible causes include:Genetic defects passed down through families, Radiation, Injury . In most cases, no specific cause is found.Osteochondromas are the most common noncancerous (benign) bone tumors, and occur most often in people between the ages of 10 and 20.Cancers that start in the bones are referred to as primary bone tumors. Cancers that start in another part of the body (such as the breast, lungs, or colon) are called secondary or metastatic bone tumors. They behave very differently from primary bone tumors. Multiple myeloma often affects or involves the bone, but is not considered a primary bone tumor.Cancerous (malignant) bone tumors include:Chondrosarcoma, Ewing's sarcoma, Fibrosarcoma, Osteosarcomas. The cancers that most often spread to the bone are cancers of the:Breast, Kidney, Lung, Prostate, Thyroid . These forms of cancer usually affect older people.Bone cancer is more common in persons who have a family history of cancers."}, "Biliary stricture": {"description": "A biliary stricture is an abnormal narrowing of the common bile duct, the tube that moves bile from the liver to the small intestine. Bile is a substance that helps with digestion.", "Possible Complications": "Inflammation and narrowing of the biliary duct may return in some people. There is a risk for infection above the narrowed area. Strictures that remain for a long period can lead to liver damage (cirrhosis).", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain\r\n  on the upper right side of belly", "Chills", "Fever", "Itching", "Jaundice", "Nausea and vomiting", "Pale or clay-colored stools"], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests can help diagnose this condition:Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), Percutaneous transhepatic cholangiogram (PTC), Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP). The following blood tests can help reveal a problem with the biliary system.Alkaline phosphatase (ALP) is higher than normal., Bilirubin level is higher than normal.. This condition may also alter the results of the following tests:Amylase level, Lipase level, Urine bilirubin, Prothrombin time (PT). ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to correct the narrowing so bile can flow from the liver into the intestine.This may involve:Surgery, Endoscopic or percutaneous dilation . If surgery is done, the stricture is removed. The common bile duct will be rejoined with the small intestine.In some cases, a tiny metal or plastic mesh tube (stent) is placed across the bile duct stricture to keep it open. ", "Causes": "A biliary stricture is often caused by injury to the bile ducts during surgery. For example, it may occur after surgery to remove the gallbladder.Other causes of this condition include:Cancer of the bile duct, Damage and scarring due to a gallstone in the bile duct, Pancreatitis, Primary sclerosing cholangitis. Risk factors include: Gallstones, Injury to the intestines, Pancreatitis, Previous biliary surgery. "}, "Bedwetting": {"description": "Bedwetting, or nocturnal enuresis, is when a child wets the bed at night, more than twice a month, after age 5 or 6.", "Causes": "The last stage of toilet training is staying dry at night. To stay dry at night, your child's brain and bladder must work together so your child wakes up to go to the bathroom. Some children develop this ability later than others.Bedwetting is very common. Millions of children in the U.S. wet the bed at night. Some children still wet the bed at age 7, or even older. Although the problem usually goes away over time, many children, and even a small number of adults, continue to have bedwetting episodes.Bedwetting also runs in families. Parents who wet the bed as children are more likely to have children who wet the bed.There are 2 types of bedwetting.Primary enuresis -- children who have never been consistently dry at night. This usually occurs when the body makes more urine overnight than the bladder can hold, and the child does not wake up when the bladder is full. The child's brain has not learned to respond to the signal that the bladder is full. It is not the child's or the parent's fault. This is the most common reason for bedwetting., Secondary enuresis -- children who were dry for at least 6 months, but start bedwetting again. There are many reasons that children wet the bed after being fully toilet trained. It might be physical, emotional, or just a change in sleep. This is less common, but still not the fault of the child or parent. . While less common, physical causes of bedwetting may include:Lower spinal cord lesions, Birth defects of the genitourinary tract, Urinary tract infections, Diabetes . "}, "Brain tumor - primary - adults": {"description": "A primary brain tumor is a group (mass) of abnormal cells that start in the brain.", "Possible Complications": "Brain herniation (often fatal), Loss of ability to interact or function, Permanent, worsening, and severe loss of brain function, Return of tumor growth, Side effects of medications, including chemotherapy, Side effects of radiation treatments . ", "Symptoms": ["Changes in the person's mental function", "Headaches", "Seizures (especially in older adults)", "Weakness in one part of the body ", "Be worse when the person wakes up in the morning, and clear up in a few hours", "Occur during sleep", "Occur with vomiting, confusion, double vision, weakness, or numbness", "Get worse with coughing or exercise, or with a change in body position ", "Change in alertness (including sleepiness, unconsciousness, and coma)", "Changes in hearing, taste, or smell", "Changes that affect touch and the ability to feel pain, pressure, different temperatures, or other stimuli", "Confusion or memory loss", "Difficulty swallowing", "Difficulty writing or reading", "Dizziness or abnormal sensation of movement (vertigo)", "Eye problems such as eyelid drooping, pupils of different sizes, uncontrollable eye movement, vision difficulties (including decreased vision, double vision, or total loss of vision)", "Hand tremor", "Lack of control over the bladder or bowels", "Loss of balance or coordination, clumsiness, trouble walking", "Muscle weakness in the face, arm, or leg (usually on just one side)", "Numbness or tingling on one side of the body", "Personality, mood, behavior, or emotional changes", "Trouble speaking or understanding others who are speaking ", "Abnormal nipple discharge", "Absent menstruation (periods)", "Breast development in men", "Enlarged hands, feet", "Excessive body hair", "Facial changes", "Low blood pressure", "Obesity", "Sensitivity to heat or cold "], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests may confirm the presence of a brain tumor and\u00a0find its location:CT scan of the head, EEG, Examination of tissue removed from the tumor during surgery or CT-guided biopsy (may confirm the type of tumor), Examination of the cerebral spinal fluid (CSF) (may show cancerous cells), MRI of the head. ", "Treatment": "Treatment can involve surgery, radiation therapy, and chemotherapy. Brain tumors are best treated by a team that includes:Neuro-oncologist, Neurosurgeon, Medical oncologist, Radiation oncologist, Other health care providers, such as neurologists and social workers . Early treatment often improves the chance of a good outcome. Treatment depends on the size and type of tumor and your general health. Goals of treatment may be to cure the tumor, relieve symptoms, and improve brain function or comfort.Surgery is often needed for most primary brain tumors. Some tumors may be completely removed. Those that are deep inside the brain or that enter brain tissue may be debulked instead of removed. Debulking is a procedure to reduce the tumor's size.Tumors can be hard to remove completely by surgery alone. This is because the tumor invades surrounding brain tissue much like roots from a plant spread through soil. When the tumor cannot be removed, surgery may still help reduce pressure and relieve symptoms.Radiation therapy is used for certain tumors.Chemotherapy may be used with surgery or radiation treatment.Other medicines used to treat primary brain tumors in children may include:Medicines to reduce brain swelling and pressure, Anticonvulsants to reduce seizures, Pain medicines. Comfort measures, safety measures, physical therapy, and occupational therapy may be needed to improve quality of life. Counseling, support groups, and similar measures can help people cope with the disorder.You may consider enrolling in a clinical trial after talking with your treatment team.Legal advice may be helpful for creating advance directives such as a power of attorney.", "Causes": "Primary brain tumors include any tumor that starts in the brain. Primary brain tumors can\u00a0start from brain cells, the membranes around the brain (meninges), nerves, or glands.Tumors can directly destroy brain cells. They can also damage cells by producing inflammation, placing pressure on other parts of the brain, and increasing pressure within the skull.The cause of primary brain tumors is unknown. There are many risk factors that could play a role:Radiation therapy used to treat brain cancers increases the risk of brain tumors up to 20 or 30 years later., Some inherited conditions increase the risk of brain tumors, including neurofibromatosis, Von Hippel-Lindau syndrome, Li-Fraumeni syndrome, and Turcot syndrome., Lymphomas that begin in the brain in people with a weakened immune system are sometimes linked to infection by the Epstein-Barr virus., Exposure to radiation at work or to power lines, as well as head injuries, smoking, and hormone therapy have not been proven to be risk factors., Studies have found that cell phones, cordless phones, and wireless devices are safe and do not increase the risk. . SPECIFIC TUMOR TYPESBrain tumors are classified depending on: Location of the tumor, Type of tissue involved, Whether they are noncancerous (benign) or cancerous (malignant), Other factors . Sometimes, tumors that start out less aggressive can change their biologic behavior and become more aggressive.Tumors can occur at any age, but many types are most common in a certain age group. In adults, gliomas and meningiomas are the most common.Gliomas come from glial cells such as astrocytes, oligodendrocytes, and ependymal cells. Gliomas are divided into three types:Astrocytic tumors include astrocytomas (can be noncancerous), anaplastic astrocytomas, and glioblastomas., Oligodendroglial tumors. Some primary brain tumors are made up of both astrocytic and oligodendrocytic tumors. These are called mixed gliomas., Glioblastomas are the most aggressive type of primary brain tumor. . Meningiomas and schwannomas are two other types of brain tumors. These tumors:Occur most often between ages 40 and 70., Are usually noncancerous, but can still cause serious complications and death from their size or location. Some are cancerous and aggressive. . Other primary brain tumors in adults are rare. These include:Ependymomas, Craniopharyngiomas, Pituitary tumors, Primary (central nervous system - CNS) lymphoma, Pineal gland tumors, Primary germ cell tumors of the brain . "}, "Byssinosis ": {"description": "Byssinosis is a disease of the lungs brought on by breathing in cotton dust or dusts from other vegetable fibers such as flax, hemp, or sisal while at work.", "Possible Complications": "Chronic bronchitis may develop.", "Symptoms": ["Chest tightness", "Cough", "Wheezing"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will take a detailed medical history and ask you many questions to try to find out whether your symptoms relate to certain exposures or times of exposure. The health care provider will also do a physical exam, paying special attention to the lungs.Tests that may be ordered include:Chest x-ray, CT scan chest, Pulmonary function tests. ", "Treatment": "The most important treatment is to stop being exposed to the dust. Reducing dust levels in the factory (by improving machinery or ventilation) will help prevent byssinosis. Some people may have to change jobs to avoid further exposure.Medications used for asthma, such as bronchodilators, will usually improve symptoms. Corticosteroids may be prescribed in more severe cases.Stopping smoking is very important for people with this condition. Breathing treatments, including nebulizers, may be prescribed if the condition becomes long-term. Home oxygen therapy may be needed if blood oxygen level is\u00a0low.Physical exercise programs, breathing exercises, and patient education programs are often helpful for people with a chronic lung disease.", "Prevention": "Controlling dust, using face masks, and other measures can reduce the risk. Stop smoking, especially if you work in textile manufacturing.", "Causes": "Breathing in (inhaling) the dust produced by raw cotton can cause byssinosis. It is most common in people who work in the textile industry.Those who are sensitive to the dust can have an asthma-like condition after being exposed.Methods of prevention in the U.S. have reduced the number of cases. Byssinosis is still common in developing countries. Smoking increases the risk\u00a0of this disease. Being exposed to the dust many times can lead to chronic lung disease and shortness of breath or wheezing."}, "Being active when you have heart disease": {"description": "Always talk with your\u00a0health\u00a0care provider\u00a0before starting an exercise program. You need to make sure the exercise you would like to do is safe for you. This is especially important if:"}, "Breast self exam": {"description": "However, experts do not agree about the benefits of breast self-exams in finding breast cancer or saving lives. Talk to your health care provider about whether breast self-exams are right for you."}, "Bunion removal": {"description": "Bunion removal is surgery to treat deformed bones of the big toe and foot."}, "Bulimia": {"description": "Many people with bulimia also have anorexia nervosa.", "Possible Complications": "Bulimia can be dangerous. It may lead to serious medical complications over time. For example, vomiting over and over puts stomach acid in the esophagus (the tube from the mouth to the stomach). This can permanently damage this area.Possible complications include:Constipation, Dehydration, Dental cavities, Electrolyte imbalances, Hemorrhoids, Pancreatitis, Swelling of the throat, Tears of the esophagus from too much vomiting . ", "Symptoms": ["\r\n Forcing oneself to vomit\r\n ", "\r\n Excessive exercise\r\n ", "\r\n Using laxatives, enemas, or diuretics (water pills)\r\n ", "Compulsive exercise", "Suddenly eating large amounts of food or buying large amounts of food that disappear right away", "Regularly going to the bathroom right after meals", "Throwing away packages of laxatives, diet pills, emetics (drugs that cause vomiting), or diuretics "], "Exams and Tests": "A dental exam may show cavities or gum infections (such as gingivitis). The enamel of the teeth may be worn away or pitted because of too much exposure to the acid in vomit.A physical exam may also show:Broken blood vessels in the eyes (from the strain of vomiting), Dry mouth, Pouch-like look to the cheeks , Rashes and pimples, Small cuts and calluses across the tops of the finger joints from forcing oneself to vomit. Blood tests may show an electrolyte imbalance (such as hypokalemia) or dehydration.", "Treatment": "People with bulimia rarely have to go to the hospital, unless they:Have anorexia, Have major depression, Need drugs to help them stop purging . Most often, a stepped approach is used for patients with bulimia. Treatment depends on how severe the bulimia is, and the person's response to treatments:Support groups may be helpful for mild bulimia without other health problems., Cognitive-behavioral therapy (CBT) and nutritional therapy are the first treatments for bulimia that does not respond to support groups., Antidepressants known as selective serotonin-reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs) are often used for bulimia. A combination of CBT and SSRIs is very effective if CBT does not work alone. . Patients may drop out of programs if they have unrealistic hopes of being \"cured\" by therapy alone. Before a program begins, you should know that:You will probably need to try many different therapies to overcome this difficult disorder., It is common for bulimia to return (relapse), and this is no cause for despair., The process is painful, and you and your family will need to work hard. . ", "Causes": "Many more women than men have bulimia. The disorder is most common in adolescent girls and young women. The person usually knows that her eating pattern is abnormal and may feel fear or guilt with the binge-purge episodes.The exact cause of bulimia is unknown. Genetic, psychological, trauma, family, society, or cultural factors may play a role. Bulimia is likely due to more than one factor."}, "Bruise": {"Symptoms": [], "Prevention": "Because bruises are usually the direct result of an injury, the following are important safety recommendations:Teach children how to be safe.\r\n , Be mindful to avoid falls around the house. For example, be careful when climbing on ladders or other objects. Avoid standing or kneeling on counter tops.\r\n , Wear seat belts in motor vehicles.\r\n , Wear proper sports equipment to pad those areas most frequently bruised, such as thigh pads, hip guards, and elbow pads in football and hockey; shin guards and knee pads in soccer and basketball.. ", "description": "A bruise is an area of skin discoloration. A bruise occurs when small blood vessels break and leak their contents into the soft tissue beneath the skin.", "Causes": "Bruises are often caused by falls, sports injuries, car accidents, or blows received\u00a0from\u00a0other people or objects.If you take a blood thinner,\u00a0such as\u00a0aspirin or warfarin (Coumadin), you are likely to bruise more easily."}, "Brief psychotic disorder": {"description": "Brief psychotic disorder is a sudden, short-term display of psychotic behavior, such as hallucinations or delusions, which occurs with a stressful event.", "Possible Complications": "As with all psychotic illnesses, this condition can severely disrupt your life and possibly lead to violence and suicide.", "Symptoms": ["Disorganized behavior", "False ideas about what is taking place (delusions)", "Hearing or seeing things that aren't real (hallucinations)", "Strange speech or language "], "Exams and Tests": "A psychiatric evaluation can confirm the diagnosis. A physical exam and laboratory testing can rule out medical illness as the cause of the symptoms.", "Treatment": "By definition, psychotic symptoms go away on their own in less than 1 month. In some cases, brief psychotic disorder can be the beginning of a more chronic psychotic condition, such as schizophrenia or schizoaffective disorder. Antipsychotic drugs can help decrease or stop the psychotic symptoms.Talk therapy may also help you cope with the emotional stress that triggered the problem.", "Causes": "Brief psychotic disorder is triggered by extreme stress, such as a traumatic accident or loss of a loved one. It is followed by a return to the previous level of function. The person may or may not be aware of the strange behavior.This condition most often affects people in their 20s, 30s, and 40s. Those who have personality disorders are at high risk of having a brief reactive psychosis."}, "Bile": {"description": "Bile contains mostly cholesterol, bile acids (also called bile salts), and bilirubin\u00a0(a breakdown product of red blood cells). It also contains:"}, "Bassen-Kornzweig syndrome": {"description": "Bassen-Kornzweig syndrome is a rare disease passed down through families in which a person is unable to fully absorb dietary fats through the intestines.", "Possible Complications": "Blindness, Mental deterioration, Loss of function of peripheral nerves, uncoordinated movement (ataxia). ", "Symptoms": ["Balance and coordination difficulties", "Curvature of spine", "Decreased vision that gets worse over time", "Developmental delay", "Failure to thrive (grow) in infancy", "Muscle weakness", "Poor muscle coordination that usually develops after age 10", "Protruding abdomen", "Slurred speech", "Stool abnormalities, including fatty stools that appear pale in color, frothy stools, and abnormally foul-smelling stools"], "Exams and Tests": "There may be damage to the retina of the eye (retinitis pigmentosa).Tests that may be done to help diagnose this condition include:Apolipoprotein B blood test, Blood tests to look for vitamin deficiencies (fat-soluble vitamins A, D, E, and K), 'Burr-cell' malformation of the red cells (acanthocytosis), Complete blood count (CBC), Cholesterol studies, Electromyography, Eye exam, Nerve conduction velocity, Stool sample analysis . Genetic testing may be available for mutations in the MTP gene.", "Treatment": "Treatment involves large doses of vitamin supplements containing fat-soluble vitamins (vitamin A, vitamin D, vitamin E and vitamin K).Linoleic acid supplements are also recommended.People with this condition should talk to a nutritionist. Diet changes are needed to prevent stomach problems. This involves:Limiting fat intake to 5 - 20 grams per day., Do not eat more than 5 ounces daily of lean meat, fish, or poultry., Use skim milk instead of whole milk. . Supplements of medium-chain triglycerides are taken under the supervision of a doctor or nutritionist. They should be used with caution, because they may cause liver damage.", "Prevention": "High doses of fat-soluble vitamins may slow the progression of some problems, such as retina damage and decreased vision.", "Causes": "Bassen-Kornzweig syndrome is caused by a defect in a gene that tells the body to create lipoproteins (molecules of fat combined with protein). The defect makes it hard for the body to properly digest fat and essential vitamins.It is an autosomal recessive condition that more often affects males."}, "Breast biopsy - stereotactic": {"description": "A breast biopsy is the removal of breast tissue to examine it for signs of breast cancer or other disorders. Different types of biopsy may be done. One type called stereotactic breast biopsy uses mammography to help pinpoint the spot in the breast that needs to be removed."}, "Blood pressure monitors for home": {"description": "TIPS FOR MONITORING YOUR BLOOD PRESSURE"}, "Blood pressure measurement": {"description": "You can measure your blood pressure at home. You can also have it checked at your\u00a0health care provider's\u00a0office, a fire station, or with blood pressure machines in drug stores and other places. "}, "Buccal smear": {"description": "A buccal\u00a0 (pronounced \"buckle\") smear is the painless removal of a sample of cells from the inside of your mouth\u00a0(cheek) for study."}, "Basal cell carcinoma": {"description": "Other common types of skin cancer are:", "Possible Complications": "Basal cell skin cancer almost never spreads. But, left untreated, it may grow (spread) into surrounding areas and nearby tissues and bone. ", "Symptoms": ["Pearly or waxy", "White or light pink", "Flesh-colored or brown ", "A skin sore that bleeds easily", "A sore that does not heal", "Oozing or crusting spots in a sore", "A scar-like sore without having injured the area", "Irregular blood vessels in or around the spot", "A sore with a depressed (sunken) area in the middle "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will check your skin and look at the size, shape, color, and texture of any suspicious areas.If your doctor thinks you might have skin cancer, a piece of skin will be removed. This is called a skin biopsy. The sample is sent to a lab for examination under a microscope.A skin biopsy must be done to confirm basal cell skin cancer or other skin cancers.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the size, depth, and location of the skin cancer, and your overall health.Treatment may involve any of the following:Excision: Cutting out the skin cancer and stitching the skin together, Curettage and electrodessication: Scraping away cancer cells and using electricity to kill any that remain; used to treat cancers that are not large or deep, Cryosurgery: Freezing the cancer cells, which kills them; used to treat cancers that are not large or deep, Medication: Skin creams that have medicine; used to treat cancers that are not large or deep, Mohs surgery: Removing a layer of skin and looking at it immediately under a microscope, then removing layers of skin until there are no signs of the cancer; usually used for skin cancers on the nose, ears, and other areas of the face, Photodynamic therapy: Treatment using light; used to treat cancers that are not large or deep, Radiation: May be used if a basal cell cancer cannot be treated with surgery, Chemotherapy: May be used to treat basal cell cancer that has spread to other parts of the body or that cannot be treated with surgery . ", "Prevention": "The American Cancer Society recommends that a health care provider examine your skin every year if you are older than 40 and every 3 years if you are 20 to 40 years old. You should also examine your own skin once a month.The best way to prevent skin cancer is to reduce your exposure to sunlight. Always use sunscreen and learn how to protect yourself from the sun.", "Causes": "Basal cell cancer starts in the top layer of the skin called the epidermis. Most basal cell cancers occur on skin that is regularly exposed to sunlight or other ultraviolet radiation. This type of skin cancer is most common in people over age 40. But it can occur in younger people who have had extensive sun exposure. You are more likely to get basal cell cancer if you have:Light-colored or freckled skin, Blue, green, or grey eyes, Blond or red hair, Overexposure to x-rays or other forms of radiation, Many moles, Close relatives who have or had skin cancer, Many severe sunburns early in life, Long-term daily sun exposure (such as the sun exposure received by people who work outside). "}, "Bartholin cyst or abscess": {"Symptoms": ["A tender lump on either side of the vaginal opening \r\n", "Fever", "Pain with sexual intercourse "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a pelvic exam. The Bartholin gland will be enlarged and tender. A biopsy may be recommended in older women to look for a tumor, although this is very rare.Any vaginal discharge or fluid drainage will be sent to a lab for testing.", "description": "Bartholin abscess is the buildup of pus that forms a lump (swelling) in one of the Bartholin glands. These glands are found on each side of the vaginal opening.", "Causes": "A Bartholin abscess forms when a small opening (duct) from the gland gets blocked. Fluid in the gland builds up and may become infected. Fluid may build up over many years before an abscess occurs.Often the abscess appears quickly over several days. The area will become very hot and swollen. Activity that puts pressure on the vulva, and walking and sitting, may cause severe pain.", "Treatment": "SELF-CARE STEPSSoaking in warm water four times a day for several days can ease the discomfort. It can also help the abscess open and drain on its own. However, the opening is often very small and closes quickly. Therefore, the abscess often returns.DRAINAGE OF THE ABSCESSA small surgical cut can completely drain the abscess. This relieves symptoms and provides the fastest recovery. The procedure can be done under local anesthesia in a doctor's office., A catheter (tube) may be inserted and left in place for 4 - 6 weeks to continue to allow draining while the area heals., You should begin soaking in warm water 1 - 2 days afterward. You cannot have sexual intercourse until the catheter is removed. . Antibiotics may be prescribed if there is pus or other signs of infection.MARSUPIALIZATIONWomen can also be treated with a minor surgical procedure called marsupialization. The procedure involves creating a small, permanent opening to help the gland drain., The procedure can sometimes be done in the clinic with medicine to numb the area. In other cases it may need to be done in the hospital with general anesthesia so that you are asleep and pain-free., You should begin soaking in warm water 1 - 2 days afterward. You cannot have sexual intercourse for 4 weeks after surgery., You can use oral pain medicines after the procedure. Your doctor may prescribe narcotic pain medicines if you need them. . Your health care provider may recommend that the glands be completely removed if abscesses keep coming back."}, "Beriberi": {"description": "Beriberi is a disease in which the body does not have enough thiamine (vitamin B1).", "Possible Complications": "Coma, Congestive heart failure, Death, Psychosis. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty walking", "Loss of feeling (sensation) in hands and feet", "Loss of muscle function or paralysis of the lower legs", "Mental confusion/speech difficulties", "Pain", "Strange eye movements (nystagmus)", "Tingling", "Vomiting", "Awakening at night short of breath", "Increased heart rate", "Shortness of breath with activity", "Swelling of the lower legs"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination may show signs of congestive heart failure, including:Difficulty breathing with neck veins that stick out, Enlarged heart, Fluid in the lungs, Rapid heartbeat, Swelling in both lower legs. A person with late-stage beriberi may be confused or have memory loss and delusions. The person may be less able to sense vibrations.A neurological exam may show signs of:Changes in the walk, Coordination problems, Decreased reflexes, Drooping of the eyelids. The following tests may be done:Blood tests to measure the amount of thiamine in the blood, Urine tests to see if thiamine is passing through the urine. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to replace the thiamine your body is lacking. This is done with thiamine supplements. Thiamine supplements are given through a shot (injection) or taken by mouth.Other types of vitamins may also be recommended.Blood tests may be done after you are given thiamine supplements to see how well you are responding to the medicine.", "Prevention": "Eating a proper diet that is rich in thiamine and other vitamins will prevent beriberi. Nursing mothers should make sure that their diet contains all vitamins.\u00a0When infants are not\u00a0receiving breast milk, parents need to be\u00a0sure that their baby's infant formula contains thiamine.People who drink heavily should try to cut down or quit. They should take B vitamins to make sure their body is properly absorbing and storing thiamine.", "Causes": "There are two major types of beriberi:Wet beriberi affects the cardiovascular system., Dry beriberi and Wernicke-Korsakoff syndrome affect the nervous system.. Beriberi is rare in the United States because most foods are now vitamin enriched. If you eat a normal, healthy diet, you should get enough thiamine. Today, beriberi occurs mostly in patients who abuse alcohol. Drinking heavily can lead to poor nutrition. Excess alcohol makes it harder for the body to absorb and store thiamine.A rare condition known as genetic beriberi is inherited (passed down through families). People with genetic beriberi lose the ability to absorb thiamine from foods. This can happen slowly over time and symptoms occur when the person is an adult. However, because\u00a0health care providers\u00a0may not consider beriberi in nonalcoholics, this diagnosis is often missed.Beriberi can occur in breastfed infants when the mother's body is lacking in thiamine. The condition can also affect infants who are fed unusual formulas that don't have enough thiamine.Getting dialysis and taking high doses of diuretics raise your risk of beriberi."}, "Breathing difficulties - first aid": {"Symptoms": ["Bluish lips, fingers, and fingernails", "Chest moving in an unusual way as the person breathes (flail chest or paradoxical movement)", "Chest pain", "Confusion, lightheadedness, weakness, or sleepiness", "Cough", "Fever", "Gurgling, wheezing, or whistling sounds", "Muffled voice", "Need to sit up to breathe", "Swollen tongue "], "Prevention": "Some things you can do to help prevent breathing problems:Wear a medical alert tag if you have a pre-existing breathing condition, such as asthma., If you have a history of severe allergic reactions, carry an epinephrine pen and wear a medical alert tag. Your doctor will teach you how to use the epinephrine pen., If you have asthma or allergies, eliminate household allergy triggers like dust mites and mold., DO NOT smoke, and keep away from secondhand smoke. DO NOT allow smoking in your home., If you have asthma, see the article on asthma to learn ways to manage it., Make sure your child obtains the whooping cough (pertussis) vaccine., When traveling by airplane, get up and walk around once in every few hours to avoid forming blood clots in your legs. Clots can break off and lodge in your lungs. If traveling by car, stop and walk around regularly., Lose weight. You are more likely to feel winded if you are overweight. You are also at greater risk for heart disease and heart attack. . ", "description": "This article discusses first aid for someone who is having breathing problems.", "Causes": "There are many different causes for breathing problems. Common causes include:Anemia (low red blood cell count), Asthma \r\n\u00a0\u00a0, Being at a high altitude, Blood clot in the lung, Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), sometimes called emphysema or chronic bronchitis, Collapsed lung (Pneumothorax)\u00a0, Heart attack, Heart disease or heart failure, Injury to the neck, chest wall, or lungs, Life-threatening allergic reaction, Lung cancer or cancer which has moved to the lungs, Near drowning (fluid in the lungs), Pericardial effusion (fluid surrounding the heart and not allowing it to fill properly), Pleural effusion (fluid surrounding the lungs and compressing them), Respiratory infections, including pneumonia, acute bronchitis, whooping cough, croup, and others . "}, "Bathing a patient in bed ": {"description": "A bed bath is a good time to inspect a patient's skin for redness and sores. Pay special attention to skin folds and bony areas when checking."}, "Brain aneurysm repair - discharge": {"description": "You had surgery to prevent the aneurysm from bleeding or to treat the aneurysm after it bled. There are\u00a0two types of surgery:"}, "Bone lesion biopsy": {"description": "A bone lesion biopsy is the removal of a piece of bone or bone marrow for examination."}, "Bursitis": {"description": "Bursitis is the swelling and irritation of a bursa. A bursa is a fluid-filled sac that acts as a cushion between a muscles, tendons, and bones.", "Possible Complications": "\u00a0\u00a0", "Symptoms": ["Joint pain and tenderness when you press around the joint", "Stiffness and aching when you move the affected joint", "Swelling, warmth or redness over the joint"], "Causes": "Bursitis is often a result of overuse. It can be caused by a change in activity level, such as training for a marathon or by being overweight.Bursitis can also be caused by trauma, rheumatoid arthritis, gout, or infection. Sometimes the cause cannot be found.Bursitis commonly occurs in the shoulder, knee, elbow, and hip. Other areas that may be affected include the Achilles tendon and the foot.", "Prevention": "When possible, avoid activities that include repetitive movements of any body parts.", "Treatment": "\r\nYour doctor will talk to you about\u00a0a treatment plan\u00a0to help you resume your normal activity.Tips to relieve bursitis pain:Use ice 3\u00a0to 4 times a day for the first 2 or 3 days.\u00a0, Cover the painful area with a towel, and place the ice on it for 15 minutes. Do not fall asleep\u00a0while applying the ice. You can get frostbite if you leave it on too long., When sleeping, do not lie on the side that has bursitis.. For bursitis around the hips, knees, or ankle:Try not to stand for long periods. , Stand on a soft, cushioned surface, with equal weight on each leg., Placing a pillow between your knees when lying on your side can help decrease pain., Flat shoes that are cushioned and comfortable often help., If you are overweight, losing weight may also be helpful.. You should avoid activities that involve repetitive movements of any body part when possible.Other treatments include:Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs), such as ibuprofen, Physical therapy, Exercises you do at home to build strength and keep the joint mobile as pain goes away, Removing fluid from the bursa and getting a shot of corticosteroid. As the pain goes away, your doctor or nurse may suggest exercises to build strength and keep movement in the painful area.Surgery is rarely needed."}, "Blount's disease": {"description": "Blount's disease is a growth disorder of the shin bone (tibia) in which the lower leg turns inward, resembling a bowleg.", "Possible Complications": "Failure to treat Blount's disease may lead to progressive deformity. The condition may lead to differences in leg lengths, which can result in disability if not treated.Blount's disease may come back after surgery, especially in younger children.", "Symptoms": ["Look the same on both legs", "Occur just below the knee", "Rapidly get worse"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse examine you.\u00a0This will show that the lower legs turn inward. An x-ray of the knee and the lower leg confirms the diagnosis. ", "Treatment": "Braces are used to treat children who develop severe bowing before the age of 3. If braces do not work, or if the problem is not diagnosed until the child is older, surgery is usually needed. Surgery may involve cutting the shin bone to place it in the proper position, and sometimes lengthening it as well.Other times, surgery is done to restrict the growth of the outer half of the shin bone. This allows the child\u2019s natural growth to reverse the bowing process. This much smaller surgery works best in children with less severe symptoms who still have quite a bit of growing to do.", "Prevention": "Weight loss for overweight children may be helpful.", "Causes": "Blount's disease occurs in young children and adolescents. The cause is unknown. It is thought to be due to the effects of weight on the growth plate. The inner part of the shin bone, just below the knee, fails to develop normally.Unlike bowlegs, which tend to straighten as the child develops, Blount's disease slowly gets worse. It can cause severe bowing of one or both legs.This condition is more common among African-American children. It is also associated with obesity and early walking."}, "Becker muscular dystrophy": {"description": "Becker muscular dystrophy is an inherited disorder that involves slowly worsening muscle weakness of the legs and pelvis.", "Possible Complications": "Heart-related problems such as cardiomyopathy, Lung failure, Pneumonia or other respiratory infections, Increasing and permanent disability that leads to decreased ability to care for self, decreased mobility. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty walking that gets worse over time; by age 25-30, the person is usually unable to walk ", "Frequent falls", "Difficulty getting up from the floor and climbing stairs", "Difficulty with running, hopping, and jumping", "Loss of muscle mass", "Toe walking", "Muscle weakness in the arms, neck, and other areas is not as severe as in the lower body", "Breathing problems", "Cognitive problems (these do not get worse over time)", "Fatigue", "Loss of balance and coordination"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a nervous system (neurological) and muscle examination. A careful medical history is also important, because symptoms are similar to those of\u00a0 Duchenne muscular dystrophy. However, Becker muscular dystrophy gets worse much more slowly.An exam may find:Abnormally developed bones, leading to deformities of the chest and back (scoliosis), Abnormal heart muscle function (cardiomyopathy), Congestive heart failure or irregular heartbeat (arrhythmia) - rare, Muscle deformities, including contractures of heels and legs, abnormal fat and connective tissue in calf muscles\r\n , Muscle loss that begins in the legs and pelvis, then moves to the muscles of the shoulders, neck, arms, and respiratory system . Tests that may be done include:CPK blood test, Electromyography (EMG) nerve testing, Muscle biopsy or genetic blood test . ", "Treatment": "There is no known cure for Becker muscular dystrophy. The goal of treatment is to control symptoms to maximize the person's quality of life. Some doctors prescribe steroids to help keep a patient walking for as long as possible.Activity is encouraged. Inactivity (such as bed rest) can make the muscle disease worse. Physical therapy may be helpful to maintain muscle strength. Orthopedic appliances such as braces and wheelchairs may improve movement and self-care.Genetic counseling may be recommended. Daughters of a man with Becker muscular dystrophy may carry the defective gene and could pass it on to their sons.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be advised if there is a family history of Becker muscular dystrophy.", "Causes": "Becker muscular dystrophy is very similar to Duchenne muscular dystrophy, except that it gets worse at a much slower rate and it is less common.The disorder is passed down through families (inherited). Having a family history of the condition raises your risk.Becker muscular dystrophy occurs in about 3\u00a0to 6 out of every 100,000 births. The disease is found mostly in boys."}, "Bathroom safety - adults": {"description": "Older adult bathroom safety"}, "Breastfeeding - self-care": {"description": "\r\n\r\n \r\nAs a breastfeeding mother, know how to take care of yourself. Keeping yourself well is the best thing for breastfeeding your baby. Here are some tips about taking care of yourself.\r\n"}, "Blood smear": {"description": "A blood smear is a blood test that gives information about the number and shape of blood cells."}, "Bronchiolitis": {"description": "Bronchiolitis is swelling and mucus buildup in the smallest air passages in the lungs (bronchioles). It is usually due to a viral infection.", "Symptoms": ["Bluish skin due to lack of oxygen (cyanosis) - emergency treatment is needed", "Breathing difficulty including wheezing and shortness of breath", "Cough", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Muscles around the ribs sink in as the child tries to breathe in (called intercostal retractions)", "Infant's nostrils get wide when breathing", "Rapid breathing (tachypnea)"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and listen to the lungs. This may reveal:Wheezing and crackling sounds heard through the stethoscope. Tests that may be done include:Blood gases, Chest x-ray, Culture of a sample of nasal fluid to determine the virus causing the disease. ", "Causes": "Bronchiolitis usually affects children under the age of 2, with a peak age of 3 to 6 months. It is a common, and sometimes severe illness. Respiratory syncytial virus (RSV) is the most common cause. More than half of all infants are exposed to this virus by their first birthday.Other viruses that can cause bronchiolitis include:Adenovirus, Influenza, Parainfluenza. The virus is spread to infants by coming into direct contact with nose and throat fluids of someone who has the illness. This can happen when another child or an adult who has a virus:Sneezes or coughs nearby and tiny droplets in the air are then breathed in by the infant, Touches toys or other objects that are then touched by the infant. Bronchiolitis occurs more often in the fall and winter than other times of the year. It is a very common reason for infants to be hospitalized during winter and early spring.Risk factors\u00a0of bronchiolitis include:Being around cigarette smoke, Being younger than 6 months old, Living in crowded conditions, Not being breastfed, Being born before 37 weeks of pregnancy. ", "Prevention": "Most cases of bronchiolitis cannot be prevented because the viruses that cause the infection are common in the environment. Careful hand washing, especially around infants, can help prevent the spread of viruses.A medicine called palivizumab (Synagis) that boosts the immune system may be recommended for certain children. Your child's doctor will let you know if this\u00a0 medicine is right for your child.", "Treatment": "The main focus of treatment is to relieve symptoms, such as difficulty breathing and wheezing.Antibiotics do not work against viral infections. Medicines that treat viruses may be used to treat very ill children. At home, measures to relieve symptoms\u00a0can be used. Have your child:Drink plenty of fluids. Breast milk or formula\u00a0 is okay for children younger than 12 months. Electrolyte drinks, such as Pedialyte, are also okay for infants., Breathe moist (wet) air to help loosen sticky mucus. Use a humidifier to moisten the air., Get plenty of rest.. Do not allow anyone to smoke in the house, car, or anywhere near your child. Children who are having trouble breathing may stay in the hospital. Treatment there may need oxygen therapy and fluids given through a vein (IV)."}, "Bladder biopsy": {"description": "Bladder biopsy is a procedure that involves removing a small piece of tissue from the bladder. The tissue is examined under a microscope."}, "Blood donation before surgery": {"description": "Several sources of blood are described here."}, "Butazolidin overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Swelling of lower legs, ankles, or feet ", "Blood in urine ", "Decreased amount of urine", "Kidney failure, absence of urine ", "Blurred vision ", "Ringing in the ears", "Low blood pressure ", "Agitation", "Coma", "Confusion ", "Convulsions ", "Dizziness ", "Drowsiness ", "Incoherence (not understandable) ", "Severe headache", "Unsteadiness", "Blisters", "Rash", "Diarrhea", "Heartburn ", "Nausea and vomiting (possibly with blood)", "Stomach pain"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof bottles and out of the reach of children."}, "Brain PET scan ": {"description": "A\u00a0PET scan shows how the brain and its tissues are working.\u00a0Other imaging tests, such as\u00a0magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and computed tomography (CT) scans only\u00a0reveal the structure of the brain."}, "Beta blockers overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing trouble (shortness of breath, gasping)", "No breathing", "Wheezing (in people who have asthma)", "Blurred vision", "Double vision", "Irregular heartbeat", "Lightheadedness", "Low blood pressure", "Heartbeat - rapid or slow", "Heart failure", "Shock", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness or unresponsiveness)", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Drowsiness", "Excessive sweating", "Fever", "Nervousness", "Weakness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Breast ultrasound": {"description": "Breast ultrasound is a test that uses sound waves to examine the breasts."}, "Birth control pills - progestin only": {"description": "Progestin-only pills work by making your mucus too thick for the sperm to move through. "}, "Bronchiectasis": {"description": "Bronchiectasis is a disease in which the large airways in the lungs are damaged. As a result of this damage, the airways become wider.", "Possible Complications": "Cor pulmonale, Coughing up blood, Low oxygen levels (in severe cases), Recurrent pneumonia. ", "Symptoms": ["Bluish skin color", "Breath odor", "Chronic cough with large amounts of foul-smelling sputum", "Clubbing of fingers", "Coughing up blood", "Cough that gets worse when lying on one side", "Fatigue", "Paleness", "Shortness of breath that gets worse with exercise", "Weight loss", "Wheezing"], "Exams and Tests": "When listening to the chest with a stethoscope, the doctor may hear small clicking, bubbling, wheezing, rattling, or other sounds, usually in the lower lungs.Tests may include:Aspergillosis precipitin test (to check for signs of an allergic reaction to fungus), Alpha-1 antitrypsin blood test, Chest x-ray, Chest CT, Sputum culture, Complete blood count (CBC), Genetic testing, including sweat test for cystic fibrosis, PPD skin test to check for a past tuberculosis infection, Serum immunoglobulin electrophoresis. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is aimed at controlling infections and sputum, relieving airway obstruction, and preventing complications.Daily drainage to remove sputum is part of treatment. A respiratory therapist can show the patient coughing exercises that will help.Medicines are often prescribed. These include antibiotics, bronchodilators, and expectorants.Surgery to remove (resect) the lung may be needed if medicine does not work and the disease is in a small area, or if the patient has a lot of bleeding in the lungs.", "Prevention": "You can reduce your risk by promptly treating lung infections.Childhood vaccines and a yearly flu vaccine help reduce the chance of some infections. Avoiding upper respiratory infections, smoking, and pollution may also reduce your risk of getting this infection.", "Causes": "Bronchiectasis is often caused by inflammation or infection of the airways that keeps coming back. Sometimes it begins in childhood after having a severe lung\u00a0infection or inhaling a foreign object.Cystic fibrosis causes about a third of all bronchiectasis cases in the United States. Certain genetic conditions can also cause bronchiectasis. These conditions include primary ciliary dyskinesia and immunodeficiency syndromes.The condition can also occur when people often breathe in food particles while eating."}, "Bland diet": {"description": "Your doctor or nurse will tell you when you can start eating other foods again. It is still important to eat healthy foods when you add foods back in. Your doctor can refer you to a dietitian or nutritionist to help you plan a healthy diet."}, "Bili lights": {"description": "Bili lights\u00a0are a type of light therapy (phototherapy) that is used to treat newborn jaundice. Jaundice is a yellow coloring of the skin and eyes. It is caused by too much of a yellow substance called bilirubin. Bilirubin is created when the body replaces old red blood cells with new ones. "}, "Brain surgery": {"description": "Brain surgery is an operation\u00a0to treat problems in the brain and surrounding structures."}, "Breast lump": {"description": "Breast lumps in both men and women raise concern for breast cancer, even though most lumps are not cancer. \r\n", "Causes": "Lumps in a woman are often caused by fibrocystic changes, fibroadenomas, and cysts.Fibrocystic changes are painful, lumpy breasts. Fibrocystic breast changes do not increase your risk of breast cancer. Symptoms are usually worse right before your menstrual period, and then improve after your period starts. Fibroadenomas are noncancerous lumps that feel rubbery. They move easily inside the breast tissue. Like fibrocystic changes, they occur most often during the reproductive years. Usually, they are not tender. Except in rare cases, they do not become cancerous later. A doctor can feel during an exam whether a lump is a fibroadenoma. The only way to be sure, however, is to remove or biopsy the lump.Cysts are fluid-filled sacs that often feel like soft grapes. These can sometimes be tender, often just before your menstrual period. Other causes of breast lumps include:Breast cancer, Injury. Blood may collect and feel like a lump if your breast gets badly bruised. These lumps tend to get better on their own in a few days or weeks. If they do not improve, your doctor may have to drain the blood., Lipoma. This is a collection of fatty tissue., Milk cysts (sacs filled with milk) and infections (mastitis), which may turn into an abscess. These typically occur if you are breastfeeding or have recently given birth. . "}, "Basal ganglia dysfunction": {"Symptoms": ["Movement changes, such as involuntary or slowed movements", "Increased muscle tone", "Muscle spasms and muscle rigidity", "Problems finding words", "Tremor", "Uncontrollable, repeated movements, speech, or cries (tics)", "Walking difficulty"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you and ask questions about your symptoms and medical history. Blood and imaging tests may be needed. These may include:CT and MRI of the head, Genetic testing, Magnetic resonance angiography to look at the blood vessels in the neck and brain, Positron emission tomography (PET) to look at the metabolism of the brain, Blood tests to check blood sugar, thyroid function, liver function, and iron and copper levels . ", "description": "Basal ganglia dysfunction is a problem with the deep brain structures that help start and control movement.", "Causes": "Watch this video about:Athetosis resulting from basal ganglia injuryConditions that cause injury to the brain can damage the basal ganglia. Such conditions include:Carbon monoxide poisoning, Drug overdose, Head injury, Infection, Liver disease, Metabolic problems, Multiple sclerosis, Poisoning with copper, manganese, or other heavy metals, Side effects of certain medications, Stroke, Tumors. Many brain disorders are associated with basal ganglia dysfunction. They include:Dystonia, Huntington disease, Multiple system atrophy, Parkinson's disease, Progressive supranuclear palsy, Wilson's disease. This list may not be all-inclusive.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of the disorder."}, "Breast enlargement in males": {"description": "Gynecomastia is the growth of abnormally large breasts in males. It is due to the excess growth of breast tissue, not excess fat tissue.", "Causes": "Normal hormone changes are the most common cause of breast development in newborns, boys, and men. There are other causes as well.HORMONE CHANGESBreast enlargement is usually caused by an imbalance of estrogen (female hormone) and testosterone (male hormone). Males have both types of hormones in their body. Changes in the levels of these hormones, or in how the body uses or responds to these hormones can cause enlarged breasts in males.In newborns, breast growth is caused by being exposed to estrogen from the mother. About half of boy babies are born with enlarged breasts, called breast buds. They usually go away in 2 to 6 months, but can last longer.In preteens and teens, breast growth is caused by normal hormone changes that occur in puberty. More than half of boys develop breasts during puberty. Breast growth often goes away in about 6 months to 2 years.In men, hormone changes due to aging can cause breast growth. This may occur more often in overweight men and in men age 50 and older.HEALTH CONDITIONSCertain health problems can cause breast growth in adult men, including:Chronic liver disease, Kidney failure and dialysis, Low testosterone levels. Rare causes include:Genetic defects, Overactive thyroid, Tumors. MEDICINES AND MEDICAL TREATMENTSome medicines and treatments that can cause breast growth in men include:Cancer chemotherapy, Hormone treatment for prostate cancer, such as flutamide (Proscar), or for enlarged prostate, such as finasteride (Propecia), Radiation treatment of the testicles, HIV medicines, Anabolic steroids, Heartburn and ulcer medicines, such as cimetidine (Tagamet) or proton pump inhibitors, Anti-anxiety medicines, such as diazepam (Valium), Heart medicines, such as spironolactone (Aldactone), digoxin (Lanoxin), amiodarone, and calcium channel blockers, Antifungal medicines, such as ketoconazole (Nizoral), Antibiotics such as metronidazole (Flagyl), Tricyclic antidepressants such as amitriptyline (Elavil), Herbals such as lavender, tea tree oil, and dong quai. DRUG AND ALCOHOL USEUsing certain substances can cause breast enlargement:Alcohol, Amphetamines, Heroin, Marijuana, Methadone. Breast cancer in men is rare. Signs that may suggest breast cancer include:One-sided breast growth, Firm or hard breast lump that feels like it is attached to the tissue, Skin sore over the breast, Bloody discharge from the nipple. "}, "Bell's palsy": {"description": "Damage to this nerve causes weakness or paralysis of these muscles. Paralysis means that you cannot use the muscles at all.", "Possible Complications": "The eye surface may become dry, leading to eye sores, infections, and vision loss.", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty closing one eye", "Difficulty eating and drinking; food falls out of one side of the mouth", "Drooling due to lack of control over the muscles of the face", "Drooping of the face, such as the eyelid or corner of the mouth", "Problems smiling, grimacing, or making facial expressions", "Twitching or weakness of the muscles in the face ", "Dry eye, which may lead to eye sores or infections", "Dry mouth", "Headache", "Loss of sense of taste", "Sound that is louder in one ear (hyperacusis)", "Twitching in face "], "Exams and Tests": "Often, Bell's palsy can be diagnosed just by taking a health history and doing a complete physical exam.Blood tests will be done to look for medical problems such as Lyme disease, which may cause Bell\u2019s palsy. If your health care provider is worried that a brain tumor is causing your symptoms, you may need:CT scan of the head, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the head. Sometimes, you will need a test to check the nerves that supply the muscles of your face:Electromyography (EMG), Nerve conduction test . ", "Treatment": "Often, no treatment is needed. Symptoms often begin to improve right away. However, it may take weeks or even months for the muscles to get stronger, and this may be frustrating.Your health care provider may give you lubricating eye drops or eye ointments to keep the surface of the eye moist if you cannot close it completely. You may need to wear an eye patch while you sleep.Sometimes medicines may be used, but it is not clear how much they help. If medicines are used, they should be started right away.Corticosteroids may reduce swelling around the facial nerve, Medications can fight the virus that may be causing Bell's palsy . Surgery to relieve pressure on the nerve (decompression surgery) has not been shown to benefit most people with Bell's palsy.If you have problems closing your eye, you need to protect it from injury. Ask your doctor\u00a0for tips.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent Bell's palsy.", "Causes": "Bell's palsy affects about 30,000\u00a0to 40,000 people a year in the United States.It\u00a0involves damage to the seventh cranial (facial) nerve. This nerve controls the movement of the muscles of the face.Bell's palsy is thought to be due to swelling (inflammation) of this nerve in the area where it travels through the bones of the skull.The cause is often not clear. A type of herpes infection called herpes zoster might be involved. Other conditions that may cause Bell's palsy include:HIV infection, Lyme disease, Middle ear infection, Sarcoidosis\u00a0 . Having diabetes and being pregnant may increase the risk of Bell's palsy."}, "Bleeding": {"Symptoms": ["Blood coming from an open wound", "Bruising", "Shock, which may cause any of the following symptoms: \r\n\r\nConfusion or decreasing alertness, Clammy skin, Dizziness or light-headedness after an injury, Low blood pressure, Paleness (pallor), Rapid pulse, increased heart rate, Shortness of breath, Weakness. ", "Confusion or decreasing alertness", "Clammy skin", "Dizziness or light-headedness after an injury", "Low blood pressure", "Paleness (pallor)", "Rapid pulse, increased heart rate", "Shortness of breath", "Weakness", "Abdominal pain and swelling", "Chest pain", "External bleeding through a natural opening \r\n\r\nBlood in the stool (appears black, maroon, or bright red), Blood in the urine (appears red, pink, or tea-colored), Blood in the vomit (looks bright red, or brown like coffee-grounds), Vaginal bleeding (heavier than usual or after menopause). ", "Blood in the stool (appears black, maroon, or bright red)", "Blood in the urine (appears red, pink, or tea-colored)", "Blood in the vomit (looks bright red, or brown like coffee-grounds)", "Vaginal bleeding (heavier than usual or after menopause)", "Skin color changes that occur several days after an injury (skin may black, blue, purple, yellowish green) "], "Prevention": "Use good judgment and keep knives and sharp objects away from small children.Stay up-to-date on vaccinations, especially the tetanus immunization.", "description": "Bleeding may occur:", "Causes": "Bleeding can be caused by injuries or may be spontaneous. Spontaneous bleeding is most commonly caused by problems with the joints, or\u00a0gastrointestinal or urogenital tracts."}, "Barbiturate intoxication and overdose": {"description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Possible Complications": "Complications can include:Coma, Death, Head injury and concussion from falls when intoxicated, Miscarriage in pregnant women or damage to the developing baby in the womb, Neck and spinal injury and paralysis from falls when intoxicated, Pneumonia from depressed gag reflex and aspiration (fluid or food down the bronchial tubes into the lungs), Severe muscle damage (rhabdomyolysis) from lying on a hard surface while unconscious, which may lead to permanent kidney injury. ", "Symptoms": ["Altered level of consciousness", "Difficulty in thinking", "Drowsiness or coma", "Faulty judgment", "Incoordination", "Shallow breathing", "Slowness of speech", "Sluggishness", "Slurred speech", "Staggering ", "Changes in alertness", "Decreased functioning", "Irritability", "Memory loss "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will measure and monitor the patient's vital signs, including temperature, pulse, breathing rate, and blood pressure. Blood and urine tests will be done to screen for legal and illegal drugs. ", "Treatment": "Most overdoses of this type of medication involve a mixture of drugs, usually alcohol and barbiturates, or barbiturates and opiates (heroin or Oxycontin).Some users use a combination of all four drugs. Those who take such combinations tend to be:New users who do not know that such combinations can lead to coma or death, Experienced users who intentionally use them to alter consciousness. The second group is among the most difficult to treat.The patient may receive a medicine called naloxone (Narcan), if an opiate was part of the mix. This medicine will often rapidly restore consciousness and breathing.There is no direct antidote for this type of overdose. Breathing support, such as a breathing machine, may be needed until all the drug is removed from the body. ", "Causes": "Barbiturate abuse is a major addiction problem for many people. Most people who take these medications for seizure disorders or pain syndromes do not abuse them. However, those who become addicts usually start by abusing medication prescribed for them or other family members."}, "Benign positional vertigo - aftercare": {"description": "You may have seen your doctor because you've had benign positional vertigo. It is also called benign paroxysmal positional vertigo, or BPPV. BPPV is the most common cause of vertigo and the easiest to treat."}, "Blood culture": {"description": "A blood culture is a laboratory test to check for bacteria or other microorganisms in a blood sample. Most cultures check for bacteria."}, "Bilirubin - blood": {"description": "Bilirubin\u00a0may also be measured with a\u00a0urine test. \r\n "}, "Bladder exstrophy repair": {"description": "Bladder exstrophy repair is surgery to repair a birth defect of the bladder. The bladder is inside out and sticks out of the abdominal wall. The pelvic bones are also separated."}, "Burkitt lymphoma": {"description": "Burkitt lymphoma is a very fast growing form of non-Hodgkin lymphoma.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of treatment, Spread of the cancer . ", "Symptoms": ["Fever ", "Night sweats", "Unexplained swollen lymph nodes", "Unexplained weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Bone marrow biopsy, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest, abdomen, and pelvis, Complete blood count (CBC), Examination of the spinal fluid, Lymph node biopsy, PET scan. ", "Treatment": "Chemotherapy is used to treat this type of cancer. If the cancer does not respond to chemotherapy alone, a\u00a0bone marrow transplant may be done.", "Causes": "Burkitt lymphoma was first discovered in children in certain parts of Africa, but it also occurs in the United States.The African type of Burkitt lymphoma is closely associated with the Epstein-Barr virus (EBV), the main cause of infectious mononucleosis. The North American form of Burkitt lymphoma is not linked to EBV. People with HIV have an increased risk for this condition. Burkitt lymphoma is most often seen in males."}, "Bed rest during pregnancy": {"description": "Bed rest means you will need to quickly adjust to doing things differently. You will need to find ways to pass the time and ask for help with all of the things that you normally do.\r\n"}, "Brompheniramine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Inability to urinate", "Difficulty urinating", "Blurred vision", "Dilated pupils", "Dry mouth", "Ringing in the ears ", "Rapid heartbeat", "Increased blood pressure", "Agitation", "Coma", "Convulsions", "Delirium", "Disorientation", "Drowsiness", "Fever", "Hallucinations", "Nervousness", "Tremor", "Unsteadiness", "Weakness", "Flushed skin", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof bottles and out of the reach of children."}, "Breast radiation - discharge": {"description": "You may notice changes in the way your breast looks or feels (if you are getting radiation after a lumpectomy). These changes include:"}, "Bleeding into the skin": {"description": "Bleeding under the skin can occur from broken blood vessels that form tiny pinpoint red dots (called petechiae). Blood also can collect under the tissue in larger flat areas (called purpura), or in a very large bruised area (called an ecchymosis).", "Causes": "Injury or trauma, Allergic reaction, Autoimmune disorders, Viral infection or illness affecting blood coagulation, Thrombocytopenia, Medical treatment, including radiation and chemotherapy, Antiplatelet medications such as clopidogrel (Plavix), Bruise (ecchymosis), Birth (petechiae in the newborn), Aging skin (ecchymosis), Idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura (petechiae and purpura), Henoch-Schonlein purpura (purpura), Leukemia (purpura and ecchymosis), Medicines: Anticoagulants such as warfarin or heparin (ecchymosis), aspirin (ecchymosis), steroids (ecchymosis), Septicemia (petechiae, purpura, ecchymosis). "}, "Bleeding time": {"description": "Bleeding time is a blood test that looks at how fast small blood vessels in the skin close to stop you from bleeding."}, "Bed wetting at home": {"description": "Parents and caregivers need to use a positive approach in helping a child who wets the bed at night."}, "Baking powder overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Thirst", "Abdominal pain", "Nausea", "Vomiting (severe)", "Diarrhea (severe)"], "description": "See also: Baking soda overdose"}, "Bacterial vaginosis - aftercare": {"Symptoms": ["White or gray vaginal discharge that smells fishy or unpleasant", "Burning when you urinate", "Itching inside and outside the vagina "], "description": "No one knows exactly what causes this to occur. BV is a common problem that can affect women and girls of all ages."}, "Bloodborne pathogens ": {"description": "Bloodborne infections"}, "Brain natriutetic peptide test": {"description": "Brain natriutetic peptide (BNP) test is a blood test that measures levels of a protein made by your heart and blood vessels. This protein is called BNP. BNP levels are higher than normal when you have heart failure."}, "Blackheads": {"description": "Related conditions include:"}, "Breathing difficulty - lying down": {"description": "A type of breathing difficulty while lying down is paroxysmal nocturnal dyspnea. This condition causes a person to wake up suddenly during the night feeling short of breath.", "Causes": "Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), Cor pulmonale, Heart failure, Obesity (does not directly cause difficulty breathing while lying down but often aggravates other conditions that lead to it), Panic disorder, Sleep apnea, Snoring. "}, "Broken kneecap - aftercare": {"description": "Sometimes when a kneecap break occurs, the patellar or quadriceps tendon can also tear. The patella and quadriceps tendon connects the big muscle in the front of your thigh to your knee joint.\r\n"}, "Bladder cancer": {"description": "Bladder cancer is a cancer that starts in the bladder. The bladder is the body part that holds and releases urine. It is in the center of the lower abdomen.", "Possible Complications": "Bladder cancers may spread into the nearby organs. They may also travel through the pelvic lymph nodes and spread to the liver, lungs, and bones. Additional complications of bladder cancer include:Anemia, Swelling of the ureters (hydronephrosis), Urethral stricture, Urinary incontinence . ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Blood in the urine", "Bone pain or tenderness if the cancer spreads to the bone\r\n  ", "\r\n  Fatigue\r\n  ", "Painful urination", "Urinary frequency", "Urinary urgency", "Urine leakage (incontinence)", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical examination, including a rectal and pelvic exam.Tests that may be done include:Abdominal CT scan, \r\n  Abdominal MRI scan\r\n  , Bladder biopsy (usually performed during cystoscopy)\r\n  , Cystoscopy (examining the inside of the bladder with a camera)\r\n  , Intravenous pyelogram - IVP, \r\n  Pelvic CT scan\r\n  , Urinalysis, Urine cytology. If tests confirm you have bladder cancer, additional tests will be done to see if the cancer has spread. This is called staging. Staging helps guide future treatment and follow-up and gives you some idea of what to expect in the future.The TNM (tumor, nodes, metastatis) staging system is used to stage bladder cancer:Ta: The cancer is in the lining of the bladder only and has not spread, T1: The cancer goes through the bladder lining, but does not reach the bladder muscle, T2: The cancer spreads to the bladder muscle, T3: The cancer spreads past the bladder into the fatty tissue surrounding it, T4: The cancer has spread to nearby structures such as the prostate gland, uterus, vagina, rectum, abdominal wall, or pelvic wall . Tumors are also grouped based on how they appear under a microscope. This is called grading the tumor. A high-grade tumor is fast growing and more likely to spread. Bladder cancer can spread into nearby areas, including the:\r\n  Lymph nodes in the pelvis\r\n  , \r\n  Bones\r\n  , \r\n  Liver\r\n  , \r\n  Lungs\r\n  . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the stage of the cancer, the severity of your symptoms, and your overall health.Stage 0 and I treatments:\r\n  Surgery to remove the tumor without removing the rest of the bladder\r\n  , Chemotherapy or immunotherapy placed directly into the bladder\r\n  . Stage II and III treatments:\r\n  Surgery to remove the entire bladder (radical cystectomy) and nearby lymph nodes\r\n  , \r\n  Surgery to remove only part of the bladder, followed by radiation and chemotherapy\r\n  , \r\n  Chemotherapy to shrink the tumor before surgery\r\n  , \r\n  A combination of chemotherapy and radiation (in patients who choose not to have surgery or who cannot have surgery)\r\n  . Most patients with stage IV tumors cannot be cured and surgery is not appropriate. In these patients, chemotherapy is often considered.CHEMOTHERAPYChemotherapy may be given to patients with stage II and III disease either before or after surgery to help prevent the tumor from returning.For early disease (stages 0 and I), chemotherapy is usually given directly into the bladder.A Foley catheter can be used to deliver the medication into the bladder. Common side effects include bladder wall irritation and pain when urinating. For more advanced stages (II-IV), chemotherapy is usually given by vein (intravenously).IMMUNOTHERAPYBladder cancers are often treated with immunotherapy. In this treatment, a medication triggers your immune system to attack and kill the cancer cells. Immunotherapy for bladder cancer is usually performed using the Bacille Calmette-Guerin vaccine (commonly known as BCG). A medicine called interferon is sometimes used. It is given through a Foley catheter directly into the bladder. If BCG does not work, patients may receive interferon.As with all treatments, side effects are possible. Ask your doctor what side effects you might expect, and what to do if they occur.SURGERYSurgery for bladder cancer includes:Transurethral resection of the bladder (TURB): Cancerous bladder tissue is removed through the urethra., Partial or complete removal of the bladder: Many people with stage II or III bladder cancer may need to have their bladder removed (radical cystectomy). Sometimes only part of the bladder is removed. Radiation and chemotherapy is usually given after this surgery. . Surgery may also be done to help your body drain urine after the bladder is removed. This may include:Ileal conduit: A small urine reservoir is surgically created from a short piece of your small intestine. The ureters that drain urine from the kidneys are attached to one end of this piece. The other end is brought out through an opening in the skin (a stoma). The stoma allows the patient to drain the collected urine out of the reservoir., Continent urinary reservoir: A pouch to collect urine is created inside your body using a piece of your intestine. You will need to insert a tube into an opening in your skin (stoma) into this pouch to drain the urine., Orthotopic neobladder: This surgery is becoming more common in patients who had their bladder removed. A part of your bowel is folded over to make a pouch that collects urine. It is attached to the place in the body where the urine normally empties from the bladder. This procedure allows you to maintain some normal urinary control. . ", "Prevention": "If you smoke, quit. Smoking can increase your risk of bladder cancer. Avoid exposure to chemicals linked to bladder cancer.", "Causes": "In the United States, bladder cancer usually starts from the cells lining the bladder. These cells are called transitional cells.These tumors are classified by the way they grow:Papillary tumors look like warts and are attached to a stalk., Nonpapillary (sessile) tumors are flat. They are much less common. But they are more invasive and have a worse outcome.. The exact cause of bladder cancer is not known. But several things may make you more likely to develop it:Cigarette smoking. Smoking greatly increases the risk of developing bladder cancer. Up to half of all bladder cancers in men and several in women may be caused by cigarette smoke., Chemical exposure at work. About one in four cases of bladder cancer is caused by coming into contact with to cancer-causing chemicals at work. These chemicals are called carcinogens. Dye workers, rubber workers, aluminum workers, leather workers, truck drivers, and pesticide applicators are at the highest risk., Chemotherapy: The chemotherapy drug cyclophosphamide may increase the risk of bladder cancer. Your doctor may prescribe a medicine to reduce this risk., Radiation treatment: Women who had radiation therapy to treat cervical cancer have an increased risk of developing bladder cancer., Bladder infection: A long-term (chronic) bladder infection or irritation may lead to a certain type of bladder cancer.. Research has not shown clear evidence that using artificial sweeteners leads to bladder cancer. "}, "Babies and diarrhea": {"description": "Call your pediatrician if:"}, "Bug spray poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Coughing", "Loss of alertness due to imbalance in oxygen level", "Tremors (if a large amount is swallowed)", "Seizures (if a large amount is swallowed)", "Upset stomach", "Vomiting", "Moderate to severe stomach irritation", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Breast lump removal": {"description": "When a noncancerous tumor such as a fibroadenoma of the breast is removed, it is often called an excisional breast biopsy, instead of a lumpectomy."}, "Botulism": {"description": "Botulism is a rare but serious illness caused by Clostridium botulinum bacteria. The bacteria may enter the body through wounds, or by eating\u00a0them from improperly canned or preserved food.", "Possible Complications": "Aspiration pneumonia and infection, Long-lasting weakness, Nervous system problems for up to 1 year, Respiratory distress. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramps", "Breathing difficulty that may lead to respiratory failure", "Difficulty swallowing and speaking", "Double vision", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Weakness with paralysis (equal on both sides of the body)", "Constipation", "Drooling", "Poor feeding and weak sucking", "Respiratory distress", "Weak cry", "Weakness, loss of muscle tone"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. There may be signs of:Absent or decreased deep tendon reflexes, Absent or decreased gag reflex, Eyelid drooping, Loss of muscle function starting at the top of the body and descending down, Paralyzed bowel, Speech impairment, Urine retention with inability to urinate, Blurred vision, No fever . Blood tests can be done to identify the toxin. A stool culture may also be ordered. Lab tests can be done on the suspected food to confirm botulism.", "Treatment": "You will need medicine to fight the toxin produced by the bacteria, called botulinus antitoxin.You will have to stay in the hospital if you have breathing trouble. A tube may be inserted through the nose or mouth into the windpipe to provide an airway for oxygen. You may need a breathing machine.Patients who have trouble swallowing may be given fluids through a vein (by IV). A feeding tube may be inserted.Health care providers must tell state health authorities or the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention about patients with botulism, so that the contaminated food can be removed from stores.Some people are given antibiotics, but they may not always help. ", "Prevention": "NEVER give honey or corn syrup to infants younger than 1 year old -- not even just a little taste on a pacifier.Prevent infant botulism by breastfeeding only, if possible.Always throw away bulging cans or foul-smelling preserved foods. Sterilizing home-canned foods by pressure cooking them at 250 degrees Fahrenheit for 30 minutes may reduce the risk for botulism.Keep foil-wrapped baked potatoes hot or in the refrigerator, not at room temperature.", "Causes": "Clostridium botulinum is found in soil and untreated water throughout the world. It produces spores that survive in improperly preserved or canned food, where they produce a toxin. When eaten, even tiny amounts of this toxin can lead to severe poisoning.The foods most commonly contaminated are home-canned vegetables, cured pork and ham, smoked or raw fish, and honey or corn syrup. Botulism may also occur if the bacteria enter open wounds and produce toxins there.Infant botulism occurs when a baby eats spores and the bacteria grow in the baby's gastrointestinal tract. The most common cause of infant botulism is eating honey or corn syrup, or using pacifiers that have been coated with contaminated honey.Clostridium botulinum can be found normally in the stool of some infants.About 110 cases of botulism occur in the United States\u00a0per year. Most of the cases are in infants."}, "Bronchoscopy": {"description": "Bronchoscopy is a test to view the airways and diagnose lung disease. It\u00a0may also be\u00a0used\u00a0during the\u00a0treatment of\u00a0some lung conditions."}, "Belching": {"description": "Belching is the act of bringing up air from the stomach.", "Causes": "Pressure caused by the unconscious swallowing of air, Acid reflux disease (GERD) and heartburn . "}, "Brachial plexus injury in newborns": {"description": "Brachial plexus injury is a loss of movement or weakness of the arm. It occurs when the collection of nerves around the shoulder (called the brachial plexus) are damaged during birth.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include:Abnormal muscle contractions (contractures) or tightening of the muscles. These may be permanent., Permanent, partial, or total loss of function of the affected nerves, causing paralysis of the arm or arm weakness . ", "Symptoms": ["No movement in the newborn\u2019s upper or lower arm or hand", "Absent Moro reflex on the affected side", "Arm flexed (bent) at elbow and held against body", "Decreased grip on the affected side"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam most often shows that the infant is not moving the upper or lower arm or hand. The affected arm may flop when the infant is rolled from side to side.The Moro reflex is absent on the side with the brachial plexus or nerve injury.The health care provider will examine the collarbone to look for a fracture. The infant may need to have an x-ray taken of the collarbone. ", "Treatment": "Gentle massage of the arm and range-of-motion exercises are recommended for mild cases. The infant may need to be evaluated by specialists if the damage is severe or the condition does not improve in the first few weeks. Surgery may be considered if some strength has not returned to the affected muscles by the time the baby is 3 - 6 months old. ", "Prevention": "Taking measures to avoid a difficult delivery, whenever possible, reduces the risk of brachial plexus injury in newborn babies.", "Causes": "The nerves of the brachial plexus can be injured during a difficult delivery.\u00a0The injury\u00a0may be caused by: The infant's head and neck pulling toward the side as the shoulders pass through the birth canal, Pulling on the infant's shoulders during a head-first delivery, Pressure on the baby's raised arms during a breech (feet-first) delivery . There are different forms of brachial plexus injury in an infant. The type depends on the amount of arm paralysis:Brachial plexus injuries usually affect only the upper arm., Erb's paralysis affects the upper and lower arm., Klumpke paralysis affects the hand. The infant may also have an eyelid droop on the opposite side. . The following factors increase the risk of brachial plexus injury:Breech delivery, Larger-than-average newborn (such as an infant of a diabetic mother), Difficulty delivering the baby's shoulder after the head has already come out (called shoulder dystocia) . Brachial plexus injury is less common now that delivery techniques have improved. Cesarean delivery is used more often when there are concerns about a difficult delivery. Although a C-section reduces the risk of injury it does not prevent it, and the procedure carries other risks.Brachial plexus injury may be confused with a condition called pseudoparalysis. This is when the infant has a fracture and is not moving the arm because of pain, but there is no nerve damage."}, "Breast skin and nipple changes": {"description": "\r\n\r\n \r\nLearn about skin and nipple changes in the breast so you know when to see a health care provider.\r\n"}, "Birth control - slow release methods": {"description": "Other methods to prevent pregnancy use the same hormones, but these hormones are released slowly over time."}, "Bullous pemphigoid": {"description": "Bullous pemphigoid is a skin disorder characterized by large blisters.", "Possible Complications": "Skin infection is the most common complication.", "Symptoms": ["Itching", "Rashes", "Mouth sores", "Bleeding gums"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done to help diagnose this condition include: Blood tests, Skin lesion biopsy. ", "Treatment": "Powerful anti-inflammatory medicines called corticosteroids may be prescribed. Some corticosteroids are taken by mouth, while others require a shot (injection). In persons with early forms of the disease, corticosteroid creams may be used.Your doctor may prescribe chemotherapy or medicines to help suppress the immune system.Antibiotics in the tetracycline family\u00a0may be useful in mild cases. Niacin (a B complex vitamin) is sometimes given along with tetracycline.", "Causes": "The cause is not known, but may be related to immune system disorders, certain other diseases, or use of some medications.Bullous pemphigoid usually occurs in elderly persons and is rare in young people. Symptoms come and go. In most patients, the condition goes away within\u00a05 years."}, "Blocked tear duct": {"description": "A blocked tear duct is a partial or complete blockage in the pathway that carries tears from the surface of the eye into the nose.", "Possible Complications": "Tear duct blockage may lead to an infection (dacryocystitis) in part of the nasolacrimal duct called the lacrimal sac. Usually there is a bump on the side of the nose right next to the corner of the eye. Treatment for this often requires oral antibiotics. Sometimes, the sac needs to be surgically drained.Tear duct blockage can also increase the chance of other infections, such as conjunctivitis.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Most of the time, the health care provider will not need to do any tests.Tests that may be done include:Eye exam, Special eye stain (fluorescein) to see how tears drain, X-ray studies to examine the tear duct (rarely done). ", "Treatment": "Carefully clean the eyelids using a warm, wet washcloth if tears build up and leave crusts.For infants, you may try gently massaging the area 2\u00a0to 3 times a day. Using a clean finger, rub the area from the inside corner of the eye toward the nose. This may help to open the tear duct.Most of the time, the tear duct will open on its own by the time the infant is one year old. If this does not happen, probing may be necessary. This procedure is most often done using general anesthesia, so the child will be asleep and pain-free. It is almost always successful.In adults, the cause of the blockage must be treated. This may re-open the duct if there is not too much damage. Surgery using tiny tubes or stents to open the passageway may be needed to restore normal tear drainage. ", "Prevention": "Many cases cannot be prevented. Proper treatment of nasal infections and conjunctivitis may reduce the risk of having a blocked tear duct. Using protective eyewear may help prevent a blockage caused by injury. ", "Causes": "Tears are constantly being made to help protect the surface of your eye. They drain into a very small opening (punctum) in the corner of your eye, near your nose. This opening is the entrance to the nasolacrimal duct. If this duct is blocked, the tears will build up and overflow onto the cheek. This occurs even when you are not crying.In children, the duct may not be completely developed at birth. It may be closed or covered by a thin film, which causes a partial blockage. In adults, the duct can be damaged by an infection, injury, or a tumor."}, "Body temperature normals": {"description": "Body temperature normally changes throughout the day."}, "Breast biopsy - ultrasound": {"description": "There are several different types of breast biopsies, including stereotactic, open, and lumpectomy. This article focuses on needle-based, ultrasound-guided breast biopsies."}, "Black widow spider": {"Symptoms": ["If the bite is on the upper body, you will usually feel most of the pain in your chest.", "If the bite is on your lower body, you will usually feel most of the pain in the abdomen.", "Anxiety", "Difficulty breathing", "Extremely painful muscle cramps", "Headache", "High blood pressure", "Increased salivation", "Increased sweating", "Light sensitivity", "Muscle weakness", "Nausea and vomiting", "Numbness", "Restlessness", "Seizures (usually seen just before death in children)"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Bursitis of the heel": {"description": "Bursitis of the heel is swelling of the fluid-filled sac (bursa) at the back of the heel bone. ", "Symptoms": ["Pain in the heel, especially with walking, running, or when the area is touched", "Pain may get worse when rising on the toes (standing on tiptoes)", "Red, warm skin over the back of the heel "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will take a history to find out if you have symptoms of retrocalcaneal bursitis. An exam will be done to find the location of the pain. The\u00a0provider will also look for tenderness and redness in the back of the heel.The pain may be worse when your ankle is bent upward (dorsiflex). Or, the pain may be worse when you rise on your toes.Most of the time, you will not need imaging studies such as x-ray and MRI\u00a0at first. You may need these tests later if the first treatments do not lead to improvement. Inflammation may show on a MRI. ", "Causes": "A bursa acts as a cushion and lubricant between tendons or muscles sliding over bone. There are bursas around most large joints in the body, including the ankle.The retrocalcaneal bursa is located in the back of the ankle by the heel. It is where the large Achilles tendon connects the calf muscles to the heel bone.Repeated or too much use of the ankle can cause this bursa to become irritated and inflamed. It may be caused by too much walking, running, or jumping.This condition is very often linked to Achilles tendinitis. Sometimes retrocalcaneal bursitis may be mistaken for Achilles tendinitis.Risks for this condition include:Starting a very intense workout schedule, Suddenly increasing activity level without the right conditioning. ", "Prevention": "Things you can do to prevent the problem include:Use proper form when exercising., Maintain as good flexibility and strength around the ankle to help prevent this condition., Stretch the Achilles tendon to help prevent injury., Wear shoes with enough arch support to decrease the amount of stress on the tendon and inflammation in the bursa.. ", "Treatment": "Your health care provider may recommend that you do the following: Avoid activities that cause pain., Put ice on the heel several times a day., Take nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory medications (NSAIDs), such as ibuprofen., Try using over-the-counter or custom heel wedges in your shoe to help decrease stress on the heel., Try ultrasound treatment during physical therapy to reduce inflammation.. Have physical therapy to improve flexibility and strength around the ankle. This can help the bursitis improve and prevent it from coming back.If these treatments do not\u00a0work, your provider may inject a small amount of steroid medicine into the bursa. After the injection, you should avoid overstretching the tendon because it can break open (rupture).If the condition is connected to Achilles tendinitis, you may need to wear a cast on the ankle for several weeks. Very rarely, surgery may be needed to remove the inflamed bursa."}, "Back pain - when you see the doctor": {"description": "Your provider will try to determine the cause of your pain and whether it is likely to quickly get better with simple measures, such as ice, mild painkillers, physical therapy, and exercise."}, " Breast milk - pumping and storing": {"description": "Breast milk is the best nutrition for your baby. Learn to pump, collect, and store breast milk. You can continue to give your baby breast milk when you return to work. Find a lactation consultant, also called a breastfeeding expert, for help if you need it. "}, "Bladder stones": {"description": "Bladder stones are hard buildups of minerals that form in the urinary bladder.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain, pressure", "Abnormally colored or dark-colored urine", "Blood in the urine", "Difficulty urinating", "Frequent urge to urinate", "Inability to urinate except in certain positions", "Interruption of the urine stream", "Pain, discomfort in the penis", "Signs of urinary tract infection (such as fever, pain when urinating, and need to urinate often) "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. This will also include a rectal exam. The exam may reveal an enlarged prostate or other problems.The following tests may be done:\r\n  Bladder or pelvic x-ray \r\n  , Cystoscopy, Urinalysis, Urine culture (clean catch) . ", "Causes": "Bladder stones are most often caused by another urinary system problem, such as:\r\n  Bladder diverticulum\r\n  , Enlarged prostate, Neurogenic bladder, Urinary tract infection. Almost all bladder stones occur in men. Bladder stones are much less common than kidney stones.Bladder stones may occur when urine in the bladder is concentrated and materials form crystals. Bladder stones may also result from foreign objects in the bladder.", "Prevention": "Prompt treatment of urinary tract infections or other\u00a0urinary tract\u00a0conditions may help prevent bladder stones.", "Treatment": "You may be able to help small stones pass on their own by drinking 6 - 8 glasses of water or more per day to increase urination.Your health care provider may remove stones that do not pass using a cystoscope (a small telescope that passes through the urethra into the bladder).Some stones may need to be removed using open surgery.Drugs are rarely used to dissolve the stones.Causes of bladder stones should be treated. Most commonly bladder stones are seen with benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH--enlarged prostate) or bladder outlet obstruction.For patients with BPH and bladder stones, transurethral resection of the prostate (TURP) can be performed with stone removal."}, "Bilirubin - urine": {"description": "Bilirubin may also be measured with a blood test."}, "Breast MRI scan": {"description": "A breast MRI may be done in combination with mammography or ultrasound. However, it is not a replacement for mammography."}, "Bronchopulmonary dysplasia": {"description": "Bronchopulmonary dysplasia (BPD) is a chronic lung condition that affects newborn babies who were either put on a breathing machine after birth or were born very early (prematurely).", "Possible Complications": "Babies who have had BPD are at greater risk of repeated respiratory infections, such as pneumonia, bronchiolitis, and respiratory syncytial virus (RSV) that require a hospital stay.Other possible complications in babies who have had BPD are:Developmental problems, Poor growth, Pulmonary hypertension. ", "Symptoms": ["Bluish skin color (cyanosis)", "Cough", "Rapid breathing", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "Arterial blood gas, Chest CT scan, Chest x-ray, Pulse oximetry. ", "Treatment": "IN THE HOSPITALInfants who have breathing problems are often put on a ventilator. This is a breathing machine that sends pressure to the baby\u2019s lungs to keep them inflated and to deliver more oxygen. As the baby\u2019s lungs develop, the pressure and oxygen are slowly reduced. The baby is weaned from the ventilator. The baby may continue to get oxygen by a mask or nasal tube for several weeks or months.Infants with BPD are usually fed by tubes inserted into the stomach (NG tube). These babies need extra calories due to the effort of breathing. To keep their lungs from filling with fluid, their fluid intake may need to be limited. And they may be given medicines that remove water from the body (diuretics). Other medicines can include corticosteroids, bronchodilators, and surfactant.Parents of these infants need emotional support. This is because BPD takes time to get better and the infant may need to stay in the hospital for a long time.AT HOMEInfants with BPD may need oxygen therapy for weeks to months after leaving the hospital. Follow your health care provider\u2019s instructions to ensure your baby gets enough nutrition during recovery. Your baby may need tube feedings or special formulas.It is very important to prevent your baby from getting colds and other respiratory infections, such as respiratory syncytial virus (RSV). RSV can cause a severe lung infection, especially in a baby with BPD.A simple way to help prevent RSV infection is to wash your hands often. Follow these measures:Wash your hands with warm water and soap before touching\u00a0your baby. Tell others to wash their hands, too, before touching\u00a0your baby., Ask others to avoid contact with your baby if they have a cold or fever, or ask them to wear a mask., Be aware that kissing your baby can spread RSV., Try to keep young children away from your baby. RSV is very common among young children and spreads easily from child-to-child., Do not\u00a0smoke inside your house, car, or anywhere near your baby. Exposure to tobacco smoke increases the risk of RSV illness. . Parents\u00a0of babies with BPD should avoid crowds during outbreaks of RSV. Outbreaks are often reported by local news media.Your baby's health care provider may prescribe the medicine palivizumab (Synagis) to prevent RSV infection in your baby. Follow instructions on how to give your baby this medicine. \u00a0\r\n ", "Prevention": "To help prevent BPD:Prevent premature delivery whenever possible. If you are pregnant or thinking about getting pregnant, get prenatal care to help keep you and your baby healthy., If your baby is on breathing support, ask the health care provider how soon your baby can be weaned (gradually removed) from the ventilator. , Your baby may receive a substance called surfactant to help keep the baby's lungs open.. ", "Causes": "BPD occurs in\u00a0very ill infants who received high levels of oxygen for a long period.\u00a0BPD can also occur in infants who\u00a0were on a breathing machine (ventilator).BPD\u00a0is more common in infants born early (prematurely), whose lungs were not fully developed at birth.Risk factors include:Congenital heart disease, Prematurity, usually in infants born before 32 weeks gestation, Severe respiratory or lung infection. Risk of severe BPD has decreased in recent years."}, "Breath holding spell": {"Symptoms": ["Blue or pale skin", "Crying, then no breathing", "Fainting or loss of alertness (unconsciousness)", "Jerky movements (short, seizure-like movements) "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam and ask questions about the child's medical history and symptoms. Blood tests may be done to check for an iron deficiency. Other tests that may be done include: EKG\u00a0to check the heart, EEG to check for seizures. ", "description": "Some children have breath holding spells. This is an involuntary stop in breathing that is not in the child\u2019s control.", "Causes": "Babies as young as 2 months old and up to 2 years old can start having breath holding spells. Some children have severe spells.Children can have breath holding spells when they are responding to:Fear, Pain, Traumatic event, Being startled or confronted . Breath holding spells are more common in children with:Genetic conditions, such as Riley-Day syndrome or Rett syndrome, Iron deficiency anemia, A family history of breath holding spells (parents may have had similar spells when they were children) . ", "Treatment": "No treatment is usually needed. But iron drops or pills may be given if the child has an iron deficiency. Breath holding can be a frightening experience for parents. If your child has been diagnosed with breath holding spells, take the following steps:During a spell, make sure your child is in a safe place where he or she will not fall or be hurt., Place a cold cloth on your child's forehead during a spell to help shorten the episode., After the spell, try to be calm. Avoid giving too much attention to the child, as this can reinforce the behaviors that led to the spell., Avoid situations that cause a child's temper tantrums. This can help reduce the number of spells., Ignore breath holding spells that do not cause your child to faint. Ignore the spell in the same way you ignore temper tantrums. . "}, "Bone marrow transplant - discharge": {"description": "Transplant - bone marrow - discharge; Stem cell transplant - discharge; Hematopoietic stem cell transplant - discharge; Reduced intensity, non-myeloablative transplant - discharge; Mini transplant - discharge; Allogenic bone marrow transplant - discharge; Autologous bone marrow transplant - discharge; Umbilical cord blood transplant - discharge"}, "Botulinum toxin injection - larynx": {"description": "BTX is the toxin that causes botulism, a rare but serious illness. It is safe when used in very small doses."}, "Babinski reflex": {"description": "This reflex is normal in children up to 2 years old. It disappears as the child gets older. It may disappear as early as 12 months.", "Causes": "When the Babinski reflex is present in a child older than 2 years or in an adult, it is often a sign of a brain or nervous system disorder. Disorders may include:Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (Lou Gehrig disease)\u00a0, Brain tumor or injury\r\n \u00a0\r\n , Meningitis, Multiple sclerosis\r\n \u00a0\r\n , Spinal cord injury, defect,\u00a0or tumor\r\n , Stroke. "}, "Body lice": {"description": "Two other types of lice are:", "Possible Complications": "Scratching can make your skin more likely to become infected. Rarely, lice may carry uncommon diseases, such as trench fever. Because body lice spreads easily to others, people you live with and sexual partners need\u00a0to be treated\u00a0as well. ", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will look at your skin and clothing for signs of lice.\u00a0Full-grown lice are the size of a sesame seed, have six legs, and are tan to grayish-white., Nits are lice eggs. They will most often be seen in the clothing of someone with lice, most commonly around the waist and in the armpits.. You should also be checked for head and public lice if you have body lice.\u00a0", "Treatment": "Body lice mainly live in clothing. To get rid of lice, destroy infected clothing or carefully wash items\u00a0in hot water (at least 130 degrees F), then machine dry using a hot cycle.Your doctor may also prescribe a cream\u00a0that you\u00a0put on your skin or a wash that contains permethrin, malathione, or benzyl alcohol.Bathing and washing clothes, bedding, and towels are most important steps in treating lice. Doing these things usually gets rid of the problem.", "Causes": "Body lice live in the seams and folds of clothing. They feed on human blood and lay their eggs and deposit waste matter on the skin and clothing.They can live in clothing for up to 1 month., Lice die within 5 - 7 days at room temperature if they fall off a person.. You can catch body lice if you come in direct contact with someone who has lice. You can also get lice from infected clothing, towels, or bedding.Body lice are bigger than other types of lice.You are more likely to get body lice if you do not bathe and wash your clothes often\u00a0or live in close (overcrowded) conditions.\u00a0Lice are unlikely to last if you:Bathe regularly, Wash clothes and bedding at least once a week. Placing clothes in a hot dryer helps kill\u00a0lice on clothing."}, "Brain abscess": {"description": "A brain abscess is a collection of pus, immune cells, and other material in the brain, usually from a bacterial or fungal infection.", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage, Meningitis that is severe and life threatening, Return (recurrence) of infection, Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Changes in mental statusConfusion, Decreasing responsiveness, Drowsiness, Eventual coma, Inattention, Irritability, Slow thought processes. ", "Confusion", "Decreasing responsiveness", "Drowsiness", "Eventual coma", "Inattention", "Irritability", "Slow thought processes", "Decreased movement", "Decreased sensation", "Decreased speech (aphasia)", "Fever and chills", "Headache", "Language difficulties", "Loss of coordination", "Loss of muscle function, typically on one side", "Seizures", "Stiff neck", "Vision changes", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "A brain and nervous system (neurological) exam will usually show signs of\u00a0increased intracranial pressure and problems with brain function.Tests to diagnose a brain abscess may include:Blood cultures, Chest x-ray, Complete blood count (CBC), Head CT scan, Electroencephalogram (EEG), MRI of head, Testing for the presence of antibodies to organisms such as Toxoplasma gondii and Taenia solium. A needle biopsy is usually performed to identify the cause of the infection.", "Treatment": "A brain abscess is a medical emergency. Pressure inside the skull may become high enough to be life threatening. You will need to stay in the hospital until the condition is stable. Some people may need life support.Medication, not surgery, is recommended if you have:Several abscesses (rare), A small abscess (less than 2 cm), An abscess deep in the brain, An abscess and meningitis, Shunts in the brain for hydrocephalus (in some cases the shunt may need to be removed temporarily or replaced), Toxoplasma gondii infection in a person with HIV. Antibiotics will be prescribed. Antibiotics that work against a number of different bacteria (broad spectrum antibiotics) are most commonly used. You may be prescribed several different types of antibiotics to make sure treatment works.Antifungal medications may also be prescribed if the infection is likely caused by a fungus.Immediate treatment may be needed if an abscess is injuring brain tissue by pressing on it, or there is a large abscess with a large amount of swelling around that it is raising pressure in the brain.Surgery is needed if :Increased pressure in the brain continues or gets worse, The brain abscess does not get smaller after medication, The brain abscess contains gas (produced by some types of bacteria), The brain abscess might break open (rupture). Surgery consists of opening the skull, exposing the brain, and draining the abscess. Laboratory tests are often done to examine the fluid. This can help identify what is causing the infection, so that more appropriate antibiotics or antifungal drugs can be prescribed.The surgical procedure used depends on the size and depth of the abscess. The entire abscess may be removed (excised) if it is near the surface and enclosed in a sac.Needle aspiration guided by CT or MRI scan may be needed for a deep abscess. During this procedure, medications may be injected directly into the mass.Certain diuretics and steroids may also be used to reduce swelling of the brain.", "Prevention": "You can reduce the risk of developing a brain abscess by treating any disorders that can cause them. Have a follow-up examination after infections are treated.Some people, including those with certain heart disorders, may receive antibiotics before dental or urological procedures to help reduce the risk of infection.", "Causes": "Brain abscesses commonly occur when bacteria or fungi infect part of the brain. Swelling and irritation (inflammation) develop in response to this infection. Infected brain cells, white blood cells, live and dead bacteria, and fungi collect in an area of the brain. Tissue forms around this area and creates a mass.While this immune response can protect the brain by isolating the infection, it can also do more harm than good. The brain swells. Because the skull cannot expand, the mass may put pressure on delicate brain tissue. Infected material can block the blood vessels of the brain.The germs that cause a brain abscess can reach the brain through the blood. The source of the infection is often not found. However, the most common source is a lung infection. Less often, a heart infection is the cause. Germs may also travel from a nearby infected area (for example, an ear infection or a tooth abscess) or enter the body during an injury (such as a gun or knife wound) or neurosurgery.In children with congenital\u00a0heart disease or a blood vessel birth defect, such as those with Tetralogy of Fallot, infections are more able to reach the brain from the intestines, teeth, or other body areas.The following raise your risk of a brain abscess:A weakened immune system (such as in AIDS patients), Chronic disease, such as cancer\u00a0 \r\n , Drugs that suppress the immune system (corticosteroids or chemotherapy), Right-to-left heart shunts, usually the result of congenital heart disease. "}, "Barrett\u2019s esophagus": {"description": "Barrett's esophagus is a disorder in which the lining of the esophagus is damaged by stomach acid. The lining becomes similar to that of the stomach.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor may do an endoscopy if GERD symptoms are severe or come back after treatment. A thin tube with a camera on the end is inserted through your mouth, then passed into your esophagus and stomach.While looking at the esophagus with the endoscope, the doctor may perform biopsies in different parts of the esophagus. These biopsies help diagnose Barrett's esophagus, and look for changes that could lead to cancer. People with Barrett's esophagus have an increased risk for esophageal cancer. However, cancer not common. Your health care provider may recommend a follow-up endoscopy to look for cell changes that indicate cancer.", "Causes": "When you eat, food passes from your throat to your stomach through the esophagus. The esophagus is also called the food pipe or swallowing tube. A ring of muscle fibers in the lower esophagus keeps stomach contents from moving backward. If these muscles do not close tightly, harsh stomach acid can leak into the esophagus.This is called reflux or gastroesophageal reflux. It may cause tissue damage over time.Barrett's esophagus occurs more often in men than women. People who have had GERD for a long time are more likely to have this condition. ", "Prevention": "Diagnosis and treatment of GERD may prevent Barrett's esophagus.", "Treatment": "TREATMENT OF GERDTreatment should improve acid reflux symptoms, and may keep Barrett's esophagus from getting worse. Treatment may involve lifestyle changes and medicines such as:Antacids after meals and at bedtime, Histamine H2 receptor blockers, Proton pump inhibitors, Avoiding tobacco use. Lifestyle changes, medicines, and anti-reflux surgery may help with symptoms of GERD. However, these steps will not make Barrett's esophagus go away.TREATMENT OF BARRETT'S ESOPHAGUSSurgery or other procedures may be recommended if a biopsy shows cell changes may cancer. Some of the following procedures remove the harmful tissue in your esophagus: Photodynamic therapy (PDT) uses a special laser device, called an esophageal balloon, along with a drug called Photofrin., Other procedures use different types of high energy to destroy the precancerous tissue., Surgery removes the abnormal lining.. "}, "Bicycle safety": {"description": "Obey the rules of the road."}, "Bacitracin overdose": {"Symptoms": [], "description": "See also:"}, "Being active after your heart attack": {"description": "You had a heart attack and were in the hospital. You may have had angioplasty and a stent placed in an artery to open a blocked artery in your heart."}, "Bedtime habits": {"description": "Remember that bedtime habits can be disrupted by changes or stresses such as moving to a new home or gaining a new brother or sister. It may take time to reestablish previous bedtime practices."}, "Broken toe - self-care": {"description": "Each toe is made up of two or three small bones. These bones are small and fragile. They can break after you stub your toe or drop something heavy on it."}, "Bowel retraining": {"description": "To use this method, you will be taught how to squeeze the rectal muscle around the rectal plug. The computer display guides you to make sure you are doing it correctly. Your symptoms should begin to improve after three sessions."}, "Brown recluse spider": {"Symptoms": ["Chills", "Itching", "General ill-feeling or discomfort", "Fever", "Nausea", "Reddish or purplish color in a circle around bite", "Sweating", "Ulcer in the area of the bite", "Coma", "Blood in urine", "Jaundice", "Kidney failure", "Seizures"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Blindness and vision loss": {"description": "Some types of vision loss never lead to complete blindness.", "Causes": "Blindness has many causes. In the United States, the leading causes are:Accidents or injuries to the surface of the eye (such as chemical burns or sports injuries), Diabetes, Glaucoma, Macular degeneration. The type of partial vision loss may differ, depending on the cause:With cataracts, vision may be cloudy or fuzzy, and bright light may cause glare, With diabetes, vision may be blurred, there may be shadows or missing areas of vision, and difficulty seeing at night, With glaucoma, there may be tunnel vision and missing areas of vision, With macular degeneration, the side vision is normal but the central vision is slowly lost. Other causes of vision loss include:Blocked blood vessels, Complications of premature birth (retrolental fibroplasia), Complications of eye surgery, Lazy eye, Optic neuritis, Stroke, Retinitis pigmentosa, Tumors such as retinoblastoma and optic glioma. "}, "B-cell leukemia/lymphoma panel": {"description": "B-cell leukemia/lymphoma panel is a blood test that looks for certain proteins on the surface of white blood cells called B-lymphocytes. The proteins serve as markers that may be helpful in diagnosing leukemia or lymphoma."}, "Blockage of upper airway": {"description": "Blockage of the upper airway occurs when the upper breathing passages become narrowed or blocked, making it hard to breathe. Areas in the upper airway that can be affected are the windpipe (trachea), voice box (larynx) or throat (pharynx).", "Possible Complications": "If the obstruction is not relieved, it can cause:Brain damage, Breathing failure, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Agitation or fidgeting", "Bluish color to the skin (cyanosis)", "Changes in consciousness", "Choking", "Confusion", "Difficulty breathing", "Gasping for air", "Panic", "Unconsciousness", "Wheezing, crowing, whistling, or other unusual breathing noises indicating breathing difficulty"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a physical examination, which\u00a0may show:Decreased breath sounds in the lungs, Rapid, shallow, or slowed breathing. Tests are usually not necessary, but may include:Bronchoscopy, Laryngoscopy, X-rays. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of the blockage.Objects stuck in the airway may be removed with special instruments., A tube may be inserted into the airway (endotracheal tube) to help with breathing.\r\n , Sometimes an opening is made\u00a0through the neck\u00a0into the airway (tracheostomy or cricothyrotomy).. If the obstruction is due to a foreign body, such as a piece of food that has been breathed in, doing abdominal thrusts can save the person's life.\r\n", "Prevention": "Prevention depends on the cause of the upper airway obstruction.The following methods may help prevent an obstruction:Eat slowly and chew food completely., Do not drink too much alcohol before or while eating., Keep small objects away from young children., Make sure dentures fit properly.. ", "Causes": "The airway can become narrowed or blocked due to various causes, including:Allergic reactions in which the trachea or throat swell closed, including allergic reactions to a bee sting, peanuts, antibiotics (such as penicillin), and blood pressure medications (such as ACE inhibitors), Chemical burns and reactions, Epiglottitis (infection of the structure separating the trachea from the esophagus), Fire or burns from breathing in smoke, Foreign bodies such as peanuts and other breathed-in foods, pieces of a balloon, buttons, coins, and small toys, Infections of the upper airway area, Injury to the upper airway area, Peritonsillar abscess (collection of infected material near the tonsils)\r\n , Retropharyngeal abscess\u00a0(collection of infected material in the back of the airway)\r\n , Throat cancer, Tracheomalacia\u00a0 (weakness of the cartilage that supports the trachea), Vocal cord problems. "}, "Bronchitis - acute": {"Symptoms": ["Chest discomfort", "Cough that produces mucus -- the mucus may be clear or yellow-green", "Fatigue", "Fever -- usually low-grade", "Shortness of breath that gets worse with activity", "Wheezing, in people with asthma "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will listen to the breathing sounds in your lungs with a stethoscope. Your breathing may sound abnormal or rough. Tests may include:Chest x-ray, if your health care provider suspects pneumonia , Pulse oximetry, a painless test that helps determine the amount of oxygen in your blood by using a device placed on the end of your finger . ", "description": "Acute bronchitis is swelling and inflammation in the main passages that carry air to the lungs. The swelling narrows the airways, which makes it harder to breathe. Another symptom of bronchitis is a cough. Acute means the symptoms have been present only for a short time. ", "Causes": "When acute bronchitis occurs, it almost always comes after having a cold or flu-like illness. The bronchitis infection is caused by a virus. At first, it affects your nose, sinuses, and throat. Then it spreads to the airways that lead to your lungs.Sometimes, bacteria also infect your airways. This is called a secondary infection.Chronic bronchitis is a long-term condition. To be diagnosed with chronic bronchitis, you must have a cough with mucus on most days for at least 3 months.", "Treatment": "Most people DO NOT need antibiotics for acute bronchitis. The infection will almost always go away on its own within 1 week. Doing these things may help you feel better:Drink plenty of fluids., If you have asthma or another chronic lung condition, use your inhaler., Get plenty of rest., Take aspirin or acetaminophen (Tylenol and other brands) if you have a fever. Do not give aspirin to children., Use a humidifier or steam in the bathroom.. Certain medicines that you can buy without a prescription can help break up or loosen mucus. Look for the word \"guaifenesin\" on the label. Ask the pharmacist if you need help finding it. If your symptoms do not improve or if you are wheezing, your doctor may prescribe an inhaler to open your airways.If your doctor thinks you also have bacteria in your airways, he or she may prescribe antibiotics. This medicine will only get rid of bacteria, not viruses. A bacterial infection is more common if you also have a chronic lung disease like COPD.Sometimes, bacteria may infect the airways along with the virus. If your doctor thinks this has happened, you may be prescribed antibiotics. Sometimes, corticosteroid medicine is also needed to reduce inflammation in the lungs.Other tips include:Do not smoke., Avoid secondhand smoke and air pollution., Wash your hands (and your children's hands) often to avoid spreading viruses and other germs. . "}, "Breast reconstruction - natural tissue": {"description": "This surgery can be performed at the same time as mastectomy or later."}, "Bunions": {"description": "A bunion forms when your big toe points toward the second toe. This causes a bump to appear on the inside edge of your toe.", "Symptoms": ["Red, thickened skin along the inside edge of the big toe", "A bony bump at this site", "Pain over the joint, which pressure from shoes makes worse", "Big toe turned toward the other toes and may cross over the second toe "], "Exams and Tests": "A doctor can very often diagnose a bunion by looking at it. A foot x-ray can show an abnormal angle between the big toe and the foot. In some cases, arthritis may also be seen.", "Causes": "Bunions are more common in women than men. The problem can run in families. People born with abnormal bones in their feet are more likely to form a bunion. Wearing narrow-toed, high-heeled shoes may lead to the development of a bunion. The condition may become painful as the bump gets worse. Extra bone and a fluid-filled sac grow at the base of the big toe.Watch this video about:Bunion", "Prevention": "Avoid compressing the toes of your foot with narrow, poor-fitting shoes.", "Treatment": "When a bunion first begins to develop, take good care of your feet.Wear wide-toed shoes. This can often solve the problem and prevent you from needing more treatment., Wear felt or foam pads on your foot to protect the bunion, or devices called spacers to separate the first and second toes. These are available at drugstores., Try cutting a hole in a pair of old, comfortable shoes to wear around the house. . If the bunion gets worse and more painful, surgery to realign the toe and remove the bony bump (bunionectomy) may help. There are more than 100 different surgical procedures to treat this condition."}, "Bleeding esophageal varices": {"description": "Bleeding esophageal varices are enlarged veins in the walls of the lower part of the esophagus that bleed. The esophagus is the tube that connects your throat to your stomach. ", "Possible Complications": "Encephalopathy (sometimes called hepatic encephalopathy), Esophageal stricture after surgery or endoscopic therapy, Hypovolemic shock, Infection (pneumonia, bloodstream infection, peritonitis), Return of bleeding after treatment. ", "Symptoms": ["Black, tarry stools", "Bloody stools", "Light-headedness", "Paleness", "Symptoms of chronic liver disease ", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will do a physical exam which may show:Bloody or black stool (in a rectal exam), Low blood pressure, Rapid heart rate, Signs of chronic liver disease or cirrhosis . Tests to find the source of the bleeding and determine if there is active bleeding include:Esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD), which involves-the use of a camera on a flexible tube to examine the upper gastrointestinal system, Insertion of a tube through the nose into the stomach (nasogastric tube) to look for signs of bleeding . Some doctors recommend EGD for patients who are newly diagnosed with mild to moderate cirrhosis. This test screens for esophageal varices and treats them before there is bleeding.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to stop acute bleeding as soon as possible. Bleeding must be controlled quickly to prevent shock and death. If massive bleeding occurs, a person may need to be put on a ventilator to protect the airways and prevent blood from going down into the lungs.To treat acute bleeding: The health care provider may inject the varices directly with a clotting medicine, or place a rubber band around the bleeding veins. This procedure is done using a small lighted tube called an endoscope. , A medication that tightens blood vessels (vasoconstriction) may be used. Examples include octreotide or vasopressin., Rarely, a tube may be inserted through the nose into the stomach and inflated with air. This produces pressure against the bleeding veins (balloon tamponade).. Once the bleeding is stopped, varices can be treated with medicines and medical procedures to prevent future bleeding including:Drugs called beta blockers, such as propranolol and nadolol that reduce the risk of bleeding., A rubber band can be placed around the bleeding veins during an EGD procedure., Transjugular intrahepatic portosystemic shunt (TIPS). This is a procedure to create new connections between two blood vessels in your liver. This can decrease pressure in the veins and prevent bleeding episodes from happening again. . Emergency surgery may be used (rarely) to treat patients if other therapy fails. Portocaval shunts or surgery to remove the esophagus are two treatment options, but these procedures are risky.Patients with bleeding varices from liver disease may need more treatment for their liver disease, including a liver transplant.", "Prevention": "Treating the causes of liver disease may prevent bleeding. Preventive treatment of varices with drugs such as beta blockers or with endoscopic banding may help prevent bleeding. Liver transplantation should be considered for some patients.", "Causes": "Scarring (cirrhosis) of the liver is the most common cause of esophageal varices. This scarring cuts down on blood flowing through the liver. As a result, more blood flows through the veins of the esophagus.The extra blood flow causes the veins in the esophagus to balloon outward. Heavy bleeding can occur if the veins break open.Any type of chronic liver disease can cause esophageal varices.Varices can also occur in the upper part of the stomach."}, "Baker\u2019s cyst": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "During a physical exam, the\u00a0health care provider\u00a0will look for a soft\u00a0lump in the back of the knee. If the cyst is small, comparing the affected knee to the normal knee can be helpful. , There may be\u00a0a decrease\u00a0in range of motion caused by pain or by the size of the cyst. , In some cases there will be catching, locking, pain, or other signs and symptoms of a meniscal tear.. Shining a light through the cyst\u00a0 (transillumination) can show that the growth is fluid filled.If the\u00a0lump grows quickly, or you have night pain, severe pain, or fever, you will need more tests to make sure you do not have other types of tumors.X-rays will not show the cyst or a meniscal tear, but they will show other problems that may be present, including arthritis.MRIs can help the health care provider see the cyst and look for any meniscal injury.", "description": "Baker's cyst is a buildup of joint fluid (synovial fluid) that forms a cyst behind the knee.", "Causes": "A Baker's cyst is caused by swelling in the knee. The swelling is due to an increase in the fluid that lubricates the knee joint (synovial fluid). When pressure builds up, fluid bulges into the back of the knee.Baker's cyst commonly occurs with:A tear in the meniscal cartilage of the knee, Knee arthritis (in older adults), Rheumatoid arthritis, Other knee problems . ", "Treatment": "Often no treatment is needed. The health care provider can watch the cyst over time.If the cyst is painful, the goal of treatment is to correct the problem that is causing the cyst, such as arthritis or a meniscus tear. Sometimes, a cyst can be drained (aspirated) or, in rare cases, removed with surgery if it becomes very large or causes symptoms.The cyst has a high chance of returning if the cause is not addressed., The surgery may also damage nearby blood vessels and nerves.. "}, "Birth control pill overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Breast tenderness", "Discoloration of urine", "Drowsiness", "Excessive vaginal bleeding (2 - 7 days following the overdose)", "Headache", "Emotional changes", "Nausea and vomiting", "Rash "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof\u00a0containers and out of the reach of children."}, "Beta-carotene blood test": {"description": "The beta-carotene test measures the level of beta-carotene in the blood. "}, "Bloody or tarry stools": {"description": "Bloody stools often are a sign or a problem in the digestive tract. Blood in the stool may come from anywhere along your digestive tract from your mouth to your anus.", "Causes": "Bleeding that takes place in the esophagus, stomach, or the first part of the small intestine most often causes the stool to appear black or tarry. Your doctor may use the term \"melena.\"\r\nBleeding in the upper part of the GI tract will usually cause black stools due to:Abnormal blood vessels, A tear in the esophagus from violent vomiting (Mallory-Weiss tear), Bleeding ulcer in the stomach, When blood supply is cut off to part of the intestines, Inflammation of the stomach lining (gastritis), Trauma or foreign body, Widened, overgrown veins (called varices) in the esophagus and stomach. Maroon-colored stools or bright red blood often mean that the blood is coming from the small or large bowel, rectum, or anus. The term \"hematochezia\" is used to describe this finding.\u00a0 Abnormal blood vessels\r\n , Anal fissures, When blood supply is cut off to part of the intestines, called bowel ischemia\r\n , Polyps or cancer in the colon or small intestine\r\n , Diverticulosis (abnormal pouches in the colon)\r\n , Hemorrhoids (common cause of bright red blood), Inflammatory bowel disease (such as Crohn's disease or ulcerative colitis), \r\n Infection in the intestines, Trauma or foreign body. "}, "Breath sounds": {"description": "Breath sounds are the noises produced by the structures of the lungs during breathing.", "Causes": "Acute bronchitis, Asthma, Bronchiectasis, Chronic bronchitis, Congestive heart failure\u00a0, Emphysema, Interstitial lung disease, Foreign body obstruction of the airway, Pneumonia, Pulmonary edema, Tracheobronchitis . "}, "Breast infection": {"description": "A breast infection is an infection in the tissue of the breast.", "Possible Complications": "In severe infections, an abscess may develop. Abscesses need to be drained, either as an office procedure or with surgery. Women with abscesses may be told to temporarily stop breastfeeding.", "Symptoms": ["Breast enlargement on one side only", "Breast lump", "Breast pain", "Fever and flu-like symptoms, including nausea and vomiting", "Itching", "Nipple discharge (may contain pus)", "Nipple sensation changes", "Swelling, tenderness, redness, and warmth in breast tissue", "Tender or enlarged lymph nodes in armpit on the same side"], "Exams and Tests": "An exam is needed to make the diagnosis and rule out complications such as an swollen, pus-filled lump (abscess). Sometimes an ultrasound is needed to check for an abscess.For infections that keep returning, milk from the nipple\u00a0may be cultured. In women who are not breastfeeding, tests may include: Breast biopsy, Breast MRI, Breast ultrasound, Mammogram\u00a0 . ", "Treatment": "Self-care may include applying moist heat to the infected breast tissue for 15 to 20 minutes four times a day. You may also need to take pain relievers.Antibiotic medicines are usually very effective in treating a breast infection. If you take antibiotics, you must continue to breastfeed or pump to relieve breast\u00a0swelling from milk production. ", "Prevention": "The following may help reduce the risk of breast infections:Careful nipple care to prevent irritation and cracking, Feeding often and pumping milk to prevent the breast from getting swollen (engorged), Proper breastfeeding technique with good latching by the baby, Weaning slowly, over several weeks, rather than\u00a0quickly stopping breastfeeding. ", "Causes": "Breast infections are usually caused by common bacteria (Staphylococcus aureus) found on normal skin. The bacteria enter through a break or crack in the skin, usually on the nipple.The infection takes place in the fatty tissue of the breast and causes swelling. This swelling pushes on the milk ducts. The result is pain and lumps in the infected breast.Breast infections usually occur in women who are breastfeeding. Breast infections that are not related to breastfeeding might be a rare form of breast cancer."}, "Brain radiation - discharge": {"description": "Radiation - brain - discharge"}, "Broken bone": {"Symptoms": ["A visibly out-of-place or misshapen limb or joint\r\n", "Swelling, bruising, or bleeding\r\n", "Intense pain\r\n", "Numbness and tingling\r\n", "Broken skin with bone protruding\r\n", "Limited mobility or inability to move a limb"], "Prevention": "Wear protective gear while skiing, biking, roller blading, and participating in contact sports. This includes helmets, elbow pads, knee pads, and shin pads.\r\n, Create a safe home for young children. Gate stairways and keep windows closed.\r\n, Teach children how to be safe and look out for themselves.\r\n, Supervise children carefully. There is no substitute for supervision, no matter how safe the environment or situation appears to be.\r\n, Prevent falls by not standing on chairs, counter tops, or other unstable objects. Remove throw rugs and electrical cords from floor surfaces. Use handrails on staircases and non-skid mats in bathtubs. These steps are especially important for the elderly.. ", "description": "A stress fracture is a hairline crack in the bone that develops because of repeated or prolonged forces against the bone.", "Causes": "The following are common causes of broken bones:Fall from a height\r\n, Motor vehicle accidents\r\n, Direct blow\r\n, Child abuse, Repetitive forces, such as those caused by running, can cause stress fractures of the foot, ankle, tibia, or hip. "}, "Bruxism": {"description": "Bruxism is when you clench (tightly hold your top and bottom teeth together) or grind (slide your teeth back and forth over each other) your teeth.", "Possible Complications": "\r\n Depression\r\n , \r\n Eating disorders\r\n , \r\n Insomnia\r\n , \r\n Increased dental or TMJ problems\r\n , \r\n Fractured teeth\r\n , \r\n Receding gums\r\n . Nightly grinding can awaken roommates\u00a0or sleeping partners.", "Symptoms": ["Anxiety, stress, and tension", "Depression", "Earache (due in part because the structures of the temporomandibular joint are very close to the ear canal, and because you can feel pain in a different location than its source; this is called referred pain)", "Eating disorders", "Headache", "Muscle tenderness, especially in the morning", "Hot, cold, or sweet sensitivity in the teeth", "Insomnia", "Sore or painful jaw "], "Exams and Tests": "An exam can rule out other disorders that may cause similar jaw pain or ear pain, including:Dental disorders, Ear disorders, such as ear infections, Problems with the temporomandibular joint (TMJ) . You may have a history of a high stress level and tension.", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to reduce pain, prevent permanent damage to the teeth, and reduce clenching as much as possible.The following self-care steps may help relieve pain:Apply ice or wet heat to sore jaw muscles. Either option can help. , Avoid eating hard foods like nuts, candies, and steak., Avoid chewing gum., Drink plenty of water every day., Get plenty of sleep., Learn physical therapy stretching exercises to help restore the action of the muscles and joints on each side of the head to\u00a0get back to normal., Massage the muscles of the neck, shoulders, and face. Look for small, painful nodules called trigger points that can cause pain throughout the head and face, Relax your face and jaw muscles throughout the day. The goal is to make facial relaxation a habit., Try to reduce your daily stress and learn relaxation techniques.. To prevent damage to the teeth, mouth guards or appliances (splints) are often used to treat teeth grinding, clenching, and TMJ disorders. A splint may help protect the teeth from the pressure of clenching.A well-fitting splint should help reduce clenching. However, some people find that the symptoms go away as long as they use the splint, but pain returns when they stop. The splint may also not work as well over time.There are many types of splints. Some fit over the top teeth, some on the bottom. They may be designed to keep your jaw in a more relaxed position or provide some other function. If one type doesn't work, another may.A splint called the NTI-tss fits over just the front teeth. The idea is to keep all of your back teeth (molars) completely separated, under the theory that most clenching is done on these back teeth. With the NTI, the only contact is between the splint and a bottom front tooth.After splint therapy, orthodontic adjustment of the bite pattern may help some people. Surgery should be considered a last resort.Finally, there have been many approaches to try to help people unlearn their clenching behaviors. These are more successful for daytime clenching. In some people, just relaxing and modifying daytime behavior is enough to reduce nighttime bruxism. Methods to directly modify nighttime clenching have not been well studied. They include biofeedback devices, self-hypnosis, and other alternative therapies.", "Prevention": "Stress reduction and anxiety management may reduce bruxism in people prone to the condition.", "Causes": "People can clench and grind without being aware of it. It can happen during both the day and night, although sleep-related bruxism is often a bigger problem because it is harder to control.There is some disagreement about the cause of bruxism. Daily stress may be the trigger in many people. Some people probably clench their teeth and never feel symptoms. Factors that influence whether or not bruxism causes pain and other problems will vary from person to person. They may include: \r\n  How much stress you are under\r\n  , \r\n  How long and tightly you clench and grind\r\n  , \r\n  Whether your teeth are misaligned\r\n  , \r\n  Your posture\r\n  , \r\n  Your ability to relax\r\n  , \r\n  Your diet\r\n  , \r\n  Your sleeping habits\r\n  . "}, "Broken or knocked out tooth": {"Prevention": "Wear a mouth guard when playing any contact sport.\r\n, Avoid fights.\r\n, Avoid hard foods, such as bones, stale bread, and tough bagels.\r\n, Always wear a seatbelt.. ", "description": "The medical term for a knocked out tooth is \"avulsed\" tooth.", "Causes": "Tooth accidents are commonly caused by:Accidental falls, Sports-related trauma, Fighting, Car accidents, Biting on hard food . "}, "Bone marrow culture": {"description": "Bone marrow culture is an examination of the soft, fatty tissue found inside certain bones. The bone marrow tissue produces blood cells. This test is done to look for an infection inside the bone marrow."}, "Bathroom safety - children": {"description": "To prevent accidents in the bathroom, never leave your child alone in the bathroom. Keep bathrooms closed when they are not being used."}, "Brushing your infant's teeth": {"description": "Teach children to brush their own teeth. Be a role model and show your children how you floss and brush your teeth every day. Most children can brush their teeth on their own by the time they are 7 or 8 years old."}, "Biliary system": {"description": "The biliary system includes the gallbladder, bile ducts and certain cells inside the liver, and bile ducts outside the liver."}, "Blindness - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on blindness:"}, "Broken collarbone - aftercare": {"description": "Fracture - collarbone; Fracture - clavicle"}, "Back pain - returning to work": {"description": "To help prevent reinjuring your back at work, or hurting it in the first place, follow these tips, learn how to lift the right way, and make changes at work, if needed. "}, "Bacterial gastroenteritis": {"description": "Bacterial gastroenteritis is inflammation of the stomach and intestines caused by bacteria.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramps", "Abdominal pain", "Bloody stools", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea and vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine you for signs of food poisoning. These may include pain in the stomach and signs your body does not have as much water and fluids as it should (dehydration).Lab tests may be done on the food or a stool sample to find out what germ is causing your symptoms. However, these tests do not always show the cause of the diarrhea.Tests may also be done to look for white blood cells in the stool. This is a sign of infection.", "Causes": "Bacterial gastroenteritis can affect one person or a group of people who all ate the same food. It is commonly called food poisoning. It often occurs after eating at picnics, school cafeterias, large social gatherings, or restaurants.The germs may get into your food (called contamination) in many ways:Meat or poultry may come into contact with bacteria when the animal is processed., Water that is used during growing or shipping may contain animal or human waste., Improper food handling or preparation may occur in grocery stores, restaurants, or homes. . Food poisoning often occurs from eating or drinking:Food prepared by someone who did not wash their hands properly, Food prepared using unclean cooking utensils, cutting boards, or other tools, Dairy products or food containing mayonnaise (such as coleslaw or potato salad) that have been out of the refrigerator too long, Frozen or refrigerated foods that are not stored at the proper temperature or are not reheated properly, Raw fish or oysters, Raw fruits or vegetables that have not been washed well, Raw vegetable or fruit juices and dairy products (look for the word \"pasteurized\" to make sure the food is safe to eat or drink), Undercooked meats or eggs, Water from a well or stream, or city or town water that has not been treated . Many different types of bacteria can cause bacterial gastroenteritis, including:Campylobacter jejuni, E. coli, Salmonella, Shigella, Staphylococcus, Yersinia . ", "Prevention": "Take precautions to prevent food poisoning.", "Treatment": "You will usually recover from the most common types of bacterial gastroenteritis in a couple of days. The goal is to make you feel better and avoid dehydration.Drinking enough fluids and learning what to eat will help ease symptoms. You may need to:Manage the diarrhea, Control nausea and vomiting, Get plenty of rest. If you have diarrhea and are unable to drink or keep down fluids because of nausea or vomiting, you may need fluids through a vein (IV). Young children may be at extra risk from getting dehydrated. If you take diuretics (\"water pills\"), talk to your health care provider. You may need to stop taking the diuretic while you have diarrhea. Never stop or change your medicines without first talking to your health care provider.Antibiotics are not prescribed very often for most common types of bacterial gastroenteritis. If diarrhea is very severe or you have a weakened immune system, antibiotics may be needed.You can buy medicines at the drugstore that can help stop or slow diarrhea. Do not use these medicines without talking to your health care provider if you have bloody diarrhea, a fever, or the diarrhea is severe., Do not give these medicines to children.. "}, "Bone scan": {"description": "A bone scan is an imaging test that shows areas of increased or decreased bone turnover (metabolism)."}, "Birth control and family planning": {"description": "Your choice of a birth control method depends on a number of factors, including your health, how often you have sex, and whether or not you want children."}, "Bonding with your newborn": {"description": "It is this first relationship with you that teaches babies to feel secure and good about themselves with other people. They learn to trust you because they know you are paying attention to them and taking care of them. Babies that have strong bonds with their parents are more likely to trust others and have good relationships as adults."}, "Breath odor": {"description": "Breath odor is the scent of the air you breathe out of your mouth. Unpleasant breath odor is commonly called bad breath.", "Causes": "Bad breath can be caused by:Abscessed tooth, Alcoholism, Cavities, Dentures, Eating certain foods, such as cabbage, garlic, or raw onions, Consumption of coffee and not well pH-balanced diet, Object stuck in the nose (usually happens in kids); often a white, yellow, or bloody discharge from one nostril, GERD, Gum disease (gingivitis, gingivostomatitis), Impacted tooth, Lung infection, Poor dental hygiene, Sinusitis, Throat infection, Tobacco smoking, Vitamin supplements (especially in large doses), Use of certain medications, including insulin shots, triamterene, and paraldehyde . Diseases that may be associated with breath odor: Acute necrotizing ulcerative gingivitis, Acute necrotizing ulcerative mucositis, Acute renal failure, Bowel obstruction (can cause breath to smell like feces), Bronchiectasis, Chronic kidney failure (can cause breath to smell like ammonia), Diabetes (fruity or sweet chemical smell associated with\u00a0ketoacidosis), Esophageal cancer, Gastric carcinoma, Gastrojejunocolic fistula (fruity-smelling breath), Hepatic encephalopathy, Diabetic ketoacidosis, Lung abscess, Ozena, or atrophic rhinitis, Periodontal disease, Pharyngitis, Zenker's diverticulum. "}, "Bone pain or tenderness": {"description": "Bone pain or tenderness is aching or other discomfort in one or more bones.", "Causes": "Bone pain can occur with injuries or conditions such as:Cancer in the bones (primary malignancy), Cancer that has spread to the bones (metastatic malignancy), Disruption of blood supply (as in sickle cell anemia), Infected bone (osteomyelitis), Infection, Injury (trauma), Leukemia, Loss of mineralization (osteoporosis), Overuse, Toddler fracture (a type of stress fracture that occurs in toddlers) . "}, "B and T cell screen": {"description": "A B and T cell screen is a laboratory test to determine the amount of T and B cells (lymphocytes) in the blood."}, "Borderline personality disorder": {"description": "Borderline personality disorder (BPD)\u00a0is a mental health condition in which a person\u00a0has long-term patterns of unstable or turbulent emotions. These inner experiences often\u00a0result in\u00a0impulsive actions and chaotic relationships with other people.", "Possible Complications": "Depression, Drug abuse, Problems with work, family, and social relationships, Suicide attempts and actual suicide . ", "Symptoms": ["Intense fear of being abandoned", "Cannot tolerate being alone", "Frequent feelings of emptiness and boredom", "Frequent displays of inappropriate anger", "Impulsiveness, such as with substance abuse or\u00a0sexual relationships", "Repeated crises and acts of self-injury, such as wrist cutting or overdosing"], "Exams and Tests": "BPD is diagnosed based on a psychological evaluation\u00a0that assesses\u00a0the history and severity of the symptoms.", "Treatment": "Individual talk therapy\u00a0may successfully treat BPD. In addition, group therapy can sometimes be helpful.Medications have less of a role in the treatment of BPD. But in some cases, they can improve mood swings and treat depression or other disorders that may occur with this condition.", "Causes": "Cause of borderline personality disorder\u00a0is unknown. Genetic, family, and social factors are thought to play roles.Risk factors for BPD include:Abandonment in childhood or adolescence, Disrupted family life, Poor communication in the family, Sexual, physical, or emotional\u00a0abuse. This personality disorder tends to occur more often in women and among hospitalized psychiatric patients."}, "Button batteries": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing problems", "Cough", "Pneumonia (if the battery goes unnoticed)", "Possible complete respiratory failure", "Abdominal pain", "Bloody stools", "Cardiovascular collapse (shock)", "Chest pain", "Gastrointestinal inflammation", "Hole in the esophagus", "Nausea", "Metallic taste", "Vomiting (possibly bloody)"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222. "}, "Biliary atresia": {"description": "Biliary atresia is a blockage in the tubes (ducts) that carry a liquid called bile from the liver to the gallbladder.", "Possible Complications": "Infection, Irreversible cirrhosis, Liver failure, Surgical complications, including failure of the Kasai procedure. ", "Symptoms": ["Dark urine", "Enlarged spleen", "Floating stools", "Foul-smelling stools", "Pale or clay-colored stools", "Slow growth", "Slow or no weight gain "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam, which includes feeling the patient's belly area. The doctor may feel an enlarged liver.Tests to diagnose biliary atresia include:Abdominal x-ray, Abdominal ultrasound, Blood tests to check total and direct bilirubin levels, Hepatobiliary iminodiacetic acid (HIDA) scan, also called cholescintigraphy, to help determine whether the bile ducts and gallbladder are working properly, Liver biopsy to determine the severity of cirrhosis or to rule out other causes of jaundice, X-ray of the bile ducts (cholangiogram). ", "Treatment": "An operation called the Kasai procedure is done to connect the liver to the small intestine. The abnormal ducts are bypassed. It is most successful if done before the baby is 8 weeks old. However, a liver transplant may still be needed.", "Causes": "Biliary atresia occurs when the bile ducts inside or outside the liver do not develop normally. The reason why this happens is unknown. The bile ducts help remove waste from the liver and carry salts that help the small intestine break down (digest) fat.In babies with biliary atresia, bile flow from the liver to the gallbladder is blocked. This can lead to liver damage and cirrhosis of the liver, which can be deadly. "}, "Breast cancer": {"description": "In rare cases, breast cancer can start in other areas of the breast.", "Possible Complications": "You may experience side effects or complications from cancer treatment. These may include temporary pain or swelling of the breast and surrounding area. Ask your doctor about the possible side effects from treatment.", "Symptoms": ["Breast lump or lump in the armpit that is hard, has uneven edges, and usually does not hurt", "Change in the size, shape, or feel of the breast or nipple -- for example, you may have redness, dimpling, or puckering that looks like the skin of an orange", "Fluid from the nipple -- may be bloody, clear to yellow, green,\u00a0or look like pus ", "Bone pain", "Breast pain or discomfort", "Skin ulcers", "Swelling of\u00a0the lymph nodes in the\u00a0armpit (next to the breast with cancer)", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will ask about your symptoms and risk factors. Then the doctor will perform a physical exam. The exam includes both breasts, armpits, and the neck and chest area.Tests used to diagnose and monitor patients with breast cancer may include:Breast MRI to help better identify the breast lump or evaluate an abnormal change on a mammogram, Breast ultrasound to show whether the lump is solid or fluid-filled, Breast biopsy, using methods such as needle aspiration, ultrasound-guided, stereotactic, or open. \u00a0CT scan to\u00a0check if the cancer has spread outside the breast\u00a0, Mammography to screen for breast cancer or help identify the breast lump, PET scan to check if the cancer has spread, Sentinel lymph node biopsy to\u00a0check if the cancer has spread to the lymph nodes . If your doctor learns that you do have breast cancer, more tests will be done. This is\u00a0called staging, which checks if the cancer has spread. Staging helps guide treatment and follow-up. It also\u00a0gives you\u00a0an idea of what to expect in the future.Breast cancer stages range from 0 to IV. The higher the stage, the more advanced the cancer.", "Treatment": "Treatment is based on many factors, including:Type and stage of the cancer, Whether the cancer is sensitive to certain hormones, Whether the cancer overproduces (overexpresses)\u00a0the HER2/neu gene. Cancer treatments may include:Chemotherapy, which uses\u00a0medicines to kill cancer cells., Radiation therapy, which is\u00a0used\u00a0to destroy cancerous tissue., Surgery to\u00a0remove cancerous tissue:\u00a0A lumpectomy removes the breast lump; mastectomy removes all or part of the breast and possible nearby structures., Targeted therapy uses\u00a0medicine\u00a0to attack the gene changes in cancer cells. Hormone therapy is an example of targeted therapy. It blocks certain hormones that fuel cancer growth.. Cancer treatment\u00a0can be local or systemic:Local treatments involve only the area of disease. Radiation and surgery are forms of local treatment. They are most effective when the cancer has not spread outside the breast., Systemic treatments affect the entire body. Chemotherapy and hormonal therapy are types of systemic treatment.. Most women receive a combination of treatments. For women with stage I, II, or III breast cancer, the main goal is to treat the cancer and prevent it from returning (curing). For women with stage IV cancer, the goal is to improve symptoms and help them live longer. In most cases, stage IV breast cancer cannot be cured.Stage 0 and ductal carcinoma\u00a0-- Lumpectomy plus radiation or mastectomy is the standard treatment., Stage I and II -- Lumpectomy plus radiation or mastectomy with lymph node removal is the standard treatment. Chemotherapy, hormonal therapy, and other targeted therapy may also be used after surgery., Stage III -- Treatment involves surgery, possibly followed by chemotherapy, hormone therapy, and other targeted therapy., Stage IV -- Treatment may involve surgery, radiation, chemotherapy, hormone therapy, other targeted therapy, or a combination of these treatments.. After treatment, some women continue to take medicines for a time. All women continue to have blood tests, mammograms, and other tests after treatment.Women who have had a mastectomy may have reconstructive breast surgery. This will be done either at the time of mastectomy or later.", "Prevention": "Talk to your health care provider about how often you should have mammogram. Early breast cancers found by a mammogram have a good chance of being cured.Tamoxifen is approved for breast cancer prevention in women aged 35 and older who are at high risk. Discuss this with your doctor.Women at very high risk\u00a0of breast cancer may consider preventive (prophylactic) mastectomy. This is surgery to\u00a0remove\u00a0the breasts before breast cancer is diagnosed. Possible candidates include: Women who have already had one breast removed due to cancer, Women with a strong family history of breast cancer, Women with genes or genetic mutations that raise their risk of breast cancer (such as BRCA1 or BRCA2). Many risk factors, such as your genes and family history, cannot be controlled.\u00a0But making healthy lifestyle changes may reduce your overall chance of getting cancer. This includes:Eating healthy foods, Maintaining a healthy weight, Limiting alcohol consumption to one drink per day (women at high risk\u00a0of breast cancer should not drink alcohol at all). ", "Causes": "Over the course of a lifetime, 1 in 8 women will be diagnosed with breast cancer.Risk factors you cannot change include:Age and gender -- Your risk of developing breast cancer increases as you get older. Most advanced breast cancer cases are found in women over age 50. Men can\u00a0also get breast cancer. But they are 100 times less likely than women to get breast cancer., Family history of breast cancer -- You may also have a higher risk of breast cancer if you have a close relative who has had breast, uterine, ovarian, or colon cancer. , Genes -- The most common gene defects are found in the BRCA1 and BRCA2 genes. These genes normally produce proteins that protect you from cancer. If a parent passes you a defective gene, you have an increased risk of breast cancer. Women with one of these defects have up to an 80% chance of getting breast cancer sometime during their life., Menstrual cycle -- Women who got their periods early (before age 12) or went through menopause late (after age 55) have an increased risk of breast cancer.. Other risk factors include:Alcohol use -- Drinking more than 1\u00a0to 2 glasses of alcohol a day may increase your risk of breast cancer., Childbirth -- Women who have never had children or who had\u00a0their first child\u00a0after age 30 have an increased risk of breast cancer. Being pregnant more than once or becoming pregnant at an early age reduces your risk of breast cancer., DES -- Women who took diethylstilbestrol (DES) to prevent miscarriage may have an increased risk of breast cancer after age 40. This drug was given to the women in the 1940s\u00a0through the\u00a01960s., Hormone therapy (HT) -- You have a higher risk of breast cancer if you received hormone therapy with estrogen for several years or more., Obesity -- Obesity has been linked to breast cancer, although this link is not\u00a0well understood. Experts think that obese women produce more estrogen. This\u00a0may fuel the development of breast cancer., Radiation -- If you received radiation therapy as a child or young adult to treat cancer of the chest area, you have a very high risk of developing breast cancer. The younger you started such radiation and the higher the dose, the higher your risk. This is especially true if the radiation was given during breast development.. Breast implants, using antiperspirants, and wearing underwire bras do not\u00a0increase the risk of breast cancer. There is also no evidence of a direct link between breast cancer and pesticides."}, "Bile duct obstruction": {"description": "Related topics include:", "Possible Complications": "Left untreated, the possible complications include infections, sepsis, and liver disease, such as biliary cirrhosis.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain in the upper right side", "Dark urine", "Fever", "Itching", "Jaundice (yellow skin color)", "Nausea and vomiting", "Pale-colored stools"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse will examine you and feel your belly. The following blood test results could be due to a possible blockage:Increased bilirubin level, Increased alkaline phosphatase level, Increased liver enzymes . The following tests may be used to investigate a possible blocked bile duct:Abdominal ultrasound, Abdominal CT scan, Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), Percutaneous transhepatic cholangiogram (PTCA), Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) . A blocked bile duct may also alter the results of the following tests: Amylase blood test, Gallbladder radionuclide scan, Lipase blood test, Prothrombin time (PT), Urine bilirubin. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to relieve the blockage. Stones may be removed using an endoscope during an ERCP.In some cases, surgery is required to bypass the blockage. The gallbladder will usually be surgically removed if the blockage is caused by gallstones. Your health care provider may prescribe antibiotics if an infection is suspected.If the blockage is caused by cancer, the duct may need to be widened. This procedure is called endoscope or percutaneous (through the skin next to the liver) dilation. A tube may need to be placed to allow drainage.", "Prevention": "Be aware of any risk factors you have, so that you can get prompt diagnosis and treatment if a bile duct becomes blocked. The\u00a0blockage itself may not be preventable.", "Causes": "Bile is a liquid released by the liver. It contains cholesterol, bile salts, and waste products such as bilirubin. Bile salts help your body break down (digest) fats. Bile passes out of the liver through the bile ducts and is stored in the gallbladder. After a meal, it is released into the small intestine.When the bile ducts become blocked, bile builds up in the liver, and jaundice (yellow color of the skin) develops due to the increasing levels of bilirubin in the blood.The possible causes of a blocked bile duct include:Cysts of the common bile duct, Enlarged lymph nodes in the porta hepatis, Gallstones, Inflammation of the bile ducts, Narrowing of the bile ducts from scarring, Injury from gallbladder surgery, Tumors of the bile ducts or pancreas, Tumors that have spread to the biliary system, Liver and bile duct worms (flukes). The risk factors include:History of gallstones, chronic pancreatitis, or pancreatic cancer, Injury to the abdominal area, Recent biliary surgery, Recent biliary cancer (such as bile duct cancer) . The blockage can also be caused by infections. This is more common in persons with weakened immune systems."}, "Beckwith-Wiedemann syndrome": {"description": "Beckwith-Wiedemann syndrome is a congenital (present from birth) growth disorder that causes large body size, large organs, and other symptoms.", "Possible Complications": "Development of tumors, Feeding problems, Hypoglycemia, Respiratory difficulties from obstruction due to large tongue, Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal wall defect: umbilical hernia or omphalocele", "Creases in ear lobes", "Enlargement of some organs and tissues", "External ear (pinna) abnormalities and low-set ears", "Large size for a newborn (large for gestational age)", "Large, prominent eyes", "Large tongue, sometimes protruding", "Lethargy", "Low blood sugar (hypoglycemia)", "Mild microcephaly", "Poor feeding", "Separated abdominal muscles (diastasis recti)", "Seizures", "Undescended testicles (cryptorchidism)"], "Exams and Tests": "The signs of Beckwith-Wiedemann syndrome include:A ridge in the forehead caused by premature closure of the bones (metopic ridge), Enlarged fontanelle (soft spot), Enlarged kidneys, liver, and spleen, Large size (90th percentile), Low blood sugar (hypoglycemia). Tests for Beckwith-Wiedemann syndrome include:Blood tests for low sugar and other abnormalities, Chromosomal studies for abnormalities in chromosome 11, MRI or CT scan of the abdomen, Ultrasound of the abdomen, X-ray of the abdomen, X-ray of the long bones. ", "Treatment": "Infants with low blood sugar may be treated fluids given through a vein (intravenous solutions).Defects in the abdominal wall may need to be repaired. The child must be watched closely for the development of tumors.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention for Beckwith-Wiedemann syndrome. Genetic counseling may be of value for families who would like to have additional children.", "Causes": "The cause of Beckwith-Wiedemann syndrome is unknown, but it may be genetic. Most cases are associated with a defect in chromosome number 11.Infancy can be a critical period because of low blood sugar (hypoglycemia), omphalocele (when present), and an increased rate of tumor development. Wilm's tumor and adrenal carcinoma are the most common tumors in patients with this syndrome. "}, "Breast reconstruction - implants ": {"description": "The breast is usually reshaped in two stages, or surgeries. During the first stage,\u00a0a tissue expander is used.\u00a0An implant is placed during the second stage. Sometimes the implant is inserted in the first stage."}, "Bacitracin zinc overdose": {"Symptoms": [], "description": "See also:"}, "Biofeedback": {"description": "Biofeedback is a technique that measures bodily functions and gives you information about them in order to help train you to control them."}, "Bronchoscopic culture": {"description": "Bronchoscopic culture is a laboratory exam to check a piece of tissue or fluid from the lungs for infection-causing organisms."}, "Bile culture": {"description": "Bile culture is a laboratory test to detect disease-causing germs in the biliary system. "}, "Black nightshade poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Dry mouth", "Enlarged (dilated) pupils", "Diarrhea", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting", "Pulse - slow or rapid", "Shock", "Slowed breathing", "Delirium", "Fever", "Hallucinations", "Headache", "Loss of sensation", "Paralysis", "Sweating"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Brain aneurysm repair": {"description": "Brain aneurysm repair is surgery to correct an aneurysm. This is a weak area in a blood vessel wall that causes the vessel to bulge or balloon out and sometimes burst (rupture). It may cause:"}, "Biopsy": {"description": "A biopsy is the removal of a small piece of tissue for laboratory examination."}, "Breast milk jaundice": {"description": "If jaundice lasts past the first week of life in a breastfed baby who is otherwise healthy, the condition may be called \"breast milk jaundice.\"", "Possible Complications": "In true breast milk jaundice, there are usually no complications. However, babies with very high bilirubin levels who do not get the right medical care can have severe effects. ", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Laboratory tests that may be done include:Bilirubin level (total and direct), Blood smear to look at blood cell shapes and sizes, Blood typing, Complete blood count, Reticulocyte count (number of slightly immature red blood cells) . In some cases, a blood test to check for glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase (G6PD) may be done. G6PD is a protein that helps red blood cells work properly.These tests are done to be sure that there are no other, more dangerous causes of the jaundice.", "Treatment": "Treatment will depend on:Your baby's bilirubin level, which naturally rises during the first week of life, How fast the bilirubin level has been going up, Whether your baby was born early, How your baby has been feeding, How old your baby is now. Often, the bilirubin level is normal for the baby's age. Newborns normally have higher levels than older children and adults. In this case, no treatment is needed, other than close follow-up.You can prevent the kind of jaundice that is caused by too little breastfeeding by making sure your baby is getting enough milk.Feed about 10 to 12 times each day, starting on the first day. Feed whenever baby is alert, sucking on the hands, and smacking the lips. This is how babies let you know they are hungry., If you wait until your baby cries, feeding won't go as well., Give babies unlimited time at each breast, as long as they are sucking and swallowing steadily. Full babies will relax, unclench their hands, and drift off to sleep. . If breastfeeding isn't going well, get help from a lactation consultant or your doctor as soon as possible. Babies born before 37 or 38 weeks usually need extra help. Their moms often need to express or pump to make enough milk while they are learning to breastfeed.Nursing or pumping more often (up to 12 times a day) will increase the amount of milk the baby gets, and can cause the bilirubin level to drop.Ask your doctor before deciding to give your newborn formula.It is best to keep breastfeeding. Babies need their mothers' milk. Although a baby full of formula can be less demanding, formula feeding may cause you to make less milk., If the milk supply is low because baby's demand has been low (for example, if baby was born early), you may have to use formula for a brief time. You should also use a pump to help make more breast milk until baby is better able to nurse., Spending \"skin to skin\" time can also help babies feed better and help moms make more milk.. In some cases, if babies aren't able to feed well, fluids are given through a vein to help increase their fluid levels and lower bilirubin levels.To help break down the bilirubin if it is too high, your baby may be placed under special blue lights (phototherapy). You may be able to do phototherapy at home.", "Prevention": "Breast milk jaundice cannot be prevented, and it is not harmful. But when a baby's color is yellow, you must have the baby's bilirubin level checked right away. If the bilirubin level is high, it is important to make sure there are no other medical problems.", "Causes": "Bilirubin is a yellow pigment that is created as the body gets rid of old red blood cells. The liver helps break down bilirubin so that it can be removed from the body in the stool.It can be normal for newborn babies to be a little yellow between days 1 and 5 of life. The color usually peaks around day 3 or 4.Breast milk jaundice is likely caused by:Factors in a mother's milk that help a baby absorb bilirubin from the intestine, Factors that keep certain proteins in the baby's liver from breaking down bilirubin. Sometimes jaundice occurs when your baby does not get enough breast milk, instead of from the breast milk itself.Babies who are born early (before 37 or 38 weeks) are not always able to feed well., Breast milk jaundice may also happen when feedings are scheduled by the clock (for example, \"every 3 hours for 10 minutes\") or when babies who show signs of hunger are given pacifiers.. Breast milk jaundice may run in families. It occurs just as often in males and females and affects about a third of all newborns who get only their mother's milk."}, "Bezoar": {"description": "A bezoar is a ball of swallowed foreign material (usually hair or fiber) that collects in the stomach and fails to pass through the intestines.", "Possible Complications": "Persistent vomiting can lead to dehydration.", "Symptoms": ["Indigestion", "Stomach upset or distress", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Diarrhea", "Pain", "Gastric ulcers"], "Exams and Tests": "The child may have a lump in the abdomen that can be felt by the health care provider. A barium swallow x-ray will show the mass in the stomach. Sometimes a scope is used (endoscopy) to directly view the bezoar.", "Treatment": "The bezoar may need to be surgically removed (especially trichobezoars, which tend to be large). Sometimes small bezoars can be removed through a scope placed through the mouth and into the stomach (similar to an EGD procedure). Then, follow the prevention measures described.", "Prevention": "If your child has had a hair bezoar in the past, trim the child's hair short so he or she cannot put the ends in the mouth. Keep indigestible materials away from a child\u00a0who has a tendency to put items in the mouth.Be sure to remove the child's access to fuzzy or fiber-filled materials.", "Causes": "Chewing on or eating hair or fuzzy materials (or indigestible materials such as plastic bags) can lead to the formation of a bezoar. The rate is very low and the risk is greater among\u00a0persons with intellectual disability\u00a0or emotionally disturbed children. Generally bezoars are mostly seen in females aged 10 to 19."}, "Branchial cleft cyst ": {"description": "A branchial cleft cyst is a lump that develops in the neck or just below the collarbone. It is a type of birth defect.", "Possible Complications": "The cyst or sinuses may become infected if not removed.", "Symptoms": ["Small pits, lumps, or skin tags at either side of the neck or just below the collarbone", "Fluid drainage from a pit on the neck"], "Exams and Tests": "Your baby's health care provider may be able to diagnose this condition during a physical examination. The following tests may be done: CT scan, MRI scan, Ultrasound. ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics will be given if the cyst or sinuses are infected. Surgery is generally indicated to remove a branchial cyst to prevent complications, such as infections.", "Causes": "Branchial cleft cysts form during development of the embryo. They occur when tissues in the neck and collarbone area (branchial cleft) fail to develop normally.The birth defect may appear as open spaces called cleft sinuses, which may develop on one or both sides of the neck. A branchial cleft cyst may form from fluid drained from a sinus. The cyst or sinus can become infected."}, "Bone marrow biopsy": {"description": "A bone marrow biopsy is the removal of marrow from inside bone. Bone marrow is the soft tissue inside bones that helps form blood cells. It is found in the hollow part of most bones."}, "Baking soda overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Constipation", "Convulsions", "Diarrhea", "Feeling of being full", "Frequent urination", "Irritability", "Muscle spasms", "Muscle weakness", "Vomiting"], "description": "See also: Baking powder overdose"}, "Birth control pills - overview": {"description": "Progestins also make the mucus around a woman's cervix thick and sticky. This helps prevent sperm from entering the uterus. "}, "Bleeding disorders": {"description": "Related problems include:", "Possible Complications": "Bleeding in the brain, Severe bleeding (usually from the gastrointestinal tract or injuries). Other complications can occur, depending on the disorder.", "Symptoms": ["\u00b7\u00a0\u00a0 Bleeding into joints", "\u00b7\u00a0\u00a0 Excessive bruising", "\u00b7\u00a0\u00a0 Heavy bleeding", "\u00b7\u00a0\u00a0 Heavy menstrual bleeding", "\u00b7\u00a0\u00a0 Nosebleeds", "\u00b7\u00a0\u00a0 Excess bleeding with surgical procedures"], "Exams and Tests": "Complete blood count (CBC), Bleeding time, Partial thromboplastin time (PTT), Platelet aggregation test, Prothrombin time (PT). ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the type of disorder. It may include:Factor replacement, Fresh frozen plasma transfusion, Platelet transfusion, Other therapies. ", "Prevention": "Prevention depends on the specific disorder.", "Causes": "Watch this video about:Blood clottingNormal blood clotting involves as many as 20 different plasma proteins. These are known as blood clotting or coagulation factors. These factors interact with other chemicals to form a substance called fibrin that stops bleeding.Problems can occur when certain coagulation factors are low or missing. Bleeding problems can range from mild to severe.Some bleeding disorders are present at birth and are passed through families (inherited). Others develop from:Illnesses such as vitamin K deficiency or severe liver disease, Treatments such as the use of drugs to stop blood clots (anticoagulants) or the long-term use of antibiotics. Bleeding disorders can also result from a problem with the number or function of the blood cells that promote blood clotting (platelets). These disorders can also be either inherited or develop later (acquired). The side effects of certain drugs often lead to the acquired forms."}, "Blood sugar test - blood": {"description": "Hormones made in the body help control blood glucose levels."}, "Breathing difficulty": {"description": "Breathing difficulty may involve:", "Causes": "Shortness of breath has many different causes. For example, heart disease can cause breathlessness if your heart is unable to pump enough blood to supply oxygen to your body. If your brain, muscles, or other body organs do not get enough oxygen, a sense of breathlessness may occur.Breathing difficulty may also be due to problems with the lungs, airways, or other health problems.Problems with the lungs:Blood clot in the arteries of the lungs (pulmonary embolism), Bronchiolitis, Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), such as chronic bronchitis or emphysema, Other lung disease\r\n , Pneumonia, Pulmonary hypertension. Problems with the airways leading to the lungs:Blockage of the air passages in your nose, mouth, or throat, Choking on something stuck in the airways, Croup, Epiglottitis. Problems with the heart:Angina, Heart attack, Heart defects from birth (congenital heart disease), Heart failure, Heart rhythm disturbances (arrhythmias). Other:Allergies (such as to mold, dander, or pollen), Climbing to high altitudes where there is less oxygen in the air, Compression of the chest wall, Dust in the environment, Emotional distress, such as anxiety, Hiatal hernia, Obesity, Panic attacks. "}, "Breathing - slowed or stopped": {"description": "Breathing that slows down or stops from any cause is called apnea.", "Causes": "Apnea can occur for many different reasons. The most common causes of apnea in infants and small children are usually different from the most common causes in adults.Common causes of apnea in infants and young children include:Asthma, Bronchiolitis (inflammation and narrowing of the smaller breathing structures in the lungs)\r\n , Choking, Encephalitis (brain inflammation and infection)\r\n , Gastroesophageal reflux (heartburn), Holding one's breath, Meningitis (inflammation and infection of the tissue lining the brain and spinal cord)\r\n , Pneumonia, Premature birth, Seizures. Common causes of apnea in adults include:Asthma or other lung diseases, Cardiac arrest, Choking, Drug overdose, especially due to alcohol, narcotic painkillers, barbiturates, anesthetics, and other depressants , Obstructive sleep apnea. Other causes of apnea include:Head or brainstem injury, Irregular heartbeat , Metabolic (body chemical, mineral, and acid-base)\u00a0disorders, Near drowning, Stroke and other neurological disorders. "}, "Bullae": {"description": "Bullae are large blisters\u00a0on the skin that are filled with clear fluid. They can be caused by many different skin conditions."}, "Body mass index": {"description": "Your BMI alone cannot predict your health risk, but most experts say that a BMI greater than 30 (obesity) is unhealthy. No matter what your BMI is, exercise can help reduce your risk of heart disease and diabetes. Remember to always talk to your provider before starting an exercise program."}, "Balanitis": {"description": "Balanitis is swelling of the foreskin and head of the penis.", "Possible Complications": "Long-term inflammation or infection can:Scar and narrow the opening of the penis (meatal stricture), Make it difficult and painful to retract the foreskin to expose the tip of the penis (a condition called phimosis), Make it difficult to move the foreskin over the head of the penis (a condition called paraphimosis), Affect the blood supply to the tip of the penis, Increase the risk of penile cancer. ", "Symptoms": ["Redness of foreskin or penis", "Other rashes on the head of the penis", "Foul-smelling discharge", "Painful penis and foreskin"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider may be diagnosed the problem with only an exam. However, you may need skin tests for viruses, fungi, or bacteria. A skin biopsy may also be needed.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of the balanitis. Antibiotic pills or creams are used to treat when balanitis that is caused by bacteria. , Steroid creams may help balanitis that occurs with skin diseases. , Anti-fungal creams will be prescribed if it is due to a fungus.. Circumcision may be the best option in severe cases. If you cannot pull back (retract) the foreskin to clean it, you may need to be circumcised.", "Prevention": "Good hygiene can prevent most cases of balanitis. When you bathe, pull back the foreskin to clean and dry the area under it.", "Causes": "Balanitis is most often caused by poor hygiene in uncircumcised men. Other possible causes include:Diseases such as reactive arthritis and lichen sclerosis et atrophicus, Infection, Harsh soaps, Not rinsing soap off properly while bathing, Uncontrolled diabetes. "}, "Bathing an infant": {"description": "Bath time can be fun, but you need to be very careful with your child around water. Most drowning deaths in children happen at home, often when a child is left alone in the bathroom. DO NOT leave your child alone around water, not even for a few seconds."}, "Bone mineral density test": {"description": "This test helps your health care provider detect osteoporosis and predict your risk of bone fractures."}, "Breast pain": {"Prevention": "There is not really any way to prevent most breast pain, but wearing a well-fitting bra for support may help.", "description": "\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\nBreast pain is any discomfort or pain in the breast. \r\n\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\n \r\n", "Causes": "Some amount of breast tenderness is normal. The discomfort may be caused by hormone changes from:Menopause (unless a woman is taking hormone replacement therapy), Menstruation and premenstrual syndrome (PMS), Pregnancy -- breast tenderness tends to be more common during the first trimester and in women who become pregnant at a young age, Puberty in both girls and boys. Soon after having a baby, a woman's breasts may become swollen with milk. This can be very painful. If you also have an area of redness, call your health care provider. Breastfeeding itself may also cause breast pain.Fibrocystic breast changes are\u00a0a common cause of breast pain. Fibrocystic breast tissue contains lumps that tend to be more tender just before your menstrual period.Certain medications may also cause breast pain, including: Oxymetholone (Anadrol)\r\n  , Chlorpromazine\r\n  , Diuretics, Digitalis preparations\r\n  , Methyldopa (Aldomet)\r\n  , Spironolactone (Aldactone)\r\n  . Shingles can lead to pain in the breast if the painful blistering rash appears on the skin over one of your breasts."}, "Butter, margarine, and cooking oils": {"description": "Some guidelines for healthier cooking:"}, "Birthmarks - red": {"description": "Red birthmarks are skin markings created by blood vessels close to the skin surface. They develop before or shortly after birth.", "Possible Complications": "The following complications can occur from birthmarks:Emotional distress because of appearance, Discomfort or bleeding from vascular birthmarks (occasional), Interference with vision or bodily functions, Scarring or complications after surgery to remove them. ", "Symptoms": ["Marks on the skin that look like blood vessels", "Skin rash or lesion that is red "], "Exams and Tests": "A health care provider should examine all birthmarks. Diagnosis is based on how the birthmark looks.Tests to confirm deeper birthmarks include:Biopsy, CT scan, MRI of the area . ", "Treatment": "Many strawberry hemangiomas, cavernous hemangiomas, and salmon patches are temporary and do not need treatment.Port wine stains may not need treatment unless they:Affect your appearance, Cause emotional distress, Are painful, Change in size, shape, or color . Most permanent birthmarks are not treated before a child reaches school age or the birthmark is causing symptoms. Port wine stains on the face are an exception. They should be treated at a young age to prevent emotional and social problems. A laser can be used to treat them. Concealing cosmetics (such as Covermark) may hide permanent birthmarks.Oral or injected cortisone may reduce the size of a hemangioma that is growing quickly and affecting vision or vital organs.Other treatments for red birthmarks include:Beta-blocker medicines, Freezing (cryotherapy), Laser surgery, Surgical removal . ", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent birthmarks.", "Causes": "There are two main categories of birthmarks:Red birthmarks are made up of blood vessels close to the skin surface. These are called vascular birthmarks., Pigmented birthmarks are areas in which the color of the birthmark is different from the color of the rest of the skin. . Hemangiomas are a common type of vascular birthmark. Their cause is unknown. Their color is caused by the growth of blood vessels at the site. Different types of hemangiomas include:Strawberry hemangiomas (strawberry mark, nevus vascularis, capillary hemangioma, hemangioma simplex) may develop several weeks after birth. They may appear anywhere on the body, but are most often found on the neck and face. These areas consist of small blood vessels that are very close together., Cavernous hemangiomas (angioma cavernosum, cavernoma) are similar to strawberry hemangiomas but they are deeper and may appear as a red-blue spongy area of tissue filled with blood., Salmon patches (stork bites) are very common. Up to half of all newborns have them. They are small, pink, flat spots made up of small blood vessels that can be seen through the skin. They are most common on the forehead, eyelids, upper lip, between the eyebrows, and on the back of the neck. Salmon patches may be more noticeable when an infant cries or during temperature changes., Port wine stains are flat hemangiomas made of expanded tiny blood vessels (capillaries). Port wine stains on the face may be associated with Sturge-Weber syndrome. They are most often located on the face. Their size varies from very small to over half of the body's surface. . "}, "Benzene poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Burning sensation in the nose and throat", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Irregular heartbeat", "Rapid heartbeat", "Rapid, shallow breathing", "Tight chest", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Nervousness", "Convulsions", "Euphoria (feeling of being drunk)", "Headache", "Staggering", "Tremors", "Unconsciousness", "Weakness", "Pale skin", "Small red dots on skin"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Bicuspid aortic valve ": {"description": "The aortic valve regulates blood flow from the heart into the aorta, the major blood vessel that brings blood to the body.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of bicuspid aortic valve include:Congestive heart failure, Leakage of blood through the valve back into the heart, Narrowing of the valve's opening. ", "Symptoms": ["Baby or child tires easily", "Chest pain", "Difficulty breathing", "Rapid and irregular heartbeat (palpitations)", "Loss of consciousness (fainting)", "Pale skin"], "Exams and Tests": "Signs of a bicuspid aortic valve may include:Enlarged heart, Heart murmur, Weak pulse in the wrists and ankles. Tests that may show a bicuspid aortic valve include:Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the heart, Ultrasound of the heart (echocardiogram). If the health care provider suspects complications or additional heart defects, other tests may include:Chest x-rays, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), Test of the electrical activity in the heart (electrocardiogram), X-ray of the heart's blood vessels using a special dye (angiography). ", "Treatment": "The infant or child may need surgery to repair a leaky or narrowed valve, if complications are severe.A narrowed valve can also be opened through cardiac catheterization. A fine tube (catheter) is directed to the heart and into the narrow opening of the aortic valve. A balloon attached to the end of the tube is inflated, to make the opening of the valve larger.Medicine may be needed to relieve symptoms or prevent complications.Medications may include:ACE inhibitors, Angiotensin receptor blockers, Drugs that make the heart muscle pump harder (inotropic agents), \"Water pills\" (diuretics) . ", "Prevention": "Bicuspid aortic valves run in families. If you know of this condition in your family, speak to your health care provider before becoming pregnant. There is no known way to prevent the condition.", "Causes": "The aortic valve allows oxygen-rich blood to flow from the heart to the aorta. It prevents the blood from flowing back from the aorta into the heart when the pumping chamber relaxes.Bicuspid aortic valve is present at birth (congenital). An abnormal aortic valve develops during the early weeks of pregnancy, when the baby's heart develops. The cause of this problem is unclear, but it is the most common congenital heart disease. It often runs in families.The bicuspid aortic valve may not be completely effective at stopping blood from leaking back into the heart. This is called aortic regurgitation. The aortic valve may also become stiff and not open up as well, causing the heart to have to pump harder than usual to get blood past the valve (aortic stenosis). The aorta may become enlarged with this condition.This condition is more common among males than females.A bicuspid aortic valve often exists in babies with coarctation of the aorta and other diseases in which there is a blockage to blood flow on the left side of the heart."}, "Brain tumor - children": {"Symptoms": ["Headaches that are worse when waking up in the morning and go away within a few hours", "Headaches that get worse with coughing or exercise, or with a change in body position", "Headaches that occur while sleeping and with at least one other symptom such as vomiting or confusion ", "Changes in personality and behavior", "Unable to concentrate", "Increased sleep", "Memory loss", "Problems with reasoning ", "Gradual loss of movement or feeling in an arm or leg", "Hearing loss with or without dizziness", "Speech difficulty", "Unexpected vision problem (especially if it occurs with a headache), including vision loss (usually of peripheral vision) in one or both eyes, or double vision", "Problems with balance", "Weakness or numbness "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. Infants may have the following physical signs:Bulging fontanelles, Enlarged eyes, No red reflex in the eye, Positive Babinski reflex, Separated sutures . The following tests may be used to detect a brain tumor and identify its location:CT scan of the head, MRI of the brain\u00a0, Examination of the cerebral spinal fluid (CSF). ", "description": "This article focuses on primary brain tumors in children.", "Causes": "The cause of primary brain tumors is unknown. Primary brain tumors may be:Not cancerous (benign), Invasive (spread to nearby areas), Cancerous (malignant). Brain tumors are classified\u00a0based on:The exact site of the tumor, The type of tissue involved, Whether it is cancerous. Brain tumors can directly destroy brain cells. They can also indirectly damage cells by pushing on other parts of the brain. This leads to swelling and increased pressure inside the skull.Tumors can occur at any age. Many tumors are more common at a certain age. In general, brain tumors in children are very rare.COMMON TUMOR TYPESAstrocytomas are usually noncancerous, slow-growing tumors. They commonly develop in children ages 5 through 8. Also called low-grade gliomas, these are the most common brain tumors in children.Medulloblastomas are the most common type of childhood brain cancer. Most medulloblastomas occur before age 10.Ependymomas are a type of childhood brain tumor that can be benign (non-cancerous) or malignant (cancerous). The location and type of ependymoma determine the type of therapy needed to control the tumor.Brainstem gliomas are very rare tumors that occur almost only in children. The average age at which they develop is about 6. The tumor may grow very large before causing symptoms.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the size and type of tumor and the child's general health. The goals of treatment may be to cure the tumor, relieve symptoms, and improve brain function or the child's comfort.Surgery is needed for most primary brain tumors. Some tumors may be completely removed. In cases where the tumor cannot be removed, surgery may help reduce pressure and relieve symptoms. Chemotherapy or radiation therapy may be used for certain tumors.The following are treatments for specific types of tumors:Astrocytoma -- Surgery to remove the tumor is the main treatment. Chemotherapy and/or radiation therapy may also be necessary., Brainstem gliomas -- Surgery is usually not possible because of the tumor's location in the brain. Radiation is used to shrink the tumor and prolong life., Ependymomas -- Treatment includes surgery. Radiation and chemotherapy may be necessary., Medulloblastomas -- Surgery alone does not cure this type of tumor. Chemotherapy with or without radiation is often used in combination with surgery.. Medicines used to treat primary brain tumors in children include:Corticosteroids to reduce brain swelling, Diuretics (water pills) to reduce brain swelling and pressure, Anticonvulsants to reduce or prevent seizures, Pain medicines . Comfort measures, safety measures, physical therapy, occupational therapy, and other such steps may be required to improve quality of life."}, "Brachial plexus": {"description": "The brachial plexus is a group of nerves that run from the lower neck through the upper shoulder area. These nerves allow the shoulder,\u00a0arm, forearm, and hand to move and feel things."}, "Burns - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on burns:"}, "Back pain and sports": {"description": "If you had a back injury, talk with your health care provider about keeping your back safe when you return to sports."}, "Blastomycosis": {"description": "Blastomycosis is an infection caused by breathing in the Blastomyces dermatitidis fungus. The fungus is found in decaying wood and soil.", "Possible Complications": "Large sores with pus (abscesses), Return of the infection (relapse or disease recurrence), Side effects from drugs such as amphotericin B. ", "Symptoms": ["Bone and joint pain", "Chest pain", "Cough (may produce brown or bloody mucus)", "Fatigue", "Fever and night sweats", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling (malaise)", "Muscle pain", "Unintentional weight loss", "May look like warts or ulcers", "Are usually painless", "Vary in color from gray to violet", "May appear in the nose and mouth", "Bleed easily and form ulcers "], "Exams and Tests": "Chest CT scan, Chest x-ray, Skin biopsy, Sputum culture and examination, Tissue biopsy, Urine culture. ", "Treatment": "You may not need to take medicine for a mild blastomycosis infection that stays in the lungs. Your doctor may\u00a0recommend the following antifungal medicines when the disease is severe or spreads outside of the lungs.Fluconazole, Itraconazole, Ketoconazole . Amphotericin B may be used for severe infections.Follow up regularly with your doctor to make sure the infection does not return.", "Prevention": "Avoiding travel to areas where the infection is known to occur may help prevent exposure to the fungus, but this may not always be possible. ", "Causes": "You can get blastomyocosis by contact with moist soil, most commonly where there is rotting wood and leaves. The fungus enters the body through the lungs, where the infection starts. The fungus then spreads to other parts of the body. The disease may affect the skin, bones and joints, and other areas.Blastomycosis is rare. It is found in the central and southeastern United States, and in Canada, India, Israel, Saudi Arabia, and Africa.The key risk factor for the disease is contact with infected soil. It most often affects people with weakened immune systems, such as those with HIV or who have had an organ transplant. Men are more likely to be affected than women."}, "Broad nasal bridge": {"description": "Broad nasal bridge is a\u00a0widening of the top part of the nose.", "Causes": "Basal cell nevus syndrome, Fetal hydantoin effect (mother took the drug hydantoin during pregnancy), Normal facial feature, Other congenital syndromes. "}, "BRCA1 and BRCA2 gene testing": {"description": "The BRCA1 and BRCA2 gene test is a blood test that can tell you if you have a higher risk of getting cancer. The name BRCA comes from the first two letters of breast cancer."}, "Blood typing": {"description": "Your blood type (or blood group) depends on the types that are been passed down to you from your parents."}, "Blepharitis": {"description": "Blepharitis is swelling or inflammation of the eyelids. Dandruff-like debris builds up at the base of the eyelashes as well.", "Symptoms": ["Red, irritated eyelids", "Scales that stick to the base of the eyelashes", "Burning feeling in the eyelids", "Crusting, itching and swelling of the eyelids"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider can most often make the diagnosis by looking at the eyelids during an eye exam.", "Causes": "In people with blepharitis, too much oil is produced by the glands near the eyelid. The exact reason for this problem is not known. A breakdown of these oils may lead to blepharitis.Blepharitis is more likely to be seen in people with:A skin condition called seborrheic dermatitis or seborrhea. This problem involves the scalp, eyebrows, eyelids, skin behind the ears, and the creases of the nose, Allergies that affect the eyelashes (less common), Excess growth of the bacteria that are normally found on the skin, Rosacea, which is a skin condition that causes a red rash on the face . Blepharitis may be an underlying cause of repeated styes and chalazia. ", "Prevention": "Cleaning the eyelids carefully will help reduce the chances of getting blepharitis. Treat skin conditions that may add to the problem. ", "Treatment": "Cleaning the edges of the eyelid every day will help remove excess bacteria and oil. Your health care provider might recommend using baby shampoo or special cleansers. Using an antibiotic ointment in the eyelid or taking antibiotic pills may help treat the problem. It may also help to take fish oil supplements.If you have blepharitis:Apply warm compresses to your eyes for 5 minutes, at least two times per day., After the warm compresses, gently rub a solution of warm water and no-tears baby shampoo along your eyelid, where the lash meets the lid, using a cotton swab.. "}, "Brain surgery - discharge": {"description": "You have spent some time in the intensive care unit and some more time in a regular hospital room. You may be taking new medicines."}, "Bone marrow transplant": {"description": "Bone marrow is the soft, fatty tissue inside your bones. Stem cells are immature cells in the bone marrow that give rise to all of your blood cells."}, "Blue nightshade poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Dry mouth", "Enlarged (dilated) pupils", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting", "Pulse - slow pulse", "Shock", "Slow breathing", "Delirium", "Fever", "Hallucinations", "Headache", "Loss of sensation", "Paralysis", "Sweating"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "BUN - blood test": {"description": "A test can be done to measure the amount of urea nitrogen in the blood."}, "Bug repellent safety": {"description": "To avoid toxicity from insect repellents:"}, "Benign ear cyst or tumor": {"description": "Benign ear cysts are lumps or growths in the ear. They are noncancerous. ", "Possible Complications": "Hearing loss, if the tumor is large, Infection of the cyst, Infection of the ear canal, Wax trapped in the ear canal. ", "Symptoms": ["Pain (if cysts are in the outside ear canal or if they get infected)", "Small soft skin lumps on, behind, or in front of the ear", "Ear discomfort", "Gradual hearing loss in one ear", "Repeated outer ear infections"], "Exams and Tests": "Benign cysts and tumors are most often found during a routine ear exam. This type of exam may include hearing tests (audiometry) and middle ear testing (tympanometry). When looking into the ear, the doctor may see cysts or benign tumors in the ear canal.Sometimes a CT scan is needed.This disease may also affect the results of the following tests:Caloric stimulation, Electronystagmography. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is not needed if the cyst does not cause pain or affect hearing. If a cyst becomes painful, it may be infected. Treatment may include antibiotics or removal of the cyst.Benign bony tumors may increase in size over time. Surgery may be needed if a benign tumor is painful, interferes with hearing, or leads to frequent ear infections. ", "Causes": "Sebaceous cysts are the most common type of cysts seen in the ear. These sack-like lumps are made up of dead skin cells and oils produced by oil glands in the skin.Places they are likely to be found include: \r\n  Behind the ear\r\n  , \r\n  In the ear canal\r\n  , \r\n  In the earlobe\r\n  , \r\n  On the scalp\r\n  . The exact cause of the problem is unknown. Cysts may occur when oils are produced in a skin gland faster than they can be released from the gland.Benign bony tumors of the ear canal (exostoses and osteomas) are caused by excess growth of bone. Repeated exposure to cold water may increase the risk of benign bony tumors of the ear canal."}, "Blind loop syndrome": {"description": "Blind loop syndrome occurs when digested food slows or stops moving through part of the intestines. This causes an overgrowth of bacteria in the intestines. It also leads to problems absorbing nutrients.", "Possible Complications": "Complete intestinal obstruction, Death of intestine (intestinal infarction), Hole (perforation) in intestine, Malabsorption and malnutrition. ", "Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Fatty stools", "Fullness after a meal", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Unintentional weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "During a physical exam, the doctor may notice a mass in, or swelling of, the abdomen. Possible tests include:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal x-ray, Blood tests to check nutritional status, Upper GI series with small bowel follow through contrast x-ray . ", "Treatment": "Treatment most often starts with antibiotics for the excess bacteria growth, along with vitamin B12 supplements. If antibiotics are not effective, surgery may be needed to help food flow through the intestines. ", "Causes": "The name of this condition refers to the \"blind loop\" formed by part of the intestine that is bypassed. This blockage does not allow digested food to flow normally through the intestinal tract.The substances needed to digest fats (called bile salts) do not work as they should when a section of the intestine is affected by blind loop syndrome. This prevents fat and fat-soluble vitamins from being absorbed into the body. It also leads to fatty stools. Vitamin B12 deficiency may occur because the extra bacteria that form in the blind loop use up this vitamin. Blind loop syndrome is a complication that occurs:After many operations, including subtotal gastrectomy (surgical removal of part of the stomach) and operations for extreme obesity, As a complication of inflammatory bowel disease. Diseases such as diabetes or scleroderma may slow down movement in a segment of the intestine, leading to blind loop syndrome."}, "Babies and heat rashes": {"description": "Heat rash occurs in babies when the pores of the sweat glands become blocked. This happens most often when the weather is hot or humid. As your infant sweats, little red bumps, and possibly tiny blisters, form because the blocked glands cannot clear the sweat."}, "Bleeding gums": {"description": "Bleeding gums can be a sign that you have or are at risk for gum disease. Ongoing gum bleeding may be due to serious medical conditions such as leukemia and bleeding and platelet disorders.", "Causes": "The main cause of bleeding gum is the buildup of plaque at the gum line. This will lead to a condition called gingivitis, or inflamed gums.Plaque that is not removed will harden into tartar. This will lead to increased bleeding and a more advanced form of gum and jawbone disease known as periodontitis.Other causes of bleeding gums include:Any bleeding disorder, Brushing too hard, Hormonal changes during pregnancy, Idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura, Ill-fitting dentures or other dental appliances, Improper flossing, Infection, which can be either tooth- or gum-related, Leukemia, Scurvy, Use of blood thinners, Vitamin K deficiency . "}, "Bence-Jones protein - quantitative": {"description": "This test measures the level of abnormal proteins called Bence-Jones proteins in the urine."}, "Bone graft": {"description": "A bone graft is surgery to place new bone or bone substitutes into spaces around a broken bone or bone defects."}}